Missouri, session 2026, HB3092.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 21.851, 32.088, 67.5125, 86.353, 99.1205, 100.260, 103.003,
103.005, 103.047, 103.083, 103.089, 103.095, 103.141, 103.175, 103.178, 104.352, 105.721,
130.034, 135.204, 135.276, 135.277, 135.279, 135.281, 135.283, 135.313, 135.530, 135.545,
135.546, 135.680, 135.682, 135.710, 135.766, 135.800, 135.980, 136.450, 142.1000,
143.173, 143.732, 143.1008, 143.1009, 143.1013, 143.1014, 143.1017, 143.1027,
143.1100, 148.370, 160.405, 161.825, 161.1055, 167.225, 167.950, 171.034, 172.287,
173.196, 173.236, 173.680, 173.2510, 178.697, 184.350, 184.351, 184.352, 184.353,
184.355, 184.357, 184.359, 184.362, 184.384, 190.450, 191.211, 191.425, 191.828,
191.831, 191.950, 191.1075, 191.1080, 191.1085, 192.926, 199.020, 208.244, 208.471,
208.482, 208.627, 210.154, 210.1030, 215.263, 217.147, 217.151, 227.817, 252.300,
252.303, 252.306, 252.309, 252.312, 252.315, 252.318, 252.321, 252.324, 252.327,
252.330, 252.333, 260.900, 260.905, 260.910, 260.915, 260.920, 260.925, 260.930,
260.935, 260.940, 260.945, 260.950, 260.955, 260.960, 260.965, 301.140, 301.190,
301.213, 301.562, 313.270, 319.140, 320.092, 320.093, 332.304, 332.305, 334.153,
334.1135, 338.320, 354.215, 374.007, 375.330, 375.355, 375.380, 375.480, 376.170,
376.180, 376.190, 376.210, 376.220, 376.230, 376.240, 376.250, 376.260, 376.270,
376.309, 376.752, 377.005, 377.010, 377.020, 377.030, 377.040, 377.050, 377.060,
377.070, 377.080, 377.090, 377.100, 377.120, 377.150, 377.160, 377.170, 377.180,
377.190, 377.199, 377.200, 377.210, 377.220, 377.230, 377.240, 377.250, 377.260,
377.270, 377.280, 377.290, 377.300, 377.310, 377.320, 377.330, 377.340, 377.350,
377.360, 377.370, 377.380, 377.400, 377.420, 377.430, 377.450, 377.460, 379.205,
379.210, 379.215, 379.220, 379.225, 379.230, 379.235, 379.240, 379.245, 379.250,
379.255, 379.257, 379.260, 379.263, 379.265, 379.270, 379.275, 379.290, 379.295,
379.300, 379.316, 379.670, 379.700, 379.720, 379.1310, 382.070, 393.1072, 394.120,
414.407, 454.433, 454.470, 454.490, 454.849, 476.1000, 488.426, 559.117, 595.202,
620.570, 620.1020, 620.1910, 620.2020, 620.2100, 620.2600, 630.717, 633.420, and
640.030, RSMo, and section 167.910 as enacted by house bill no. 1606, ninety-ninth

HCS HB 3092 3
general assembly, second regular session, and section 167.910 as enacted by house bill no.
1415, ninety-ninth general assembly, second regular session, are repealed and fifty-seven new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 86.353, 100.260, 103.003, 103.005,
103.047, 103.083, 103.089, 103.095, 103.141, 104.352, 105.721, 130.034, 135.204, 135.530,
135.800, 148.370, 160.405, 167.225, 167.950, 173.2510, 178.697, 184.350, 184.351,
184.352, 184.353, 184.355, 184.357, 184.359, 184.362, 191.211, 191.828, 191.831,
208.244, 208.471, 217.151, 301.140, 301.190, 301.562, 313.270, 320.092, 375.330,
376.309, 379.316, 379.670, 379.720, 379.1310, 382.070, 394.120, 414.407, 454.433,
454.470, 454.490, 488.426, 620.570, 620.1020, 620.2020, and 630.717, to read as follows:
86.353. The right of any person to a benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to
any person under the provisions of sections 86.200 to 86.366 and the moneys created pursuant
to sections 86.200 to 86.366 are not subject to execution, garnishment, attachment or any
other process whatsoever and are unassignable except as in sections 86.200 to 86.366
specifically provided. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this section shall prevent the
board of trustees from honoring the terms of a court order requiring the retirement system to
pay all or any portion of the retirement benefit otherwise payable to a retired or disabled
member to a third party to satisfy the member's obligation to pay child support or
maintenance. Any relief association created pursuant to section 86.500 shall be exempt from
the tax imposed by sections 143.011 to [143.1013] 143.1006.
100.260. 1. There are hereby created four special funds, to be known as the
"Industrial Development and Reserve Fund", the "Industrial Development Guarantee Fund",
the "Export Finance Fund", and the "Jobs Now Fund", into which the following may be
deposited as and when received and designated for deposit in one of such funds:
(1) Any moneys appropriated by the general assembly for use by the board in
carrying out the powers set forth in sections 100.250 to 100.297;
(2) Any moneys made available through the issuance of revenue bonds under the
provisions of sections 100.250 to 100.295;
(3) Any moneys received from grants or which are given, donated, or contributed to
the fund from any source;
(4) Any moneys received in repayment of loans or from application fees, reserve
participation fees, guarantee fees and premium payments as provided for under sections
100.250 to 100.297;
(5) Any moneys received as interest on deposits or as income on approved
investments of the fund;
(6) Any moneys obtained from the issuance of revenue bonds or notes by the board;
(7) Any moneys that were in the industrial development fund authorized by this
section, the economic development reserve authorized by section 620.215, or the industrial

HCS HB 3092 4
revenue bond guarantee fund authorized by section 620.240, respectively, as of September 28,
1985; and
(8) Any moneys obtained from any other available source.
2. The development and reserve fund, the guarantee fund, the jobs now fund, and the
export finance fund shall be administered by the board as provided in sections 100.250 to
100.297. Separate accounts may be created within the development and reserve fund and the
guarantee fund for moneys specifically appropriated, donated or otherwise received for
industrial development purposes. The board may also create such other separate accounts
within any of such funds as deemed necessary or appropriate by the board to carry out the
duties and purposes of sections 100.250 to 100.297. All such separate accounts may be
administered by a corporate trustee on behalf of the board upon the terms and conditions
established by the board.
3. Moneys in the jobs now fund, the development and reserve fund, the guarantee
fund, and the export finance fund shall be invested by the board in the manner prescribed by
the board and any interest earned on invested moneys shall accrue to the benefit of the
respective fund.
4. None of the funds and accounts of the board shall be considered a state fund, and
money deposited therein may not be appropriated therefrom, nor shall any money deposited
therein be subject to the provisions of section 33.080.
5. The commissioner of administration shall annually calculate the increased amount
of revenue to the state treasury due to the provisions of sections 135.155, 135.286, [135.546,]
and subsection 7 of section 620.1039, as enacted or modified by this act and shall allocate up
to twelve million dollars of such revenue to the jobs now fund.
103.003. As used in [sections 103.003 to 103.175] this chapter, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Actuarial reserves", the necessary funding required to pay all the medical
expenses for services provided to members of the plan but for which the claims have not yet
been received by the claims administrator;
(2) "Actuary", a member of the American Academy of Actuaries or who is an
enrolled actuary under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974;
(3) "Agency", a state-sponsored institution of higher learning, political subdivision or
governmental entity or instrumentality;
(4) "Alternative delivery health care program", a plan of covered benefits that pays
medical expenses through an alternate mechanism rather than on a fee-for-service basis. This
includes, but is not limited to, health maintenance organizations and preferred provider
organizations, all of which shall include chiropractic physicians licensed under chapter 331,
in the provider networks or organizations;

HCS HB 3092 5
(5) "Board", the board of trustees of the Missouri consolidated health care plan;
(6) "Claims administrator", an agency contracted to process medical claims submitted
from providers or members of the plan and their dependents;
(7) "Coordination of benefits", to work with another group-sponsored health care plan
which also covers a member of the plan to ensure that both plans pay their appropriate amount
of the health care expenses incurred by the member;
(8) "Covered benefits", a schedule of covered services, including chiropractic
services, which are payable under the plan;
(9) "Employee", any person employed full time by the state or a participating member
agency, or a person eligible for coverage by a state-sponsored retirement system or a
retirement system sponsored by a participating member agency of the plan;
(10) "Evidence of good health", medical information supplied by a potential member
of the plan that is reviewed to determine the financial risk the person represents to the plan
and the corresponding determination of whether or not he or she should be accepted into the
plan;
(11) "Health care plan", any group medical benefit plan providing coverage on an
expense-incurred basis, any HMO, any group service or indemnity contract issued by a health
plan of any type or description;
(12) "Medical benefits coverages" shall include services provided by chiropractic
physicians as well as physicians licensed under chapter 334;
(13) "Medical expenses", costs for services performed by a provider and covered
under the plan;
(14) "Missouri consolidated health care plan benefit fund account", the benefit trust
fund account containing all payroll deductions, payments, and income from all sources for the
plan;
(15) "Officer", an elected official of the state of Missouri;
(16) "Participating higher education entity", a state-sponsored institution of higher
learning;
(17) "Participating member agency", a political subdivision or governmental entity
that has elected to join the plan and has been accepted by the board;
(18) "Plan year", a twelve-month period designated by the board which is used to
calculate the annual rate categories and the appropriate coverage;
(19) "Provider", a physician, hospital, pharmacist, psychologist, chiropractic
physician or other licensed practitioner who or which provides health care services within
the respective scope of practice of such practitioner pursuant to state law and regulation;
(20) "Retiree", a person who is not an employee and is receiving or is entitled to
receive an annuity benefit from a state-sponsored retirement system or a retirement system of

HCS HB 3092 6
a participating member agency of the plan or becomes eligible for retirement benefits because
of service with a participating member agency.
103.005. For the purpose of covering medical expenses of the officers, employees and
retirees, the eligible dependents of officers, employees and retirees and to the surviving
spouses and children of deceased officers, employees and retirees of the state and
participating member agencies of the state, there is hereby created and established a health
care plan which shall be a body corporate, which shall be under the management of the board
of trustees herein described, and shall be known as the "Missouri Consolidated Health Care
Plan". Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such plan may sue and be sued,
transact business, contract, invest funds and hold cash, securities and other property and shall
be vested with such other powers as may be necessary or proper to enable it, its officers,
employees, and agents to carry out fully and effectively all the purposes of [sections 103.003
to 103.175] this chapter.
103.047. Each trustee shall be entitled to one vote. Six trustees shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business and any official action of the board shall be based on
the majority vote of the trustees present. Unless otherwise expressly provided in [sections
103.003 to 103.175] this chapter, a meeting need not be called or held to make any decision
on a matter before the board. Each member must be sent by the executive director a copy of
the matter to be decided with full information on the question from the files of the plan. The
concurring decisions of six trustees may decide the issue by signing a document declaring
their decision and sending the written document to the executive director within fifteen days
after the document and information was mailed to the trustee. If any trustee is not in
agreement with the six trustees, the matter is to be passed on at a regular board meeting or a
special meeting called for that purpose.
103.083. The board shall provide or contract, or both, on its own behalf, for medical
benefits coverage and services for persons covered under [sections 103.003 to 103.175] this
chapter and enrolled in the plan. The board may contract for medical benefits coverage with
alternative delivery health care programs where available. Medical expenses shall also
include expenses for comparable benefits for employees who rely solely on spiritual means
through prayer for healing.
103.089. Participants in the program of medical benefits coverage provided by
[sections 103.003 to 103.175] this chapter who are eligible for Medicare benefits and who
are not eligible for the program of medical benefits coverage provided under sections 103.083
to 103.098 to be their primary plan of coverage benefits shall be provided substantially
similar benefits provided participants who are not eligible for Medicare benefits. Medical
benefits coverage provided under [sections 103.003 to 103.175] this chapter shall be
coordinated with Medicare benefits for participants covered by part A or part B, or both, of

HCS HB 3092 7
Medicare benefits, or for participants eligible for but not covered by part A or part B, or both,
of Medicare benefits, reduced by an amount determined by the claims administrator to
provide a benefit equivalent to the amount which would be provided on a coordination of
benefit basis for such participants if such participants were covered by part A or part B, or
both, of Medicare benefits. As used in sections 103.083 to 103.098, the term "Medicare
benefits" shall include those medical benefits provided by Title XVIII, A and B, Public Law
89-97, 1965 amendments to the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 301, et seq.)
and amendments thereto. Any participating member agency having employees or eligible
retirees not covered by Medicare shall authorize the plan at its option to enroll those
individuals for medical benefits as provided by Title XVIII, A and B, Public Law 89-97, 1965
amendments to the federal Social Security Act whenever they become eligible for such
benefits and the plan shall pay the premium for such enrollment on behalf of that person. The
Medicare premium amounts shall be included in the rate established by the actuary for
providing medical benefits coverage to such a participating member agency. Anyone not
authorizing this Medicare enrollment shall be denied coverage.
103.095. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any member of
the general assembly and any elected state official holding a statewide elective state office,
who ceases to hold elective office, or any person employed by the elected official or
employed by a member of the general assembly, whose employment is terminated because
such elected official or member of the general assembly ceases to hold elective office, may
elect to continue insurance benefits to cover medical expenses provided under [sections
103.003 to 103.175] this chapter, by paying the cost of such benefits as determined by the
board. If an eligible person does not elect to continue the coverage within thirty-one days
from the last day of the month in which the eligible person ceases to be an employee, he may
not later elect to be covered under this section.
103.141. The persons in each participating member agency eligible for coverage by
the plan shall include, subject to the limitations contained in [sections 103.003 to 103.175]
this chapter:
(1) All employees, retirees, former employees entitled to a retirement benefit because
of service with the participating member agency, employees eligible for a disability benefit
from the participating member agency, employees on a leave of absence, and their
dependents;
(2) All persons, and their dependents, who become employees of a participating
member agency on or after the date such agency becomes covered under the plan, and who
wish to enroll in the plan; and
(3) All persons who become eligible for retirement benefits because of service with
the participating member agency, persons who become eligible for a disability benefit from

HCS HB 3092 8
the participating member agency, and their unemancipated dependents, on or after the date
such participating member agency becomes covered under the plan, and who have been
continuously covered by the benefits under [sections 103.003 to 103.175] this chapter for at
least the shorter of:
(a) Two years prior to the date of disability of the employee or his eligibility for
normal or early retirement; or
(b) From the initial date of eligibility for the benefits provided by [sections 103.003 to
103.175] this chapter.
104.352. 1. Each employee described in paragraph (b) of subdivision (21) of section
104.010 shall be entitled to the same insurance benefits provided under [sections 103.003 to
103.175] chapter 103 to employees described in paragraph (a) of subdivision (21) of section
104.010 to cover the medical expenses of such employees and their spouses and children.
Such insurance benefits shall be made available to employees described in paragraph (b) of
subdivision (21) of section 104.010 upon their initial employment as such employees in the
same manner provided for employees described in paragraph (a) of subdivision (21) of
section 104.010, and shall be continued during any period of time, not to exceed one year, in
which such employees are not paid for full-time employment, so long as such employees pay
the same amount for such insurance benefits as is required of employees described in
paragraph (a) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010 who continue receiving such insurance
benefits during a leave of absence without pay from their employment with the state. Any
employee described in paragraph (b) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010 who is
reemployed by the general assembly or either house thereof, or by any member of the general
assembly while acting in his official capacity as a member, by the thirteenth legislative day of
the session of the general assembly immediately following the session of the general
assembly in which such employee was last so employed, without having elected to
discontinue the insurance benefits described in this subsection, shall be entitled to continue
such insurance benefits without having to prove insurability for himself or any of his covered
dependents for whom he has paid for such coverage continuously since last employed as an
employee described in paragraph (b) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010. Any employee
described in paragraph (b) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010 who is not reemployed by
the general assembly or either house thereof, or by any member of the general assembly while
acting in his official capacity as a member, by the thirteenth legislative day of the session of
the general assembly immediately following the session of the general assembly in which
such employee was last so employed, shall be deemed terminated as an employee as of such
thirteenth legislative day, and the insurance benefits provided for such employee under this
subsection and [sections 103.003 to 103.175] chapter 103shall be terminated as provided for
employees described in paragraph (a) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010 whose

HCS HB 3092 9
employment is terminated. During each month of service in which an employee described in
paragraph (b) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010 is employed, the state shall make any
contribution required by [sections 103.003 to 103.175] chapter 103 for such employee.
2. Any employee described in paragraph (b) of subdivision (21) of section 104.010
who is actively employed on or after September 28, 1992, shall be deemed vested for
purposes of determining eligibility for benefits under sections 104.320 to 104.620 after being
so employed for at least sixty months.
105.721. 1. The commissioner of administration may, in his discretion, direct that
any or all of the moneys appropriated to the state legal expense fund be expended to procure
one or more policies of insurance to insure against all or any portion of the potential liabilities
of the state of Missouri or its agencies, officers, and employees.
2. Until July 1, 1996, the commissioner of administration may procure one or more
policies of insurance or reinsurance to insure against all potential losses from liabilities
incurred by the state legal expense fund under paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdivision (3) of
subsection 2 of section 105.711. [On or before January 1, 1996, the commissioner of
administration shall prepare and distribute a report regarding the cost effectiveness of insuring
against potential losses to the state under paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdivision (3) of
subsection 2 of section 105.711, by the direct purchase of an insurance policy or policies as
compared to self-insuring against such losses through appropriations to the state legal
expense fund under section 105.711. The report shall be submitted to the governor, the
speaker of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the senate, and upon
request to any member of the general assembly.]
3. After consultation with the state courts administrator, the commissioner of
administration shall procure such surety bonds as are required by statute and such surety
bonds as he deems necessary to protect the state against loss from the acts or omissions of any
person within the judiciary that receives compensation from the state. No other bond for such
person shall be required for the protection of the state. A copy of any bond procured pursuant
to this section shall be filed with the secretary of state.
130.034. 1. Contributions as defined in section 130.011, received by any committee
shall not be converted to any personal use.
2. Contributions may be used for any purpose allowed by law including, but not
limited to:
(1) Any ordinary expenses incurred relating to a campaign;
(2) Any ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in connection with the duties of a
holder of elective office;

HCS HB 3092 10
(3) Any expenses associated with the duties of candidacy or of elective office
pertaining to the entertaining of or providing social courtesies to constituents, professional
associations, or other holders of elective office;
(4) The return of any contribution to the person who made the contribution to the
candidate or holder of elective office;
(5) To contribute to a political organization or candidate committee as allowed by
law;
(6) To establish a new committee as defined by this chapter;
(7) To make an unconditional gift which is fully vested to any charitable, fraternal or
civic organizations or other associations formed to provide for some good in the order of
benevolence, if such candidate, former candidate or holder of elective office or such person's
immediate family gain no direct financial benefit from the unconditional gift[;
(8) Except when such candidate, former candidate or holder of elective office dies
while the committee remains in existence, the committee may make an unconditional gift to a
fund established for the benefit of the spouse and children of the candidate, former candidate
or holder of elective office. The provisions of this subdivision shall expire October 1, 1997].
3. Upon the death of the candidate, former candidate or holder of elective office who
received such contributions, all contributions shall be disposed of according to this section
and any funds remaining after final settlement of the candidate's decedent's estate, or if no
estate is opened, then twelve months after the candidate's death, will escheat to the state of
Missouri to be deposited in the general revenue fund.
4. No contributions, as defined in section 130.011, received by a candidate, former
candidate or holder of elective office shall be used to make restitution payments ordered of
such individual by a court of law or for the payment of any fine resulting from conviction of a
violation of any local, state or federal law.
5. Committees described in subdivision (18) of section 130.011 shall make
expenditures only for the purpose of determining whether an individual will be a candidate.
Such expenditures include polling information, mailings, personal appearances, telephone
expenses, office and travel expenses but may not include contributions to other candidate
committees.
6. Any moneys in the exploratory committee fund may be transferred to the candidate
committee upon declaration of candidacy for the position being explored. Such funds shall be
included for the purposes of reporting and limitation. In the event that candidacy is not
declared for the position being explored, the remaining exploratory committee funds shall be
returned to the contributors on a pro rata basis. In no event shall the amount returned exceed
the amount given by each contributor nor be less than ten dollars.

HCS HB 3092 11
7. Funds held in candidate committees, campaign committees, debt service
committees, and exploratory committees shall be liquid such that these funds shall be
readily available for the specific and limited purposes allowed by law. These funds may be
invested only in short-term treasury instruments or short-term bank certificates with durations
of one year or less, or that allow the removal of funds at any time without any additional
financial penalty other than the loss of interest income. Continuing committees, political
party committees, and other committees such as out-of-state committees not formed for the
benefit of any single candidate or ballot issue shall not be subject to the provisions of this
subsection. This subsection shall not be interpreted to restrict the placement of funds in an
interest-bearing checking account.
135.204. The repeal and reenactment of sections 99.918, 99.1082, 135.205, 135.207,
135.230, 135.530, 135.903, 135.953, [215.263,] and 620.1023 of section A of this act shall
become effective on April 1, 2011, or when the United States Census Bureau's American
Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-year period estimate data in which the
final year of the estimate period ends in zero becomes available, which first occurs. The
commissioner of the office of administration shall notify the revisor of statutes when the
updated United States Census Bureau data has been released.
135.530. For the purposes of sections 100.010, 100.710, 100.850, 135.110, 135.200,
135.258, [135.313,] 135.403, 135.405, 135.503, 135.530, [135.545,] 215.030, 348.300,
348.302, and 620.1400 to 620.1460, "distressed community" means either a Missouri
municipality within a metropolitan statistical area which has a median household income of
under seventy percent of the median household income for the metropolitan statistical area,
according to the United States Census Bureau's American Community Survey, based on the
most recent of five-year period estimate data in which the final year of the estimate ends in
either zero or five, or a United States census block group or contiguous group of block groups
within a metropolitan statistical area which has a population of at least two thousand five
hundred, and each block group having a median household income of under seventy percent
of the median household income for the metropolitan area in Missouri, according to the
United States Census Bureau's American Community Survey, based on the most recent of
five-year period estimate data in which the final year of the estimate ends in either zero or
five. In addition the definition shall include municipalities not in a metropolitan statistical
area, with a median household income of under seventy percent of the median household
income for the nonmetropolitan areas in Missouri according to the United States Census
Bureau's American Community Survey, based on the most recent of five-year period estimate
data in which the final year of the estimate ends in either zero or five or a census block group
or contiguous group of block groups which has a population of at least two thousand five
hundred with each block group having a median household income of under seventy percent

HCS HB 3092 12
of the median household income for the nonmetropolitan areas of Missouri, according to the
United States Census Bureau's American Community Survey, based on the most recent of
five-year period estimate data in which the final year of the estimate ends in either zero or
five. In metropolitan statistical areas, the definition shall include areas that were designated
as either a federal empowerment zone; or a federal enhanced enterprise community; or a state
enterprise zone that was originally designated before January 1, 1986, but shall not include
expansions of such state enterprise zones done after March 16, 1988.
135.800. 1. The provisions of sections 135.800 to 135.830 shall be known and may
be cited as the "Tax Credit Accountability Act of 2004".
2. As used in sections 135.800 to 135.830, the following terms mean:
(1) "Administering agency", the state agency or department charged with
administering a particular tax credit program, as set forth by the program's enacting
statute; where no department or agency is set forth, the department of revenue;
(2) "Agricultural tax credits", the agricultural product utilization contributor tax credit
created pursuant to section 348.430, the new generation cooperative incentive tax credit
created pursuant to section 348.432, the family farm breeding livestock loan tax credit created
under section 348.505, the qualified beef tax credit created under section 135.679, and the
wine and grape production tax credit created pursuant to section 135.700;
(3) "Business recruitment tax credits", the business facility tax credit created pursuant
to sections 135.110 to 135.150 and section 135.258, the enterprise zone tax benefits created
pursuant to sections 135.200 to 135.270, the business use incentives for large-scale
development programs created pursuant to sections 100.700 to 100.850, the development tax
credits created pursuant to sections 32.100 to 32.125, the rebuilding communities tax credit
created pursuant to section 135.535, the film production tax credit created pursuant to section
135.750, the enhanced enterprise zone created pursuant to sections 135.950 to 135.970, and
the Missouri quality jobs program created pursuant to sections 620.1875 to 620.1900;
(4) "Community development tax credits", the neighborhood assistance tax credit
created pursuant to sections 32.100 to 32.125[,] and the family development account tax
credit created pursuant to sections 208.750 to 208.775[, the dry fire hydrant tax credit created
pursuant to section 320.093, and the transportation development tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.545];
(5) "Domestic and social tax credits", the youth opportunities tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.460 and sections 620.1100 to 620.1103, the shelter for victims of
domestic violence created pursuant to section 135.550, the senior citizen or disabled person
property tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.010 to 135.035, the adoption tax credit
created pursuant to sections 135.325 to 135.339, the champion for children tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.341, the maternity home tax credit created pursuant to section

HCS HB 3092 13
135.600, the surviving spouse tax credit created pursuant to section 135.090, the residential
treatment agency tax credit created pursuant to section 135.1150, the pregnancy resource
center tax credit created pursuant to section 135.630, the food pantry tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.647, the residential dwelling access tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.562, the developmental disability care provider tax credit created under section
135.1180, the shared care tax credit created pursuant to section 192.2015, the health, hunger,
and hygiene tax credit created pursuant to section 135.1125, and the diaper bank tax credit
created pursuant to section 135.621;
(6) "Entrepreneurial tax credits", the capital tax credit created pursuant to sections
135.400 to 135.429, the certified capital company tax credit created pursuant to sections
135.500 to 135.529, the seed capital tax credit created pursuant to sections 348.300 to
348.318, the new enterprise creation tax credit created pursuant to sections 620.635 to
620.653, the research tax credit created pursuant to section 620.1039, the small business
incubator tax credit created pursuant to section 620.495, [the guarantee fee tax credit created
pursuant to section 135.766,] and the new generation cooperative tax credit created pursuant
to sections 32.105 to 32.125;
(7) "Environmental tax credits", [the charcoal producer tax credit created pursuant to
section 135.313,] the wood energy tax credit created pursuant to sections 135.300 to 135.311
[, and the alternative fuel stations tax credit created pursuant to section 135.710];
(8) "Financial and insurance tax credits", the bank franchise tax credit created
pursuant to section 148.030, the bank tax credit for S corporations created pursuant to section
143.471, the exam fee tax credit created pursuant to section 148.400, the health insurance
pool tax credit created pursuant to section 376.975, the life and health insurance guaranty tax
credit created pursuant to section 376.745, the property and casualty guaranty tax credit
created pursuant to section 375.774, and the self-employed health insurance tax credit created
pursuant to section 143.119;
(9) "Housing tax credits", the neighborhood preservation tax credit created pursuant
to sections 135.475 to 135.487, the low-income housing tax credit created pursuant to
sections 135.350 to 135.363, and the affordable housing tax credit created pursuant to
sections 32.105 to 32.125;
(10) "Recipient", the individual or entity who both:
(a) Is the original applicant for a tax credit; and
(b) Who directly receives a tax credit or the right to transfer a tax credit under a tax
credit program, regardless as to whether the tax credit has been used or redeemed; a recipient
shall not include the transferee of a transferable tax credit;
(11) "Redevelopment tax credits", the historic preservation tax credit created pursuant
to sections 253.545 to 253.559, the brownfield redevelopment program tax credit created

HCS HB 3092 14
pursuant to sections 447.700 to 447.718, the community development corporations tax credit
created pursuant to sections 135.400 to 135.430, the infrastructure tax credit created pursuant
to subsection 6 of section 100.286, the bond guarantee tax credit created pursuant to section
100.297, and the disabled access tax credit created pursuant to section 135.490[, the new
markets tax credit created pursuant to section 135.680, and the distressed areas land
assemblage tax credit created pursuant to section 99.1205];
(12) "Tax credit program", any of the tax credit programs included in the definitions
of agricultural tax credits, business recruitment tax credits, community development tax
credits, domestic and social tax credits, entrepreneurial tax credits, environmental tax credits,
housing tax credits, redevelopment tax credits, and training and educational tax credits;
(13) "Training and educational tax credits", the Missouri works new jobs tax credit
and Missouri works retained jobs credit created pursuant to sections 620.800 to 620.809.
148.370. Every insurance company or association organized under the laws of the
state of Missouri and doing business under the provisions of sections 376.010 to 376.670,
[379.205 to 379.310,] 379.650 to 379.790 and chapter 381 and every mutual fire insurance
company organized under the provisions of sections 379.010 to 379.190 shall, as hereinafter
provided, quarterly pay, beginning with the year 1983, a tax upon the direct premiums
received by it from policyholders in this state, whether in cash or in notes, or on account of
business done in this state, in lieu of the taxes imposed under the provisions of chapters 143
and 147 for insurance of life, property or interest in this state, at the rate of two percent per
annum, which amount of taxes shall be assessed and collected as hereinafter provided;
provided, that fire and casualty insurance companies or associations shall be credited with
cancelled or returned premiums actually paid during the year in this state, and that life
insurance companies shall be credited with dividends actually declared to policyholders in
this state but held by the company and applied to the reduction of premiums payable by the
policyholder.
160.405. 1. A person, group or organization seeking to establish a charter school
shall submit the proposed charter, as provided in this section, to a sponsor. If the sponsor is
not a school board, the applicant shall give a copy of its application to the school board of the
district in which the charter school is to be located and to the state board of education, within
five business days of the date the application is filed with the proposed sponsor. The school
board may file objections with the proposed sponsor, and, if a charter is granted, the school
board may file objections with the state board of education. The charter shall include a
legally binding performance contract that describes the obligations and responsibilities of the
school and the sponsor as outlined in sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349 and
shall address the following:
(1) A mission and vision statement for the charter school;

HCS HB 3092 15
(2) A description of the charter school's organizational structure and bylaws of the
governing body, which will be responsible for the policy, financial management, and
operational decisions of the charter school, including the nature and extent of parental,
professional educator, and community involvement in the governance and operation of the
charter school;
(3) A financial plan for the first three years of operation of the charter school
including provisions for annual audits;
(4) A description of the charter school's policy for securing personnel services, its
personnel policies, personnel qualifications, and professional development plan;
(5) A description of the grades or ages of students being served;
(6) The school's calendar of operation, which shall include at least the equivalent of a
full school term as defined in section 160.011;
(7) A description of the charter school's pupil performance standards and academic
program performance standards, which shall meet the requirements of subdivision (6) of
subsection 4 of this section. The charter school program shall be designed to enable each
pupil to achieve such standards and shall contain a complete set of indicators, measures,
metrics, and targets for academic program performance, including specific goals on
graduation rates and standardized test performance and academic growth;
(8) A description of the charter school's educational program and curriculum;
(9) The term of the charter, which shall be five years and may be renewed;
(10) Procedures, consistent with the Missouri financial accounting manual, for
monitoring the financial accountability of the charter, which shall meet the requirements of
subdivision (4) of subsection 4 of this section;
(11) Preopening requirements for applications that require that charter schools meet
all health, safety, and other legal requirements prior to opening;
(12) A description of the charter school's policies on student discipline and student
admission, which shall include a statement, where applicable, of the validity of attendance of
students who do not reside in the district but who may be eligible to attend under the terms of
judicial settlements and procedures that ensure admission of students with disabilities in a
nondiscriminatory manner;
(13) A description of the charter school's grievance procedure for parents or
guardians;
(14) A description of the agreement and time frame for implementation between the
charter school and the sponsor as to when a sponsor shall intervene in a charter school, when
a sponsor shall revoke a charter for failure to comply with subsection 8 of this section, and
when a sponsor will not renew a charter under subsection 9 of this section;

HCS HB 3092 16
(15) Procedures to be implemented if the charter school should close, as provided in
subdivision (6) of subsection 16 of section 160.400 including:
(a) Orderly transition of student records to new schools and archival of student
records;
(b) Archival of business operation and transfer or repository of personnel records;
(c) Submission of final financial reports;
(d) Resolution of any remaining financial obligations;
(e) Disposition of the charter school's assets upon closure; and
(f) A notification plan to inform parents or guardians of students, the local school
district, the retirement system in which the charter school's employees participate, and the
state board of education within thirty days of the decision to close;
(16) A description of the special education and related services that shall be available
to meet the needs of students with disabilities; and
(17) For all new or revised charters, procedures to be used upon closure of the charter
school requiring that unobligated assets of the charter school be returned to the department of
elementary and secondary education for their disposition, which upon receipt of such assets
shall return them to the local school district in which the school was located, the state, or any
other entity to which they would belong.

Charter schools operating on August 27, 2012, shall have until August 28, 2015, to meet the
requirements of this subsection.
2. Proposed charters shall be subject to the following requirements:
(1) A charter shall be submitted to the sponsor, and follow the sponsor's policies and
procedures for review and granting of a charter approval, and be approved by the state board
of education by January thirty-first prior to the school year of the proposed opening date of
the charter school;
(2) A charter may be approved when the sponsor determines that the requirements of
this section are met, determines that the applicant is sufficiently qualified to operate a charter
school, and that the proposed charter is consistent with the sponsor's charter sponsorship
goals and capacity. The sponsor's decision of approval or denial shall be made within ninety
days of the filing of the proposed charter;
(3) If the charter is denied, the proposed sponsor shall notify the applicant in writing
as to the reasons for its denial and forward a copy to the state board of education within five
business days following the denial;
(4) If a proposed charter is denied by a sponsor, the proposed charter may be
submitted to the state board of education, along with the sponsor's written reasons for its
denial. If the state board determines that the applicant meets the requirements of this section,

HCS HB 3092 17
that the applicant is sufficiently qualified to operate the charter school, and that granting a
charter to the applicant would be likely to provide educational benefit to the children of the
district, the state board may grant a charter and act as sponsor of the charter school. The state
board shall review the proposed charter and make a determination of whether to deny or grant
the proposed charter within sixty days of receipt of the proposed charter, provided that any
charter to be considered by the state board of education under this subdivision shall be
submitted no later than March first prior to the school year in which the charter school intends
to begin operations. The state board of education shall notify the applicant in writing as the
reasons for its denial, if applicable; and
(5) The sponsor of a charter school shall give priority to charter school applicants that
propose a school oriented to high-risk students and to the reentry of dropouts into the school
system. If a sponsor grants three or more charters, at least one-third of the charters granted by
the sponsor shall be to schools that actively recruit dropouts or high-risk students as their
student body and address the needs of dropouts or high-risk students through their proposed
mission, curriculum, teaching methods, and services. For purposes of this subsection, a
100 "high-risk" student is one who is at least one year behind in satisfactory completion of course
101 work or obtaining high school credits for graduation, has dropped out of school, is at risk of
102 dropping out of school, needs drug and alcohol treatment, has severe behavioral problems,
103 has been suspended from school three or more times, has a history of severe truancy, is a
104 pregnant or parenting teen, has been referred for enrollment by the judicial system, is exiting
105 incarceration, is a refugee, is homeless or has been homeless sometime within the preceding
106 six months, has been referred by an area school district for enrollment in an alternative
107 program, or qualifies as high risk under department of elementary and secondary education
108 guidelines. Dropout shall be defined through the guidelines of the school core data report.
109 The provisions of this subsection do not apply to charters sponsored by the state board of
110 education.
111 3. If a charter is approved by a sponsor, the charter application shall be submitted to
112 the state board of education, along with a statement of finding by the sponsor that the
113 application meets the requirements of sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349 and a
114 monitoring plan under which the charter sponsor shall evaluate the academic performance,
115 including annual performance reports, of students enrolled in the charter school. The state
116 board of education shall approve or deny a charter application within sixty days of receipt of
117 the application. The state board of education may deny a charter on grounds that the
118 application fails to meet the requirements of sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349
119 or that a charter sponsor previously failed to meet the statutory responsibilities of a charter
120 sponsor. Any denial of a charter application made by the state board of education shall be in
121 writing and shall identify the specific failures of the application to meet the requirements of

HCS HB 3092 18
122 sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349, and the written denial shall be provided
123 within ten business days to the sponsor.
124 4. A charter school shall, as provided in its charter:
125 (1) Be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and
126 all other operations;
127 (2) Comply with laws and regulations of the state, county, or city relating to health,
128 safety, and state minimum educational standards, as specified by the state board of education,
129 including the requirements relating to student discipline under sections 160.261, 167.161,
130 167.164, and 167.171, notification of criminal conduct to law enforcement authorities under
131 sections 167.115 to 167.117, academic assessment under section 160.518, transmittal of
132 school records under section 167.020, the minimum amount of school time required under
133 section 171.031, and the employee criminal history background check and the family care
134 safety registry check under section 168.133;
135 (3) Except as provided in sections 160.400 to 160.425 and as specifically provided in
136 other sections, be exempt from all laws and rules relating to schools, governing boards and
137 school districts;
138 (4) Be financially accountable, use practices consistent with the Missouri financial
139 accounting manual, provide for an annual audit by a certified public accountant, publish audit
140 reports and annual financial reports as provided in chapter 165, provided that the annual
141 financial report may be published on the department of elementary and secondary education's
142 internet website in addition to other publishing requirements, and provide liability insurance
143 to indemnify the school, its board, staff and teachers against tort claims. A charter school that
144 receives local educational agency status under subsection 6 of this section shall meet the
145 requirements imposed by the Elementary and Secondary Education Act for audits of such
146 agencies and comply with all federal audit requirements for charters with local educational
147 agency status. For purposes of an audit by petition under section 29.230, a charter school
148 shall be treated as a political subdivision on the same terms and conditions as the school
149 district in which it is located. For the purposes of securing such insurance, a charter school
150 shall be eligible for the Missouri public entity risk management fund pursuant to section
151 537.700. A charter school that incurs debt shall include a repayment plan in its financial plan;
152 (5) Provide a comprehensive program of instruction for at least one grade or age
153 group from early childhood through grade twelve, as specified in its charter;
154 (6) (a) Design a method to measure pupil progress toward the pupil academic
155 standards adopted by the state board of education pursuant to section 160.514, establish
156 baseline student performance in accordance with the performance contract during the first
157 year of operation, collect student performance data as defined by the annual performance
158 report throughout the duration of the charter to annually monitor student academic

HCS HB 3092 19
159 performance, and to the extent applicable based upon grade levels offered by the charter
160 school, participate in the statewide system of assessments, comprised of the essential skills
161 tests and the nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement tests, as designated by the
162 state board pursuant to section 160.518, complete and distribute an annual report card as
163 prescribed in section 160.522, which shall also include a statement that background checks
164 have been completed on the charter school's board members, and report to its sponsor, the
165 local school district, and the state board of education as to its teaching methods and any
166 educational innovations and the results thereof. No charter school shall be considered in the
167 Missouri school improvement program review of the district in which it is located for the
168 resource or process standards of the program.
169 (b) For proposed high-risk or alternative charter schools, sponsors shall approve
170 performance measures based on mission, curriculum, teaching methods, and services.
171 Sponsors shall also approve comprehensive academic and behavioral measures to determine
172 whether students are meeting performance standards on a different time frame as specified in
173 that school's charter. Student performance shall be assessed comprehensively to determine
174 whether a high-risk or alternative charter school has documented adequate student progress.
175 Student performance shall be based on sponsor-approved comprehensive measures as well as
176 standardized public school measures. Annual presentation of charter school report card data
177 to the department of elementary and secondary education, the state board, and the public shall
178 include comprehensive measures of student progress.
179 (c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as permitting a charter school to be
180 held to lower performance standards than other public schools within a district; however, the
181 charter of a charter school may permit students to meet performance standards on a different
182 time frame as specified in its charter. The performance standards for alternative and special
183 purpose charter schools that target high-risk students as defined in subdivision (5) of
184 subsection 2 of this section shall be based on measures defined in the school's performance
185 contract with its sponsors;
186 (7) Comply with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations regarding
187 students with disabilities, including sections 162.670 to 162.710, the Individuals with
188 Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1400) and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation
189 Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Section 794) or successor legislation;
190 (8) Provide along with any request for review by the state board of education the
191 following:
192 (a) Documentation that the applicant has provided a copy of the application to the
193 school board of the district in which the charter school is to be located, except in those
194 circumstances where the school district is the sponsor of the charter school; and

HCS HB 3092 20
195 (b) A statement outlining the reasons for approval or denial by the sponsor,
196 specifically addressing the requirements of sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349.
197 5. (1) Proposed or existing high-risk or alternative charter schools may include
198 alternative arrangements for students to obtain credit for satisfying graduation requirements in
199 the school's charter application and charter. Alternative arrangements may include, but not be
200 limited to, credit for off-campus instruction, embedded credit, work experience through an
201 internship arranged through the school, and independent studies. When the state board of
202 education approves the charter, any such alternative arrangements shall be approved at such
203 time.
204 (2) The department of elementary and secondary education shall conduct a study of
205 any charter school granted alternative arrangements for students to obtain credit under this
206 subsection after three years of operation to assess student performance, graduation rates,
207 educational outcomes, and entry into the workforce or higher education.
208 6. The charter of a charter school may be amended at the request of the governing
209 body of the charter school and on the approval of the sponsor. The sponsor and the governing
210 board and staff of the charter school shall jointly review the school's performance,
211 management and operations during the first year of operation and then every other year after
212 the most recent review or at any point where the operation or management of the charter
213 school is changed or transferred to another entity, either public or private. The governing
214 board of a charter school may amend the charter, if the sponsor approves such amendment, or
215 the sponsor and the governing board may reach an agreement in writing to reflect the charter
216 school's decision to become a local educational agency. In such case the sponsor shall give
217 the department of elementary and secondary education written notice no later than March first
218 of any year, with the agreement to become effective July first. The department may waive the
219 March first notice date in its discretion. The department shall identify and furnish a list of its
220 regulations that pertain to local educational agencies to such schools within thirty days of
221 receiving such notice.
222 7. Sponsors shall annually review the charter school's compliance with statutory
223 standards including:
224 (1) Participation in the statewide system of assessments, as designated by the state
225 board of education under section 160.518;
226 (2) Assurances for the completion and distribution of an annual report card as
227 prescribed in section 160.522;
228 (3) The collection of baseline data during the first three years of operation to
229 determine the longitudinal success of the charter school;
230 (4) A method to measure pupil progress toward the pupil academic standards adopted
231 by the state board of education under section 160.514; and

HCS HB 3092 21
232 (5) Publication of each charter school's annual performance report.
233 8. (1) (a) A sponsor's policies shall give schools clear, adequate, evidence-based, and
234 timely notice of contract violations or performance deficiencies and mandate intervention
235 based upon findings of the state board of education of the following:
236 a. The charter school provides a high school program which fails to maintain a
237 graduation rate of at least seventy percent in three of the last four school years unless the
238 school has dropout recovery as its mission;
239 b. The charter school's annual performance report results are below the district's
240 annual performance report results based on the performance standards that are applicable to
241 the grade level configuration of both the charter school and the district in which the charter
242 school is located in three of the last four school years; and
243 c. The charter school is identified as a persistently lowest achieving school by the
244 department of elementary and secondary education.
245 (b) A sponsor shall have a policy to revoke a charter during the charter term if there
246 is:
247 a. Clear evidence of underperformance as demonstrated in the charter school's annual
248 performance report in three of the last four school years; or
249 b. A violation of the law or the public trust that imperils students or public funds.
250 (c) A sponsor shall revoke a charter or take other appropriate remedial action, which
251 may include placing the charter school on probationary status for no more than twenty-four
252 months, provided that no more than one designation of probationary status shall be allowed
253 for the duration of the charter contract, at any time if the charter school commits a serious
254 breach of one or more provisions of its charter or on any of the following grounds: failure to
255 meet the performance contract as set forth in its charter, failure to meet generally accepted
256 standards of fiscal management, failure to provide information necessary to confirm
257 compliance with all provisions of the charter and sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349
258 within forty-five days following receipt of written notice requesting such information, or
259 violation of law.
260 (2) The sponsor may place the charter school on probationary status to allow the
261 implementation of a remedial plan, which may require a change of methodology, a change in
262 leadership, or both, after which, if such plan is unsuccessful, the charter may be revoked.
263 (3) At least sixty days before acting to revoke a charter, the sponsor shall notify the
264 governing board of the charter school of the proposed action in writing. The notice shall state
265 the grounds for the proposed action. The school's governing board may request in writing a
266 hearing before the sponsor within two weeks of receiving the notice.
267 (4) The sponsor of a charter school shall establish procedures to conduct
268 administrative hearings upon determination by the sponsor that grounds exist to revoke a

HCS HB 3092 22
269 charter. Final decisions of a sponsor from hearings conducted pursuant to this subsection are
270 subject to an appeal to the state board of education, which shall determine whether the charter
271 shall be revoked.
272 (5) A termination shall be effective only at the conclusion of the school year, unless
273 the sponsor determines that continued operation of the school presents a clear and immediate
274 threat to the health and safety of the children.
275 (6) A charter sponsor shall make available the school accountability report card
276 information as provided under section 160.522 and the results of the academic monitoring
277 required under subsection 3 of this section.
278 9. (1) A sponsor shall take all reasonable steps necessary to confirm that each charter
279 school sponsored by such sponsor is in material compliance and remains in material
280 compliance with all material provisions of the charter and sections 160.400 to 160.425 and
281 167.349. Every charter school shall provide all information necessary to confirm ongoing
282 compliance with all provisions of its charter and sections 160.400 to 160.425 and 167.349 in a
283 timely manner to its sponsor.
284 (2) The sponsor's renewal process of the charter school shall be based on the thorough
285 analysis of a comprehensive body of objective evidence and consider if:
286 (a) The charter school has maintained results on its annual performance report that
287 meet or exceed the district in which the charter school is located based on the performance
288 standards that are applicable to the grade-level configuration of both the charter school and
289 the district in which the charter school is located in three of the last four school years;
290 (b) The charter school is organizationally and fiscally viable determining at a
291 minimum that the school does not have:
292 a. A negative balance in its operating funds;
293 b. A combined balance of less than three percent of the amount expended for such
294 funds during the previous fiscal year; or
295 c. Expenditures that exceed receipts for the most recently completed fiscal year;
296 (c) The charter is in compliance with its legally binding performance contract and
297 sections 160.400 to 160.425 and section 167.349; and
298 (d) The charter school has an annual performance report consistent with a
299 classification of accredited for three of the last four years and is fiscally viable as described in
300 paragraph (b) of this subdivision. If such is the case, the charter school may have an
301 expedited renewal process as defined by rule of the department of elementary and secondary
302 education.
303 (3) (a) Beginning August first during the year in which a charter is considered for
304 renewal, a charter school sponsor shall demonstrate to the state board of education that the
305 charter school is in compliance with federal and state law as provided in sections 160.400 to

HCS HB 3092 23
306 160.425 and section 167.349 and the school's performance contract including but not limited
307 to those requirements specific to academic performance.
308 (b) Along with data reflecting the academic performance standards indicated in
309 paragraph (a) of this subdivision, the sponsor shall submit a revised charter application to the
310 state board of education for review.
311 (c) Using the data requested and the revised charter application under paragraphs (a)
312 and (b) of this subdivision, the state board of education shall determine if compliance with all
313 standards enumerated in this subdivision has been achieved. The state board of education at
314 its next regularly scheduled meeting shall vote on the revised charter application.
315 (d) If a charter school sponsor demonstrates the objectives identified in this
316 subdivision, the state board of education shall renew the school's charter.
317 10. A school district may enter into a lease with a charter school for physical
318 facilities.
319 11. A governing board or a school district employee who has control over personnel
320 actions shall not take unlawful reprisal against another employee at the school district because
321 the employee is directly or indirectly involved in an application to establish a charter school.
322 A governing board or a school district employee shall not take unlawful reprisal against an
323 educational program of the school or the school district because an application to establish a
324 charter school proposes the conversion of all or a portion of the educational program to a
325 charter school. As used in this subsection, "unlawful reprisal" means an action that is taken
326 by a governing board or a school district employee as a direct result of a lawful application to
327 establish a charter school and that is adverse to another employee or an educational program.
328 12. Charter school board members shall be subject to the same liability for acts while
329 in office as if they were regularly and duly elected members of school boards in any other
330 public school district in this state. The governing board of a charter school may participate, to
331 the same extent as a school board, in the Missouri public entity risk management fund in the
332 manner provided under sections 537.700 to 537.756.
333 13. Any entity, either public or private, operating, administering, or otherwise
334 managing a charter school shall be considered a quasi-public governmental body and subject
335 to the provisions of sections 610.010 to 610.035.
336 14. The chief financial officer of a charter school shall maintain:
337 (1) A surety bond in an amount determined by the sponsor to be adequate based on
338 the cash flow of the school; or
339 (2) An insurance policy issued by an insurance company licensed to do business in
340 Missouri on all employees in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars or more that
341 provides coverage in the event of employee theft.

HCS HB 3092 24
342 15. The department of elementary and secondary education shall calculate an annual
343 performance report for each charter school and shall publish it in the same manner as annual
344 performance reports are calculated and published for districts and attendance centers.
345 [16. The joint committee on education shall create a committee to investigate facility
346 access and affordability for charter schools. The committee shall be comprised of equal
347 numbers of the charter school sector and the public school sector and shall report its findings
348 to the general assembly by December 31, 2016.]
167.225. 1. [As used in subsections 1 to 4 of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Braille", the system of reading and writing through touch;
(2) "Student", any student who has an impairment in vision that, even with correction,
adversely affects a child's educational performance and who is determined eligible for special
education services under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.
2. All students shall receive instruction in Braille reading and writing as part of their
individualized education plan unless the individual education program team determines, after
an evaluation of a student's reading and writing skills, needs, and appropriate reading and
writing media, including an evaluation of the student's future needs for instruction in Braille
or the use of Braille, that instruction in Braille or the use of Braille is not appropriate. No
student shall be denied instruction in Braille reading and writing solely because the student
has some remaining vision.
3. Instruction in Braille reading and writing shall be sufficient to enable each student
to communicate effectively and efficiently at a level commensurate with the student's sighted
peers of comparable grade level and intellectual functioning. The student's individualized
education plan shall specify:
(1) How Braille will be implemented as the primary mode for learning through
integration with normal classroom activities. If Braille will not be provided to a child who is
blind, the reason for not incorporating it in the individualized education plan shall be
documented therein;
(2) The date on which Braille instruction will commence;
(3) The level of competency in Braille reading and writing to be achieved by the end
of the period covered by the individualized education plan; and
(4) The duration of each session.
4. As part of the certification process, teachers certified in the education of blind and
visually impaired children shall be required to demonstrate competence in reading and
writing Braille. The department of elementary and secondary education shall adopt
assessment procedures to assess such competencies which are consistent with standards
adopted by the National Library Service for the Blind and Physically Handicapped, Library of
Congress, Washington, D.C.

HCS HB 3092 25
5.] (1) Subsections [5 to 9] 1 to 5 of this section shall be known and may be cited as
the "Blind Students' Rights to Independence, Training, and Education Act" or the "BRITE
Act".
(2) As used in subsections [5 to 9] 1 to 5 of this section, the following terms mean:
(a) "Accessible assistive technology device", an assistive technology device, as
defined in 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended, that provides blind or visually impaired
students the benefits of an educational program in an equally effective and integrated manner
as that provided to nondisabled students;
(b) "Adequate instruction", the quality teaching of blind or visually impaired students,
as it pertains to general education and necessary blindness skills, in alignment with the U.S.
Department of Education's definition of free appropriate public education, as defined in 20
U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended;
(c) "Blind or visually impaired student":
a. A child who:
(i) Has an individualized education program (IEP) or an individualized family service
plan (IFSP), as such terms are defined in 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended, or a 504 plan
created under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794, as
amended; and
(ii) Is identified as having the disability of visual impairment (including blindness)
within the definition of child with a disability in 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as amended; or
b. An individual who is deaf-blind under the federal Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act (IDEA), as amended, or other federal law;
(d) "Braille", the system of reading and writing through touch;
(e) "Expanded core curriculum", a disability-specific curriculum that compensates for
vision loss, is foundational to all other learning, and that covers the nine essential areas of
compensatory access, sensory efficiency, assistive technology, orientation and mobility, social
interaction, recreation and leisure, independent living, self-determination, and career
education;
(f) "Grade level instruction", instruction that aligns with state-designated content
standards and curricula for students of the same age or level of maturity, based on the
development of intellectual, emotional, physical, and behavioral capacity that is typical for
the student's age or age group;
(g) "Local educational agency" or "LEA", the same definition as in 20 U.S.C. Section
1401, as amended;
(h) "Nonvisual access", the ability of a blind or visually impaired student to use all
functions of a device, without using the student's vision, in an equally effective, equally
integrated manner and with equivalent ease of use as the student's sighted peers;

HCS HB 3092 26
(i) "Nonvisual skills", skills that are taught in such a way that the student does not
need to use any vision;
(j) "State educational agency", the same definition as in 20 U.S.C. Section 1401, as
amended;
(k) "Technology-mediated learning environments and methods", the settings in which
electronic and information technology including, but not limited to, the following is used:
a. Computer-based applications and simulations;
b. Personal and mobile computing devices such as smartphones or tablets;
c. Web-based platforms;
d. Online or distance-learning programs;
e. Video games; and
f. Exhibits or installations that feature digital media, wearable technology, or other
tools that support participants' engagement with new knowledge, skills, or practices;
(l) "U.S. Access Board", the independent federal agency created in 1973 that
promotes equality for people with disabilities through leadership in accessible design and the
development of accessibility guidelines and standards.
[6.] 2. (1) Each blind or visually impaired student shall receive instruction in Braille
reading and writing as part of such student's individualized education program (IEP) or
individualized family support plan (IFSP) unless the IEP or IFSP team determines, after an
evaluation of the student's reading and writing skills, needs, and appropriate reading and
writing media including, but not limited to, an evaluation of the student's needs for instruction
in Braille or the use of Braille, that instruction in Braille or the use of Braille is not
appropriate. No blind or visually impaired student shall be denied instruction in Braille
reading and writing solely because the student has some vision. During the evaluation and
IEP process, consideration shall be given regarding appropriate Braille instruction based on a
potential vision loss due to a degenerative medical diagnosis.
(2) In conjunction with the U.S. Department of Education's Braille presumption
requirement in the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), as amended,
instruction in Braille reading and writing shall be sufficient to enable each blind or visually
impaired student to communicate effectively and efficiently at a level commensurate with the
student's same age and with the student's nondisabled peers of comparable intellectual ability.
The blind or visually impaired student's individualized education program (IEP) or
100 individualized family support plan (IFSP) shall specify:
101 (a) The results obtained from an evaluation of the blind or visually impaired student's
102 reading and writing skills, needs, and appropriate reading and writing media including, but
103 not limited to, an evaluation of the blind or visually impaired student's needs for instruction in

HCS HB 3092 27
104 Braille or the use of Braille including, but not limited to, consideration regarding appropriate
105 Braille instruction based on a potential vision loss due to a degenerative medical diagnosis;
106 (b) How Braille will be implemented, if needed as determined by the IEP team, as a
107 primary mode for learning through integration with other classroom activities;
108 (c) The length of the period of instruction and the frequency and duration of each
109 instructional session as determined by the IEP team, which shall, as closely as appropriate
110 based on individual needs, be identical to the level of instruction provided to nondisabled
111 peers; and
112 (d) The level of competency in Braille reading and writing to be achieved by the end
113 of the period.
114 (3) Use, and provision, of Braille materials for reading and writing shall be addressed
115 in 504 plans for blind or visually impaired students created under Section 504 of the federal
116 Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794, as amended.
117 [7.] 3. In conjunction with academic achievement and functional performance
118 requirements of 34 CFR 300.320(a)(2)(i), as amended, instruction in expanded core
119 curriculum shall be provided to blind or visually impaired students to support progress in the
120 general education curriculum.
121 [8.] 4. (1) Each blind or visually impaired student shall receive instruction in
122 assistive technology as part of the student's individualized education program (IEP) or
123 individualized family support plan (IFSP) unless the IEP or IFSP team determines, after an
124 evaluation of a student's needs, that instruction in assistive technology is not appropriate. No
125 student shall be denied instruction in assistive technology solely because the student has some
126 vision.
127 (2) In conjunction with accessible assistive technology requirements of the federal
128 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) in 20 U.S.C. Section 1412(a)(12)(B)(i),
129 as amended, the blind or visually impaired student shall receive grade-level instruction that
130 will equip the blind or visually impaired student with the appropriate technology-mediated
131 learning environments and methods to perform on the same level of proficiency expected of
132 peers of comparable intellectual ability and grade level. The blind or visually impaired
133 student's IEP or IFSP shall specify:
134 (a) The results obtained from an assessment of the blind or visually impaired student's
135 skills, needs, and appropriate accessible assistive technology including, but not limited to, an
136 evaluation of the future needs for accessible assistive technology training or the use of
137 accessible assistive technology;
138 (b) How accessible assistive technology will be implemented as a primary mode for
139 learning through integration with other classroom activities;
140 (c) The frequency and duration of each instructional session;

HCS HB 3092 28
141 (d) The level of mastery of the accessible assistive technology specified by the blind
142 or visually impaired student's assessment to be achieved by the end of the period; and
143 (e) Acknowledgment that either:
144 a. The blind or visually impaired student may transport the accessible assistive
145 technology to and from school without the need for payment, family assumption of liability
146 for loss or damage, or any other cost to the blind or visually impaired student or the family; or
147 b. If the accessible assistive technology remains at school, the LEA will provide
148 duplicate accessible assistive technology in the blind or visually impaired student's home
149 without requiring payment, family assumption of liability for loss or damage, or any other
150 cost to the blind or visually impaired student or the family.
151 (3) Use, and provision, of accessible assistive technology shall be addressed in 504
152 plans for blind or visually impaired students created under Section 504 of the federal
153 Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794, as amended.
154 [9.] 5. (1) Each blind or visually impaired student shall receive instruction in
155 orientation and mobility as part of the student's individualized education program (IEP) or
156 individualized family support plan (IFSP) unless the IEP or IFSP team determines, after an
157 evaluation of a student's needs, that instruction in orientation and mobility is not appropriate.
158 No student shall be denied instruction in orientation and mobility solely because the student
159 has some vision.
160 (2) In conjunction with orientation and mobility services requirements of 34 CFR
161 300.34(c)(7), as amended, blind or visually impaired students shall receive orientation and
162 mobility instruction to equip each blind or visually impaired student with the age-appropriate
163 tools, techniques, and nonvisual skills to navigate in and around the student's home, schools,
164 communities, and other environments as applicable, and as expected of peers of comparable
165 intellectual ability and grade level. The blind or visually impaired student's IEP or IFSP shall
166 specify:
167 (a) The results obtained from an evaluation of the blind or visually impaired student's
168 orientation and mobility needs including, but not limited to, an evaluation of the blind or
169 visually impaired student's future needs for instruction in orientation and mobility;
170 (b) How orientation and mobility will be integrated into the home, school, and
171 community;
172 (c) The date on which orientation and mobility instruction will commence;
173 (d) The frequency and duration of each instructional session; and
174 (e) The level of mastery of orientation and mobility skills to be achieved by the end of
175 the period.

HCS HB 3092 29
176 (3) Orientation and mobility equipment, accommodations, and modifications shall be
177 addressed in 504 plans for blind or visually impaired students created under Section 504 of
178 the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. Section 794, as amended.
179 (4) An orientation and mobility evaluation shall be conducted by a person who is
180 appropriately certified by the National Blindness Professional Certification Board (NBPCB)
181 with a National Orientation and Mobility Certification (NOMC), or through the Academy for
182 Certification of Vision Rehabilitation and Education Professionals (ACVREP) as a Certified
183 Orientation and Mobility Specialist (COMS), or who holds a nationally recognized
184 certification related to orientation and mobility.
185 (5) The orientation and mobility evaluations described in subdivision (4) of this
186 subsection shall occur in familiar and unfamiliar environments, during the daytime and
187 nighttime, and around the home, school, and community as determined age appropriate by the
188 blind or visually impaired student's IEP or IFSP.
189 [10.] 6. (1) As part of the state educational agency's certification and renewal
190 process, educators hired to teach Braille shall be certified teachers of students with visual
191 impairments, hold a current and valid National Certification in Unified English Braille
192 (NCUEB) working under the supervision of a reading specialist, or hold a nationally
193 recognized certification related to Braille instruction.
194 (2) As part of the state educational agency's certification and renewal process,
195 educators hired to teach accessible assistive technology shall be certified teachers of students
196 with visual impairments, hold a valid and current Certified Assistive Technology Instructional
197 Specialist for People with Visual Impairments (CATIS), or hold a valid and current National
198 Certification in Access Technology for the Blind (NCATB) or other nationally recognized
199 certification related to assistive technology instruction for individuals with visual
200 impairments.
201 (3) As part of the state educational agency's certification and renewal process,
202 specialists hired to teach orientation and mobility shall hold a valid and current National
203 Orientation and Mobility Certification (NOMC) or hold a current and valid Certified
204 Orientation and Mobility Specialist (COMS) certification or other nationally recognized
205 certification related to orientation and mobility instruction for individuals with visual
206 impairments.
207 [11.] 7. (1) LEAs shall deliver services to blind or visually impaired students in a
208 manner that at all times abides by requirements of the federal Individuals with Disabilities
209 Education Act (IDEA), Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act, and the Rehabilitation
210 Act of 1973, as amended, including during declared local, state, or national emergencies.

HCS HB 3092 30
211 (2) LEAs shall seek and obtain proof of currently available certified professionals
212 from any company, agency, or individual the LEA intends to contract with for services
213 outlined in subsections [5 to 9] 1 to 5 of this section.
214 (3) LEAs shall not impose any preclusions or limitations on a student to receive
215 instruction in orientation and mobility services in and around the home, school, or community
216 setting including during daytime and nighttime hours.
217 (4) LEAs may require annual written parental consent to conduct effective instruction
218 when such services are provided before or after regular school hours or when such services
219 are provided away from the educational institution or the blind or visually impaired student's
220 residence.
221 (5) If an LEA prohibits an orientation and mobility instructor from using the
222 instructor's preferred mode of transportation to transport blind or visually impaired students to
223 and from outside environments, the LEA shall provide an equally effective transportation
224 alternative for that purpose without cost to the orientation and mobility instructor. If the blind
225 or visually impaired student's family provides transportation for the student, the LEA shall
226 reimburse the expense.
227 [12.] 8. (1) If an LEA requires an eye report, the LEA shall bear all costs associated
228 with obtaining such report. LEAs shall not delay an evaluation for eligibility based on the
229 absence or delay of such report.
230 (2) All electronic and information technology developed, procured, maintained, or
231 used by LEAs shall be compliant with the U.S. Access Board's Section 508 standards, as
232 amended.
233 (3) LEAs shall anticipate the need for nonvisual accessibility and adopt policies and
234 procedures to reduce or eliminate common barriers experienced by blind or visually impaired
235 students, parents, educators, administrators, and other staff.
236 [13. Subsections 1 to 4 of this section shall apply in all school years ending before
237 July 1, 2022. Subsections 5 to 12 of]
238 9. This section shall apply in school year 2022-23 and all subsequent school years.
167.950. 1. (1) By December 31, 2017, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop guidelines for the appropriate screening of students for dyslexia and
related disorders and the necessary classroom support for students with dyslexia and related
disorders. [Such guidelines shall be consistent with the findings and recommendations of the
task force created under section 633.420.]
(2) In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years, each public school, including
each charter school, shall conduct dyslexia screenings for students in the appropriate year
consistent with the guidelines developed by the department of elementary and secondary
education.

HCS HB 3092 31
(3) In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years, the school board of each district
and the governing board of each charter school shall provide reasonable classroom support
consistent with the guidelines developed by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
2. In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years, the practicing teacher assistance
programs established under section 168.400 shall offer and include two hours of in-service
training provided by each local school district for all practicing teachers in such district
regarding dyslexia and related disorders. Each charter school shall also offer all of its
teachers two hours of training on dyslexia and related disorders. Districts and charter schools
may seek assistance from the department of elementary and secondary education in
developing and providing such training. Completion of such training shall count as two
contact hours of professional development under section 168.021.
3. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Dyslexia", a disorder that is neurological in origin, characterized by difficulties
with accurate and fluent word recognition and poor spelling and decoding abilities that
typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of language, often unexpected in
relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom instruction, and of
which secondary consequences may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced
reading experience that can impede growth of vocabulary and background knowledge.
Nothing in this definition shall require a student with dyslexia to obtain an individualized
education program (IEP) unless the student has otherwise met the federal conditions
necessary;
(2) "Dyslexia screening", a short test conducted by a teacher or school counselor to
determine whether a student likely has dyslexia or a related disorder in which a positive result
does not represent a medical diagnosis but indicates that the student could benefit from
approved support;
(3) "Related disorders", disorders similar to or related to dyslexia, such as
developmental auditory imperception, dysphasia, specific developmental dyslexia,
developmental dysgraphia, and developmental spelling disability;
(4) "Support", low-cost and effective best practices, such as oral examinations and
extended test-taking periods, used to support students who have dyslexia or any related
disorder.
4. The state board of education shall promulgate rules and regulations for each public
school to screen students for dyslexia and related disorders and to provide the necessary
classroom support for students with dyslexia and related disorders. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the

HCS HB 3092 32
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2016, shall be invalid and void.
5. Nothing in this section shall require the MO HealthNet program to expand the
services that it provides.
173.2510. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "15 to Finish Act".
2. The coordinating board for higher education, in cooperation with public
institutions of higher education in this state, shall develop policies that promote the on-time
completion of degree programs by students. The policies shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Defining on-time completion for specific levels of postsecondary credentials;
(2) Providing financial incentives to students during their senior year of
undergraduate study who are on pace to graduate in no more than eight semesters; and
(3) Reducing, when feasible and permitted by accreditation or occupational licensure,
the number of credit hours required to earn a degree.
[3. By December 1, 2017, the department of higher education and workforce
development shall provide a report to the governor and the general assembly describing the
actions taken to implement these provisions.]
178.697. 1. Funding for sections 178.691 to 178.699 shall be made available
pursuant to section 163.031 and shall be subject to appropriations made for this purpose.
2. Costs of contractual arrangements shall be the obligation of the school district of
residence of each preschool child. Costs of contractual arrangements shall not exceed an
amount equal to an amount reimbursable to the school districts under the provisions of
sections 178.691 to 178.699.
3. Payments for participants for programs outlined in section 178.693 shall be
uniform for all districts or public agencies.
[4. Families with children under the age of kindergarten entry shall be eligible to
receive annual development screenings and parents shall be eligible to receive prenatal visits
under sections 178.691 to 178.699. Priority for service delivery of approved parent education
programs under sections 178.691 to 178.699, which includes, but is not limited to, home
visits, group meetings, screenings, and service referrals, shall be given to high-needs families
in accordance with criteria set forth by the department of elementary and secondary
education. Local school districts may establish cost sharing strategies to supplement funding
for such program services. The provisions of this subsection shall expire on December 31,
2015, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly.]

HCS HB 3092 33
184.350. 1. Whenever qualified voters representing five percent of the votes cast at
the last preceding election for governor in any constitutional charter city not located within a
county and qualified voters representing five percent of the votes cast at the last preceding
election for governor in a constitutional charter county adjoining such city shall file verified
petitions for the establishment of a metropolitan zoological park and museum district,
comprising a zoological subdistrict, and art museum subdistrict or a St. Louis Science Center
subdistrict with the respective election officials of such city and county, respectively,
requesting such election officials to submit a proposition for the establishment of a
metropolitan zoological park and museum district comprised of a zoological subdistrict, and
art museum subdistrict and a St. Louis Science Center subdistrict at the next general or
primary election for the election of state officers or special election for the submission of such
proposition, such election officials shall communicate to their corresponding counterparts and
the chief executive officers of the respective city and county the fact a verified petition has
been filed. At such time that both election officials have received the verified petitions
described above, then such officials shall submit the above described proposition or
propositions to the qualified voters of such city and county at the next general or primary
election for the election of state officers or special election. Such election officials shall give
legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general or primary election or special election in
at least two newspapers that such proposition or propositions shall be submitted at the next
general or primary election or special election held for submission of this proposition.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:
Shall there be established a Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District
comprising the City of ______ and the County of ______ which district shall consist of
all or any one of the following subdistricts:
a. Zoological Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on each $100 of
assessed valuation of all taxable property within the district.
FOR AGAINST
b. Art Museum Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on each $100 of
assessed valuation of taxable property within the district.
FOR AGAINST
c. St. Louis Science Center Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of one cent on each
$100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district.
FOR AGAINST
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such propositions in such city
and the majority of voters voting on such propositions in such county at said election cast
votes "FOR" one or more of the propositions, then the district shall be deemed established

HCS HB 3092 34
and the tax rate, as established by the board, for such subdistrict shall be deemed in full force
and effect as of the first day of the year following the year of said election. The results of the
aforesaid election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county,
respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and county not less than
thirty days after the day of election. In the event one or more of the propositions shall fail to
receive a majority of the votes "FOR" in either the city or the county, then such proposition
shall not be resubmitted at any election held within one year of the date of the election the
proposition was rejected. Any such resubmissions of one or more of such propositions shall
substantially comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382.
4. All costs of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
184.351. 1. The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
district, as established pursuant to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382, on
behalf of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or
part of such district to submit a proposition to increase the maximum tax rate for the St. Louis
Science Center subdistrict set in section 184.350, to the qualified voters of such district at any
general or primary or special election. Such election officials shall give legal notice as
provided in chapter 115.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:
Shall the Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of ______ and County of ___
___ be authorized to increase the St. Louis Science Center Subdistrict to a tax rate not in
excess of six cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the
district for the purpose of operating, maintaining and otherwise financially supporting
the subdistrict? The tax rate shall be set annually by the board based on the budget
submitted by the St. Louis Science Center and approved by the board. This rate shall
replace the present tax rate of ______ cent for the St. Louis Science Center Subdistrict.
YES NO
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in such city and
the majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county at such election cast votes
"YES" for the proposition, then the tax rate for such subdistrict shall be deemed in full force
and effect as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the
aforesaid election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county,
respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and county not less than
thirty days after the day on which such election was held. All costs of the election shall be
paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to
receive a majority of the votes "YES" in either the city or the county, then such proposition

HCS HB 3092 35
shall not be resubmitted at any election held within one year of the date of the election at
which such proposition was rejected.
184.352. The following terms whenever used or referred to in sections 184.350 to
[184.384] 184.382shall unless a different intent clearly appears from the context be construed
to have the following meaning:
(1) "African-American history museum and cultural subdistrict" shall consist of a
political subdistrict which shall provide for the collection, preservation, and exhibition of
items relating to the history and culture of African-Americans, more specifically for
interpretation through core exhibits that may include wax sculptures, photographs, paintings,
and other artistic expressions; and further for the collection of costumes, archaeological
anthropological material, artifacts, and memorabilia; and for the maintenance of archives,
including manuscripts, personal records, and other material that relates to the African-
American experience to American history; and to provide for the preservation of American
music traditions, including ragtime, jazz, blues, and gospel; and to provide technical
assistance and advisory service for historic research or which may contract with another
person with the capability of providing such services;
(2) "Art museum subdistrict" shall consist of such institutions and places for the
purpose of collection and exhibition of pictures, statuary and other works of art and whatever
else may be of artistic interest and appropriate for exhibition in an art gallery or museum for
instruction in art and in general for the promotion by all proper means of aesthetic or artistic
education;
(3) "Board", the governing body of the metropolitan zoological park and museum
district;
(4) "Botanical garden subdistrict" shall consist of a political subdistrict which shall
provide for the collection and exhibition of displays of things relating to plants or botany, for
the promotion of plant life and related subjects, educational and research activities, for the
maintenance of a botanical library, and for the promotion by all proper means of public
interest in plant life and botany; or which may contract with another person with the
capability of providing such services;
(5) "City", a constitutional charter city not located within a county;
(6) "Commission", the governing body of each of the respective subdistricts as may
be authorized as provided in section 184.350, 184.351, or 184.353;
(7) "County", a constitutional charter county adjoining a constitutional charter city;
(8) "District", the metropolitan zoological park and museum district;
(9) "Missouri history museum subdistrict" shall consist of a political subdistrict
which shall provide for the collection, preservation, and exhibition of items relating to the
history of the entire state of Missouri and of the Louisiana Purchase Territory, and more

HCS HB 3092 36
specifically for the collection and display of photographs, paintings, costumes, archaeological
and anthropological material, artifacts and memorabilia pertaining to the political,
commercial and cultural history of the region, including extensive artifacts, memorabilia,
historical documents concerning the first solo transatlantic flight, for the promotion of
archaeological and historical studies, for the maintenance of a history library and archives,
including manuscripts documenting the first United States-sponsored exploratory expedition
of the Louisiana Purchase Territory as well as papers of the president who authorized the
Louisiana Purchase, and for the promotion by all proper means of public interest in the
history of Missouri and the region in which it is located, and, as otherwise provided by law
and in cooperation with the department of natural resources of the state of Missouri, to
provide technical assistance and advisory services for the collection, preservation, and
exhibition of recordings, instruments, and memorabilia of ragtime, jazz and blues music
including ragtime pianos and ragtime piano sheet music to be housed and maintained at the
Scott Joplin house state historic site; or which may contract with another person having all of
the historical materials listed herein as well as the capability of providing all of the services
listed herein;
(10) "Recreation and amateur sports subdistrict" shall consist of a political subdistrict
which shall provide for and assist in the planning, development, financing, maintenance,
improvement and construction of facilities and venues to be publicly owned and operated by
political subdivisions, public school districts, universities and colleges, or not-for-profit
corporations chartered to attract, promote and manage major national and international
amateur sports events, competitions and programs for the use of the general public. Such
subdistrict shall structure its procedures for procuring supplies, services and construction to
achieve the result that a minimum of twenty percent in the aggregate of the total dollar value
of annual procurements is made directly or indirectly from certified socially and
economically disadvantaged small business concerns;
(11) "St. Louis Science Center subdistrict" shall consist of such institutions and
places for the purpose of collection and exhibition of displays of items of natural historical,
industrial, transport and scientific interest, the instruction and recreation of the people, for the
promotion of the study of science, industrial, transport and natural history and kindred
subjects and for the promotion by all proper means of public interest in natural history,
transport, industry and science;
(12) "Special election", an election held on the first Tuesday of April or whenever
propositions are submitted to the voters of the whole district;
(13) "Symphony orchestra subdistrict" shall consist of a political subdistrict which
shall provide for regular performances of a symphony orchestra with not less than ninety full-
time symphonic musicians, own its own concert hall in which a substantial number of its

HCS HB 3092 37
concerts shall be held, and provide for the promotion by all proper means of public interest in
music; or which may contract with another person with the capability of providing such
services and which owns it own concert hall;
(14) "Transport museum subdistrict" shall consist of a political subdistrict which shall
provide for institutions and places for the edification of the public in the history and science
of transportation, communications and powering, and more specifically for the preservation
and display of artifacts related to man's efforts to transport materials, people, and ideas and to
create, transmit, and utilize power, and for the provision of a library of publications and other
records containing history and technology related to transportation, communications and
powering, and facilities for the study of such efforts; or which may contract with another
person with the capability of providing such services;
(15) "Zoological subdistrict" shall consist of such institutions and places for the
collection and exhibition of animals and animal life, for the instruction and recreation of the
people, for the promotion of zoology and kindred subjects, for the encouragement of
zoological study and research and for the increase of public interest in wild animals and in the
protection of wild animal life.
184.353. 1. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and
museum district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
184.382, on behalf of the district may request the election officials of any city and county
containing all or part of such district to submit the following described proposition to the
qualified voters of such district at any general, primary or special election. Such election
officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or special
election in at least two newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any general,
primary or special election held for submission of the proposition.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:
Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of
______ and County of ______ be authorized to provide for a Botanical
Garden Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the Botanical Garden
Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on each $100 of
assessed valuation of taxable property within the district?
YES NO
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
proposition, then the botanical garden subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax rate,
as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and effect as of
the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the election shall be

HCS HB 3092 38
certified by the election officials of such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief
executive officers of such city and county not less than thirty days after the day of the
election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in either the
city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any election held prior to
the next general or primary election in such city or county in the following year. Any such
resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
184.382.
(4) If the botanical garden subdistrict shall be established, then its commissioners, or
any person with whom its commissioners contract, may establish and charge fees for
admission to the premises of the botanical garden subdistrict, or to the premises of any person
with whom its commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults and fifty cents for
children under sixteen years of age. Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to
implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of the metropolitan zoological park
and museum district of which the botanical garden subdistrict is a member.
2. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382,
on behalf of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all
or part of such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of
such district at any general, primary or special election. Such election officials shall give
legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or special election in at least two
newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary or special
election held for submission of the proposition.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:
Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of
______ and County of ______ be authorized to provide for a Transport
Museum Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the Transport Museum
Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on each $100 of
assessed valuation of taxable property within the district?
YES NO
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
proposition, then the transport museum subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax
rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and effect
as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the election shall
be certified by the election officials of such city and county, respectively, to the respective

HCS HB 3092 39
chief executive officers of such city and county not less than thirty days after the day of the
election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in either the
city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any election held prior to
the next general or primary election in such city or county in the following year. Any such
resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
184.382.
(4) If the transport museum subdistrict shall be established, then its commissioners, or
any person with whom its commissioners contract, may establish and charge fees for
admission to the premises of the transport museum subdistrict, or to the premises of any
person with whom its commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults and fifty
cents for children under sixteen years of age. Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior
to implementation for approval or disapproval to the board of the metropolitan zoological
park and museum district of which the transport museum subdistrict is a member.
3. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382,
on behalf of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all
or part of such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of
such district at any general, primary or special election. Such election officials shall give
legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or special election in at least two
newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary or special
election held for submission of the proposition.
(2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:
Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of
______ and the County of ______ be authorized to provide for a Missouri
History Museum Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the Missouri
History Museum Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on
each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district?
YES NO
(3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
proposition, then the Missouri history museum subdistrict shall be deemed established and the
tax rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and
effect as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the
election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county, respectively, to the
respective chief executive officers of such city and county not less than thirty days after the

HCS HB 3092 40
day of the election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and
115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in
either the city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any election held
prior to the next general or primary or special election in such city or county in the following
100 year. Any such resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of sections
101 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382.
102 4. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
103 district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to 184.354, on behalf
104 of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or part of
105 such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of such
106 district at any general, primary or special election. Such election officials shall give legal
107 notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or special election in at least two
108 newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary or special
109 election held for submission of the proposition.
110 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following
111 form at such election:
112 Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of
113 ______ and County of ______ be authorized to provide for a Symphony
114 Orchestra Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the Symphony Orchestra
115 Subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on each $100 of
116 assessed valuation of taxable property within the district?
117 YES NO
118 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
119 and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
120 proposition, then the symphony orchestra subdistrict shall be deemed established and the tax
121 rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force and effect
122 as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the election shall
123 be certified by the election officials of such city and county not less than thirty days after the
124 day of election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and
125 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in
126 either the city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted at any election held
127 prior to the next general or primary in such city or county in the following year. Any such
128 resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384]
129 184.382.
130 (4) If the symphony orchestra subdistrict shall be established, then its commissioners,
131 or any person with whom its commissioners contract, may charge such prices from time to
132 time for tickets for performances conducted under the auspices of the subdistrict or as they or

HCS HB 3092 41
133 such person deem proper; provided, however, that no fewer than fifty tickets for each such
134 performance conducted at the principal concert hall of such subdistrict or such person shall be
135 made available without charge for distribution to members of the general public and no fewer
136 than fifty tickets shall be made available without charge for distribution to students in public
137 and private elementary, secondary schools and colleges and universities in the metropolitan
138 zoological park and museum district and all performances of the symphony orchestra
139 conducted at the principal concert hall of the symphony orchestra within the district shall be
140 offered for broadcast live on a public or commercial AM or FM radio station located in and
141 generally receivable in the district or on a public or commercial broadcast television station
142 located in or generally receivable in the district. The symphony orchestra subdistrict shall
143 institute a fully staffed educational music appreciation program to benefit all of the citizens of
144 the taxing district at a nominal charge.
145 (5) Immediately following the effective date of the symphony orchestra subdistrict
146 tax rate any person receiving funds from said tax rate shall become ineligible for program
147 assistance funding from the Missouri state council on the arts.
148 5. The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum district, as
149 established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382, on behalf of
150 the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all or part of
151 such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of such
152 district at any general, primary or special election. Such election officials shall give legal
153 notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or special election in at least two
154 newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary or special
155 election held for submission of the proposition. Such proposition shall be submitted to the
156 voters in substantially the following form at such election:
157 Shall a Recreational and Amateur Sports Subdistrict be authorized and
158 provided for by the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of
159 the City of ______ and the County of ______ and such subdistrict be
160 authorized to establish a tax rate not in excess of four cents on each $100 of
161 assessed valuation of taxable property within the district for a period not to
162 exceed nine years?
163 YES NO
164
165 In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city and a
166 majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
167 proposition, then the recreation and amateur sports subdistrict shall be deemed established
168 and the tax rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be deemed in full force
169 and effect as of the first day of the second month following the election for a period not to

HCS HB 3092 42
170 exceed nine years. The results of the election shall be certified by the election officials of
171 such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and
172 county not less than thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the election shall be
173 paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to
174 receive a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition
175 shall not be resubmitted at any election held prior to the next general or primary or special
176 election in such city or county in the following year. Any such resubmission shall
177 subsequently comply with the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382.
178 6. (1) The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
179 district, as established according to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382,
180 on behalf of the district may request the election officials of any city and county containing all
181 or part of such district to submit the following described proposition to the qualified voters of
182 such district at any general, primary or special election. Such election officials shall give
183 legal notice at least sixty days prior to such general, primary or special election in at least two
184 newspapers that such proposition shall be submitted at any general, primary or special
185 election held for submission of the proposition.
186 (2) Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following
187 form at such election:
188 Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of ______ and
189 County of ______ be authorized to provide for an African-American History Museum
190 and Cultural Subdistrict and be authorized to provide the African-American history
191 museum and cultural subdistrict with a tax rate not in excess of four cents on each $100
192 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district?
193 YES NO
194 (3) In the event that a majority of all the voters voting on such proposition in such city
195 and a majority of voters voting on such proposition in such county cast "YES" votes on the
196 proposition, then the African-American history museum and cultural subdistrict shall be
197 deemed established and the tax rate, as established by the board for such subdistrict, shall be
198 deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the second month following the election.
199 The results of the election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county,
200 respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and county not less than
201 thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the election shall be paid as provided by
202 sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the proposition shall fail to receive a majority of
203 the "YES" votes in either the city or the county, then the proposition shall not be resubmitted
204 at any election held prior to the next general or primary election in such city or county in the
205 following year. Any such resubmission shall subsequently comply with the provisions of
206 sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382.

HCS HB 3092 43
207 (4) If the African-American history museum and cultural subdistrict shall be
208 established, then its commissioners, or any person with whom its commissioners contract,
209 may establish and charge fees for admission to the premises of the African-American history
210 museum and cultural subdistrict, or to the premises of any person with whom its
211 commissioners contract, not to exceed one dollar for adults and fifty cents for children under
212 sixteen years of age. Any increase in the fees shall be presented prior to implementation for
213 approval or disapproval to the board of the metropolitan zoological park and museum district
214 of which the African-American history museum and cultural subdistrict is a member.
184.355. 1. Any special purpose subdistrict formed under the provisions of sections
184.350 to [184.384] 184.382 after July 1, 1981, may be dissolved in the following manner:
Upon the filing with the governing body of the subdistrict of a petition containing the
signatures of qualified voters representing eight percent of the votes cast at the last preceding
election for governor of any constitutional charter city not located within a county and
qualified voters representing eight percent of the votes cast at the last preceding election for
governor of a constitutional charter county adjoining such city, the governing body shall
submit the proposition to the voters in the subdistrict using the same procedure and in the
same manner so far as practicable as is provided for the submission of the question for
forming the subdistrict. Separate petitions shall be filed for each subdistrict sought to be
dissolved.
2. Such proposition or propositions shall be submitted to the voters in substantially
the following form at such election:
Shall the ______ Subdistrict of the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District
comprising the City of ______ and the County of ______ be dissolved?
YES NO
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition or propositions
in such city and the majority of voters voting on such proposition or propositions in such
county at such election cast "YES" votes on any such proposition or propositions, then the
subdistrict shall be deemed dissolved. The results of the aforesaid election shall be certified
by the election officials of such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief executive
officers of such city and county not less than thirty days after the day on which such election
was held. The cost of such election shall be borne by the city and county, respectively, as
provided by law.
4. Dissolution of a subdistrict shall be carried out in the manner prescribed by section
67.955.
184.357. 1. The board of directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum
district as established pursuant to the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382, on
behalf of the district, may request the election officials of any city and county of such district

HCS HB 3092 44
to submit a proposition or propositions to increase the tax rate for the zoological park
subdistrict and the art museum subdistrict set in section 184.350 and to increase the rate for
the botanical garden subdistrict set in section 184.353 to the qualified voters of such district at
any general, primary or special election. Such election officials, upon receipt of such request
in the form of a verified resolution or resolutions approved by the majority of the members of
such district board of directors, shall set the date of such election and give notice of such
election as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065.
2. Such proposition or propositions shall be jointly or severally submitted to the
voters in substantially the following form at such election:
(1) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of ______
and County of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for the zoological park
subdistrict up to the maximum tax rate of eight cents, or any percent thereof, on each
$100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district for the purpose of
operating, maintaining and otherwise financially supporting the subdistrict? The tax rate
shall be set annually by the board based on the budget submitted by the zoological park
subdistrict and approved by the board. This tax rate shall replace the present tax rate of _
_____ cents for the zoological park subdistrict.
YES NO
(2) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of ______
and County of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for the art museum
subdistrict up to the maximum tax rate of eight cents, or any percent thereof, on each
$100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district for the purpose of
operating, maintaining and otherwise financially supporting the subdistrict and approved
by the board? The tax rate shall be set annually by the board based on the budget
submitted by the art museum subdistrict and approved by the board. This tax rate shall
replace the present tax rate of ______ cents for the art museum subdistrict.
YES NO
(3) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of ______
and County of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for the botanical garden
subdistrict up to the maximum tax rate of six cents, or any percent thereof, on each $100
of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district for the purpose of operating,
maintaining and otherwise financially supporting the subdistrict and approved by the
board? The tax rate shall be set annually by the board based on the budget submitted by
the botanical garden subdistrict and approved by the board. This tax rate shall replace the
present tax rate of ______ cents for the botanical garden subdistrict.
YES NO

HCS HB 3092 45
(4) Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of ______
and County of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for the Missouri history
museum subdistrict up to the maximum tax rate of six cents, or any percent thereof, on
each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the district for the purpose of
operating, maintaining, and otherwise financially supporting the subdistrict and
approved by the board? The tax rate shall be set annually by the board based on the
budget submitted by the Missouri history museum subdistrict and approved by the board.
This tax rate shall replace the present tax rate of ______ cents for the Missouri history
museum subdistrict.
YES NO

In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition or propositions in such
city and the majority of the voters voting on such proposition or propositions in such county
cast votes "YES" on the proposition or propositions, then the tax rate for such subdistrict shall
be deemed in full force and effect as of the first day of the second month following the
election. The results of the aforesaid election shall be certified by the election officials of
such city and county, respectively, to the respective chief executive officers of such city and
county not less than thirty days after the day on which such election was held. The cost of the
election shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event the
proposition or propositions shall fail to receive a majority of the votes "YES" in either the city
or the county, then the proposition or propositions shall not be resubmitted at any election
held within one year of the date of the election the proposition or propositions were rejected.
184.359. 1. Notwithstanding any of the provisions of chapter 137, the board of
directors of any metropolitan zoological park and museum district, as established according to
the provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382, on behalf of such district, may
request the election officials of any city and county containing all or part of such district to
submit to the qualified voters of such district at any municipal, special, primary or general
election or elections a referendum or referendums to permit or restore, in part, or, in whole,
the tax rate or rates authorized for any subdistrict of such district from time to time under the
provisions of sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382.
2. Such proposal or proposals shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the
following form at such election or elections:
Shall the Metropolitan Zoological Park and Museum District of the City of ______ and
the County of ______ be authorized to increase the tax rate for the ______ Subdistrict to
______ cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable property within the District?
This tax rate shall replace the present tax rate of ______ for the ______ Subdistrict.

HCS HB 3092 46
YES NO
3. The proposed tax rate shall not exceed the maximum tax rate authorized by the
voters from time to time pursuant to sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382, prior to reduction
or reductions in such rate following any reassessment pursuant to chapter 137.
4. In the event that a majority of the voters voting thereon in such city and a majority
of the voters voting thereon in such county cast votes in favor of the proposal or proposals,
then the tax rate or rates for such subdistrict or subdistricts shall be deemed in full force and
effect as of the first day of the second month following the election. The results of the
election shall be certified by the election officials of such city and county, respectively, to
such district not less than thirty days after the day of the election. The cost of the election
shall be paid as provided by sections 115.063 and 115.065. In the event any proposal shall
fail to receive a majority of the "YES" votes in either the city or the county, then such
proposal shall not be resubmitted at any election held within one year of the date of the
election on which such proposal was rejected.
5. Such proposal or proposals to the qualified voters of the district may be submitted
by a verified resolution of the district board of directors to the respective election officials of
the city and county wherein the district is located.
184.362. The use and enjoyment of such institutions and places, museums and parks
of any and all of the subdistricts established under sections 184.350 to [184.384] 184.382
shall be forever free and open to the public at such times as may be provided by the
reasonable rules and regulations adopted by the respective commissions in order to render the
use of the said subdistrict's facilities of the greatest benefit and efficiently to the greatest
number. The respective commissions may exclude from the use of the said facilities any and
all persons who willfully violate such rules. In addition said commission shall make and
adopt such bylaws, rules and regulations for its own guidance and for the election of its
members and for the administration of the subdistrict as it may deem expedient and as may
not be inconsistent with the provisions of the law. The respective commissions may contract
for, or exact, a charge from any person in connection with the use, enjoyment, purchase,
license or lease of any property, facility, activity, exhibit, function, or personnel of the
respective subdistricts. Said commission shall have exclusive control of the expenditures of
all moneys collected by the district to the credit of the subdistrict's fund. The commission of
any subdistrict established by the voters under the authority of section 184.350 shall have
exclusive control of the construction and maintenance of any subdistrict buildings built or
maintained in whole or in part with moneys of said fund and of the supervision, care and
custody of the grounds, rooms or buildings constructed, leased or set apart for the purposes of
the subdistrict under the authority conferred in this law. The commission of any subdistrict

HCS HB 3092 47
established by the voters under the authority of section 184.350 shall have the power to
appoint a director and necessary assistants, to fix their compensation and shall also have
power to remove such appointees. All employees, appointees and officers of publicly owned
and operated museums and zoological parks shall on the establishment of a subdistrict related
thereto become employees of the subdistrict and such appointees' and employees' seniority,
pension, salaries, wages and fringe benefits shall be equal to or better than that existing at the
time of the establishment of the subdistrict insofar as may be possible. The respective
commissions shall whenever the need arises transmit to the district a complete survey and
report of the subdistrict's need for construction, reconstruction and repair of improvements,
buildings and other facilities and shall include all information and data necessary for the
purpose of ascertaining the cost of such improvements and shall further certify to the district
the need for incurring additional indebtedness as provided in sections 184.364 to 184.376
herein.
191.211. State expenditures for new programs and initiatives enacted by sections
[103.178,] 143.999, 188.230, 191.231, 191.825 to 191.839, 208.177, 208.178, 208.179 and
208.181, 211.490, 285.240, 337.093, 374.126, 376.891 to 376.894, 431.064, 660.016,
660.017 and 660.018, and the state expenditures for the new initiatives and expansion of
programs enacted by revising sections 105.711 and 105.721, 191.520, 191.600, 198.090,
208.151, 208.152 and 208.215, as provided by H.B. 564, 1993, shall be funded exclusively by
federal funds and the funding sources established in sections 149.011, 149.015, 149.035,
149.061, 149.065, 149.160, 149.170, 149.180, 149.190 and 149.192, and no future general
revenue shall be appropriated to fund such new programs or expansions.
191.828. 1. The following departments shall conduct on-going evaluations of the
effect of the initiatives enacted by the following sections:
(1) The department of commerce and insurance shall evaluate the effect of revising
section 376.782 and sections 143.999, 208.178, 374.126, and 376.891 to 376.894;
(2) The department of health and senior services shall evaluate the effect of revising
sections 105.711 and 191.600 and enacting section 191.411, and sections 167.600 to 167.621,
191.231, 208.177, 431.064, and 660.016. In collaboration with the state board of registration
for the healing arts, the state board of nursing, and the state board of pharmacy, the
department of health and senior services shall also evaluate the effect of revising section
195.070, section 334.100, and section 335.016, and of sections 334.104 and 334.112, and
section 338.095 and 338.198;
(3) The department of social services shall evaluate the effect of revising section
198.090, and sections 208.151, 208.152 and 208.215, and section 383.125, and of sections
167.600 to 167.621, 208.177, 208.178, 208.179, 208.181, and 211.490;

HCS HB 3092 48
(4) The office of administration shall evaluate the effect of revising sections 105.711
and 105.721;
(5) [The Missouri consolidated health care plan shall evaluate the effect of section
103.178; and
(6)] The department of mental health shall evaluate the effect of section 191.831 as it
relates to substance abuse treatment and of section 191.835.
2. The department of revenue and office of administration shall make biannual reports
to the general assembly and the governor concerning the income received into the health
initiatives fund and the level of funding required to operate the programs and initiatives
funded by the health initiatives fund at an optimal level.
191.831. 1. There is hereby established in the state treasury a "Health Initiatives
Fund", to which shall be deposited all revenues designated for the fund under subsection 8 of
section 149.015, and subsection 3 of section 149.160, and section 167.609, and all other funds
donated to the fund or otherwise deposited pursuant to law. The state treasurer shall
administer the fund. Money in the fund shall be appropriated to provide funding for
implementing the new programs and initiatives established by sections 105.711 and 105.721.
The moneys in the fund may further be used to fund those programs established by sections
191.411 and 191.600, sections 208.151 and 208.152, and sections [103.178,] 143.999,
167.600 to 167.621, 188.230, 191.211, 191.231, 191.825 to 191.839, 192.013, 208.177,
208.178, 208.179 and 208.181, 211.490, 285.240, 337.093, 374.126, 376.891 to 376.894,
431.064, 660.016, 660.017 and 660.018; in addition, not less than fifteen percent of the
proceeds deposited to the health initiative fund pursuant to sections 149.015 and 149.160
shall be appropriated annually to provide funding for the C-STAR substance abuse
rehabilitation program of the department of mental health, or its successor program, and a C-
STAR pilot project developed by the director of the division of alcohol and drug abuse and
the director of the department of corrections as an alternative to incarceration, as provided in
subsections 2, 3, and 4 of this section. Such pilot project shall be known as the "Alt-care"
program. In addition, some of the proceeds deposited to the health initiatives fund pursuant to
sections 149.015 and 149.160 shall be appropriated annually to the division of alcohol and
drug abuse of the department of mental health to be used for the administration and oversight
of the substance abuse traffic offender program defined in section 302.010. The provisions of
section 33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding, money in the health initiatives fund shall not
be transferred at the close of the biennium to the general revenue fund.
2. The director of the division of alcohol and drug abuse and the director of the
department of corrections shall develop and administer a pilot project to provide a
comprehensive substance abuse treatment and rehabilitation program as an alternative to
incarceration, hereinafter referred to as "Alt-care". Alt-care shall be funded using money

HCS HB 3092 49
provided under subsection 1 of this section through the Missouri Medicaid program, the C-
STAR program of the department of mental health, and the division of alcohol and drug
abuse's purchase-of-service system. Alt-care shall offer a flexible combination of clinical
services and living arrangements individually adapted to each client and her children. Alt-
care shall consist of the following components:
(1) Assessment and treatment planning;
(2) Community support to provide continuity, monitoring of progress and access to
services and resources;
(3) Counseling from individual to family therapy;
(4) Day treatment services which include accessibility seven days per week,
transportation to and from the Alt-care program, weekly drug testing, leisure activities,
weekly events for families and companions, job and education preparedness training, peer
support and self-help and daily living skills; and
(5) Living arrangement options which are permanent, substance-free and conducive
to treatment and recovery.
3. Any female who is pregnant or is the custodial parent of a child or children under
the age of twelve years, and who has pleaded guilty to or found guilty of violating the
provisions of chapter 195, and whose controlled substance abuse was a precipitating or
contributing factor in the commission of the offense, and who is placed on probation may be
required, as a condition of probation, to participate in Alt-care, if space is available in the
pilot project area. Determinations of eligibility for the program, placement, and continued
participation shall be made by the division of alcohol and drug abuse, in consultation with the
department of corrections.
4. The availability of space in Alt-care shall be determined by the director of the
division of alcohol and drug abuse in conjunction with the director of the department of
corrections. If the sentencing court is advised that there is no space available, the court shall
consider other authorized dispositions.
208.244. [1. Beginning January 1, 2016, the waiver of the work requirement for the
supplemental nutrition assistance program under 7 U.S.C. Section 2015(o) shall no longer
apply to individuals seeking benefits in this state. The provisions of this subsection shall
terminate on January 1, 2019.
2.] Any ongoing savings resulting from a reduction in state expenditures due to
modification of the supplemental nutrition assistance program under this section or the
temporary assistance for needy families program under sections 208.026 and 208.040
effective on August 28, 2015, subject to appropriations, shall be used to provide child care
assistance for single parent households, education assistance, transportation assistance, and

HCS HB 3092 50
job training for individuals receiving benefits under such programs as allowable under
applicable state and federal law.
[3. The department shall make an annual report to the joint committee on government
accountability on the progress of implementation of sections 208.026 and 208.040, including
information on enrollment, demographics, work participation, and changes to specific
policies. The joint committee shall meet at least once a year to review the department's report
and shall make recommendations to the president pro tempore of the senate and the speaker of
the house of representatives.]
208.471. 1. The department of social services shall make payments to those hospitals
which have a Medicaid provider agreement with the department.
2. In each state fiscal year, the amount of federal reimbursement allowance levied
under sections 208.450 to [208.482] 208.480 shall not exceed forty-five percent of the total
payments to hospitals from the federal reimbursement allowance fund and associated federal
match, including payments made to hospitals from state-contracted managed care
organizations that are attributed to the federal reimbursement allowance fund and
associated federal match. By October first of each subsequent state fiscal year, the
department shall report this calculation and the underlying data supporting the calculation to
the budget committee of the house of representatives and the appropriations committee of the
senate. The underlying data shall include the amount of federal reimbursement allowance
assessment levied on the hospitals and the total amount of Medicaid payments to hospitals
funded by the federal reimbursement allowance, including payments made to hospitals from
all state-contracted managed care organizations in aggregate. Payments made by the
department to hospitals and payments made, in aggregate, by all state-contracted managed
care organizations to hospitals shall be reported separately. Expenditures reported by the
department and all state-contracted managed care organizations in aggregate shall be broken
down by fund source, inpatient or outpatient category of service, and individual hospital. In
addition, the department shall separately and concurrently disclose the amount of hospital
payments made by the department and the amount of hospital payments made by each of the
managed care plans, with the payment data broken down by plan, fund source, inpatient or
outpatient category of service, and individual hospital, to the hospitals receiving such
payments specific to that hospital or to an organization designated by such hospitals to
receive such data and as otherwise authorized or required by law. Such payment data shall
otherwise be regarded as proprietary and confidential under subdivision (15) of section
610.021.
217.151. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Extraordinary circumstance", a substantial flight risk or some other extraordinary
medical or security circumstance that dictates restraints be used to ensure the safety and

HCS HB 3092 51
security of a pregnant offender in her third trimester, a postpartum offender forty-eight hours
postdelivery, the staff of the correctional center or medical facility, other offenders, or the
public;
(2) "Labor", the period of time before a birth during which contractions are present;
(3) "Postpartum", the period of recovery immediately following childbirth, which is
six weeks for a vaginal birth or eight weeks for a cesarean birth, or longer if so determined by
a physician or nurse;
(4) "Restraints", any physical restraint or other device used to control the movement
of a person's body or limbs.
2. Unless extraordinary circumstances exist as determined by a corrections officer, a
correctional center shall not use restraints on a pregnant offender in her third trimester during
transportation to and from visits to health care providers or court proceedings, or during
medical appointments and examinations, labor, delivery, or forty-eight hours postdelivery.
3. In the event a corrections officer determines that extraordinary circumstances exist
and restraints are necessary, the corrections officer shall fully document in writing within
forty-eight hours of the incident the reasons he or she determined such extraordinary
circumstances existed, the type of restraints used, and the reasons those restraints were
considered the least restrictive available and the most reasonable under the circumstances.
Such documents shall be kept on file by the correctional center for at least ten years from the
date the restraints were used.
4. Any time restraints are used on a pregnant offender in her third trimester or on a
postpartum offender forty-eight hours postdelivery, the restraints shall be the least restrictive
available and the most reasonable under the circumstances. In no case shall leg, ankle, or
waist restraints or any mechanical restraints be used on any such offender, and if wrist
restraints are used, such restraints shall be placed in the front of such offender's body to
protect the offender and unborn child in the case of a forward fall.
5. If a doctor, nurse, or other health care provider treating the pregnant offender in her
third trimester or the postpartum offender forty-eight hours postdelivery requests that
restraints not be used, the corrections officer accompanying such offender shall immediately
remove all restraints.
6. Pregnant offenders shall be transported in vehicles equipped with seatbelts.
7. The [sentencing and corrections oversight commission established under section
217.147 and the] advisory committee established under section 217.015 shall conduct
biannual reviews of every report written on the use of restraints on a pregnant offender in her
third trimester or on a postpartum offender forty-eight hours postdelivery in accordance with
subsection 3 of this section to determine compliance with this section. The written reports
shall be kept on file by the department for ten years.

HCS HB 3092 52
8. The chief administrative officer, or equivalent position, of each correctional center
shall:
(1) Ensure that employees of the correctional center are provided with training, which
may include online training, on the provisions of this section and section 217.147; and
(2) Inform female offenders, in writing and orally, of any policies and practices
developed in accordance with this section upon admission to the correctional center,
including policies and practices in any offender handbook, and post the policies and practices
in locations in the correctional center where such notices are commonly posted and will be
seen by female offenders, including common housing areas and health care facilities.
9. The provisions of this section shall apply only to the department of corrections.
301.140. 1. Upon the transfer of ownership of any motor vehicle or trailer, the
certificate of registration and the right to use the number plates shall expire and the number
plates shall be removed by the owner at the time of the transfer of possession, and it shall be
unlawful for any person other than the person to whom such number plates were originally
issued to have the same in his or her possession whether in use or not, unless such possession
is solely for charitable purposes; except that the buyer of a motor vehicle or trailer who trades
in a motor vehicle or trailer may attach the license plates from the traded-in motor vehicle or
trailer to the newly purchased motor vehicle or trailer. The operation of a motor vehicle with
such transferred plates shall be lawful for no more than thirty days[, or no more than ninety
days if the dealer is selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of section 301.213,] or no
more than sixty days if the dealer is selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of
subsection 5 of section 301.210. As used in this subsection, the term "trade-in motor vehicle
or trailer" shall include any single motor vehicle or trailer sold by the buyer of the newly
purchased vehicle or trailer, as long as the license plates for the trade-in motor vehicle or
trailer are still valid.
2. In the case of a transfer of ownership the original owner may register another
motor vehicle under the same number, upon the payment of a fee of two dollars, if the motor
vehicle is of horsepower, gross weight or (in the case of a passenger-carrying commercial
motor vehicle) seating capacity, not in excess of that originally registered. When such motor
vehicle is of greater horsepower, gross weight or (in the case of a passenger-carrying
commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, for which a greater fee is prescribed, the
applicant shall pay a transfer fee of two dollars and a pro rata portion for the difference in
fees. When such vehicle is of less horsepower, gross weight or (in case of a passenger-
carrying commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, for which a lesser fee is prescribed, the
applicant shall not be entitled to a refund.
3. License plates may be transferred from a motor vehicle which will no longer be
operated to a newly purchased motor vehicle by the owner of such vehicles. The owner shall

HCS HB 3092 53
pay a transfer fee of two dollars if the newly purchased vehicle is of horsepower, gross weight
or (in the case of a passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, not in
excess of that of the vehicle which will no longer be operated. When the newly purchased
motor vehicle is of greater horsepower, gross weight or (in the case of a passenger-carrying
commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, for which a greater fee is prescribed, the
applicant shall pay a transfer fee of two dollars and a pro rata portion of the difference in fees.
When the newly purchased vehicle is of less horsepower, gross weight or (in the case of a
passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicle) seating capacity, for which a lesser fee is
prescribed, the applicant shall not be entitled to a refund.
4. (1) The director of the department of revenue shall have authority to produce or
allow others to produce a weather resistant, nontearing temporary permit authorizing the
operation of a motor vehicle or trailer by a buyer for not more than thirty days, or no more
than sixty days if issued by a dealer selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of
subsection 5 of section 301.210, from the date of purchase. The temporary permit authorized
under this section may be purchased by the purchaser of a motor vehicle or trailer from the
central office of the department of revenue or from an authorized agent of the department of
revenue upon satisfaction of all applicable taxes under chapter 144, upon proof of purchase of
a motor vehicle or trailer for which the buyer has no registration plate available for transfer
and upon proof of financial responsibility, or from a motor vehicle dealer upon purchase of a
motor vehicle or trailer for which the buyer has no registration plate available for transfer, or
from a motor vehicle dealer upon purchase of a motor vehicle or trailer for which the buyer
has registered and is awaiting receipt of registration plates. The director of the department of
revenue or a producer authorized by the director of the department of revenue may make
temporary permits available to registered dealers in this state, authorized agents of the
department of revenue or the department of revenue. The price paid by a motor vehicle
dealer, an authorized agent of the department of revenue or the department of revenue for a
temporary permit shall not exceed five dollars for each permit. The director of the
department of revenue shall direct motor vehicle dealers and authorized agents to obtain
temporary permits from an authorized producer. Amounts received by the director of the
department of revenue for temporary permits shall constitute state revenue; however, amounts
received by an authorized producer other than the director of the department of revenue shall
not constitute state revenue and any amounts received by motor vehicle dealers or authorized
agents for temporary permits purchased from a producer other than the director of the
department of revenue shall not constitute state revenue. In no event shall revenues from the
general revenue fund or any other state fund be utilized to compensate motor vehicle dealers
or other producers for their role in producing temporary permits as authorized under this
section. Amounts that do not constitute state revenue under this section shall also not

HCS HB 3092 54
constitute fees for registration or certificates of title to be collected by the director of the
department of revenue under section 301.190. No motor vehicle dealer, authorized agent or
the department of revenue shall charge more than five dollars for each permit issued. The
permit shall be valid for a period of thirty days[, or no more than ninety days if issued by a
dealer selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of section 301.213,] or no more than
sixty days if issued by a dealer selling the motor vehicle under the provisions of subsection 5
of section 301.210, from the date of purchase of a motor vehicle or trailer, or from the date of
sale of the motor vehicle or trailer by a motor vehicle dealer for which the purchaser obtains a
permit as set out above. No permit shall be issued for a vehicle under this section unless the
buyer shows proof of financial responsibility. Each temporary permit issued shall be securely
fastened to the back or rear of the motor vehicle in a manner and place on the motor vehicle
consistent with registration plates so that all parts and qualities of the temporary permit
thereof shall be plainly and clearly visible, reasonably clean and are not impaired in any way.
(2) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection requiring satisfaction of all
applicable taxes under chapter 144 shall become effective only upon notification by the
director of the department of revenue that implementation of such requirements are
technologically feasible following the development and maintenance of a modernized,
integrated system for the titling of vehicles, the issuance and renewal of vehicle registrations,
the issuance and renewal of drivers' licenses and identification cards, and the perfection and
release of liens and encumbrances on vehicles.
5. The permit shall be issued on a form prescribed by the director of the department of
revenue and issued only for the applicant's temporary operation of the motor vehicle or trailer
purchased to enable the applicant to temporarily operate the motor vehicle while proper title
and registration plates are being obtained, or while awaiting receipt of registration plates, and
shall be displayed on no other motor vehicle. Temporary permits issued pursuant to this
section shall not be transferable or renewable, shall not be valid upon issuance of proper
registration plates for the motor vehicle or trailer, and shall be returned to the department or to
the department's agent upon the issuance of such proper registration plates. Any temporary
permit returned to the department or to the department's agent shall be immediately
destroyed. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to temporary permits issued for
commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight.
The director of the department of revenue shall determine the size, material, design,
numbering configuration, construction, and color of the permit. The director of the
department of revenue, at his or her discretion, shall have the authority to reissue, and thereby
extend the use of, a temporary permit previously and legally issued for a motor vehicle or
100 trailer while proper title and registration are being obtained.

HCS HB 3092 55
101 6. Every motor vehicle dealer that issues temporary permits shall keep, for inspection
102 by proper officers, an accurate record of each permit issued by recording the permit number,
103 the motor vehicle dealer's number, buyer's name and address, the motor vehicle's year, make,
104 and manufacturer's vehicle identification number, and the permit's date of issuance and
105 expiration date. Upon the issuance of a temporary permit by either the central office of the
106 department of revenue, a motor vehicle dealer or an authorized agent of the department of
107 revenue, the director of the department of revenue shall make the information associated with
108 the issued temporary permit immediately available to the law enforcement community of the
109 state of Missouri.
110 7. Upon the transfer of ownership of any currently registered motor vehicle wherein
111 the owner cannot transfer the license plates due to a change of motor vehicle category, the
112 owner may surrender the license plates issued to the motor vehicle and receive credit for any
113 unused portion of the original registration fee against the registration fee of another motor
114 vehicle. Such credit shall be granted based upon the date the license plates are surrendered.
115 No refunds shall be made on the unused portion of any license plates surrendered for such
116 credit.
117 8. An additional temporary license plate produced in a manner and of materials
118 determined by the director to be the most cost-effective means of production with a
119 configuration that matches an existing or newly issued plate may be purchased by a motor
120 vehicle owner to be placed in the interior of the vehicle's rear window such that the driver's
121 view out of the rear window is not obstructed and the plate configuration is clearly visible
122 from the outside of the vehicle to serve as the visible plate when a bicycle rack or other item
123 obstructs the view of the actual plate. Such temporary plate is only authorized for use when
124 the matching actual plate is affixed to the vehicle in the manner prescribed in subsection 5 of
125 section 301.130. The fee charged for the temporary plate shall be equal to the fee charged for
126 a temporary permit issued under subsection 4 of this section. Replacement temporary plates
127 authorized in this subsection may be issued as needed upon the payment of a fee equal to the
128 fee charged for a temporary permit under subsection 4 of this section. The newly produced
129 third plate may only be used on the vehicle with the matching plate, and the additional plate
130 shall be clearly recognizable as a third plate and only used for the purpose specified in this
131 subsection.
132 9. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.217, the director may issue a
133 temporary permit to an individual who possesses a salvage motor vehicle which requires an
134 inspection under subsection 9 of section 301.190. The operation of a salvage motor vehicle
135 for which the permit has been issued shall be limited to the most direct route from the
136 residence, maintenance, or storage facility of the individual in possession of such motor
137 vehicle to the nearest authorized inspection facility and return to the originating location.

HCS HB 3092 56
138 Notwithstanding any other requirements for the issuance of a temporary permit under this
139 section, an individual obtaining a temporary permit for the purpose of operating a motor
140 vehicle to and from an examination facility as prescribed in this subsection shall also
141 purchase the required motor vehicle examination form which is required to be completed for
142 an examination under subsection 9 of section 301.190 and provide satisfactory evidence that
143 such vehicle has passed a motor vehicle safety inspection for such vehicle as required in
144 section 307.350.
145 10. The director of the department of revenue may promulgate all necessary rules and
146 regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
147 defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
148 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536
149 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
150 of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
151 effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then
152 the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2012,
153 shall be invalid and void.
154 11. The repeal and reenactment of this section shall become effective on the date the
155 department of revenue or a producer authorized by the director of the department of revenue
156 begins producing temporary permits described in subsection 4 of such section, or on July 1,
157 2013, whichever occurs first. If the director of revenue or a producer authorized by the
158 director of the department of revenue begins producing temporary permits prior to July 1,
159 2013, the director of the department of revenue shall notify the revisor of statutes of such fact.
301.190. 1. No certificate of registration of any motor vehicle or trailer, or number
plate therefor, shall be issued by the director of revenue unless the applicant therefor shall
make application for and be granted a certificate of ownership of such motor vehicle or trailer,
or shall present satisfactory evidence that such certificate has been previously issued to the
applicant for such motor vehicle or trailer. Application shall be made within thirty days after
the applicant acquires the motor vehicle or trailer, unless the motor vehicle was acquired
under [section 301.213 or] subsection 5 of section 301.210 in which case the applicant shall
make application within thirty days after receiving title from the dealer, upon a blank form
furnished by the director of revenue and shall contain the applicant's identification number, a
full description of the motor vehicle or trailer, the vehicle identification number, and the
mileage registered on the odometer at the time of transfer of ownership, as required by section
407.536, together with a statement of the applicant's source of title and of any liens or
encumbrances on the motor vehicle or trailer, provided that for good cause shown the director
of revenue may extend the period of time for making such application. When an owner wants
to add or delete a name or names on an application for certificate of ownership of a motor

HCS HB 3092 57
vehicle or trailer that would cause it to be inconsistent with the name or names listed on the
notice of lien, the owner shall provide the director with documentation evidencing the
lienholder's authorization to add or delete a name or names on an application for certificate of
ownership.
2. The director of revenue shall use reasonable diligence in ascertaining whether the
facts stated in such application are true and shall, to the extent possible without substantially
delaying processing of the application, review any odometer information pertaining to such
motor vehicle that is accessible to the director of revenue. If satisfied that the applicant is the
lawful owner of such motor vehicle or trailer, or otherwise entitled to have the same
registered in his name, the director shall thereupon issue an appropriate certificate over his
signature and sealed with the seal of his office, procured and used for such purpose. The
certificate shall contain on its face a complete description, vehicle identification number, and
other evidence of identification of the motor vehicle or trailer, as the director of revenue may
deem necessary, together with the odometer information required to be put on the face of the
certificate pursuant to section 407.536, a statement of any liens or encumbrances which the
application may show to be thereon, and, if ownership of the vehicle has been transferred, the
name of the state issuing the transferor's title and whether the transferor's odometer mileage
statement executed pursuant to section 407.536 indicated that the true mileage is materially
different from the number of miles shown on the odometer, or is unknown.
3. The director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current and all
subsequent issues of the certificate the words "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle", "Motor Change
Vehicle", "Specially Constructed Motor Vehicle", or "Non-USA-Std Motor Vehicle", as
defined in section 301.010. Effective July 1, 1990, on all original and all subsequent issues of
the certificate for motor vehicles as referenced in subsections 2 and 3 of section 301.020, the
director shall print on the face thereof the following designation: "Annual odometer updates
may be available from the department of revenue.". On any duplicate certificate, the director
of revenue shall reprint on the face thereof the most recent of either:
(1) The mileage information included on the face of the immediately prior certificate
and the date of purchase or issuance of the immediately prior certificate; or
(2) Any other mileage information provided to the director of revenue, and the date
the director obtained or recorded that information.
4. The certificate of ownership issued by the director of revenue shall be
manufactured in a manner to prohibit as nearly as possible the ability to alter, counterfeit,
duplicate, or forge such certificate without ready detection. In order to carry out the
requirements of this subsection, the director of revenue may contract with a nonprofit
scientific or educational institution specializing in the analysis of secure documents to

HCS HB 3092 58
determine the most effective methods of rendering Missouri certificates of ownership
nonalterable or noncounterfeitable.
5. The fee for each original certificate so issued shall be eight dollars and fifty cents,
in addition to the fee for registration of such motor vehicle or trailer. If application for the
certificate is not made within thirty days after the vehicle is acquired by the applicant, or
where the motor vehicle was acquired under [section 301.213 or] subsection 5 of section
301.210 and the applicant fails to make application within thirty days after receiving title
from the dealer, a delinquency penalty fee of twenty-five dollars for the first thirty days of
delinquency and twenty-five dollars for each thirty days of delinquency thereafter, not to
exceed a total of two hundred dollars, but such penalty may be waived by the director for a
good cause shown. If the director of revenue learns that any person has failed to obtain a
certificate within thirty days after acquiring a motor vehicle or trailer, or where the motor
vehicle was acquired under [section 301.213 or] subsection 5 of section 301.210 and the
applicant fails to make application within thirty days after receiving title from the dealer, or
has sold a vehicle without obtaining a certificate, he shall cancel the registration of all
vehicles registered in the name of the person, either as sole owner or as a co-owner, and shall
notify the person that the cancellation will remain in force until the person pays the
delinquency penalty fee provided in this section, together with all fees, charges and payments
which the person should have paid in connection with the certificate of ownership and
registration of the vehicle. The certificate shall be good for the life of the motor vehicle or
trailer so long as the same is owned or held by the original holder of the certificate and shall
not have to be renewed annually.
6. Any applicant for a certificate of ownership requesting the department of revenue
to process an application for a certificate of ownership in an expeditious manner requiring
special handling shall pay a fee of five dollars in addition to the regular certificate of
ownership fee.
7. It is unlawful for any person to operate in this state a motor vehicle or trailer
required to be registered under the provisions of the law unless a certificate of ownership has
been applied for as provided in this section.
8. Before an original Missouri certificate of ownership is issued, an inspection of the
vehicle and a verification of vehicle identification numbers shall be made by the Missouri
state highway patrol on vehicles for which there is a current title issued by another state if a
Missouri salvage certificate of title has been issued for the same vehicle but no prior
inspection and verification has been made in this state, except that if such vehicle has been
inspected in another state by a law enforcement officer in a manner comparable to the
inspection process in this state and the vehicle identification numbers have been so verified,
the applicant shall not be liable for the twenty-five dollar inspection fee if such applicant

HCS HB 3092 59
submits proof of inspection and vehicle identification number verification to the director of
revenue at the time of the application. The applicant, who has such a title for a vehicle on
which no prior inspection and verification have been made, shall pay a fee of twenty-five
dollars for such verification and inspection, payable to the director of revenue at the time of
the request for the application, which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of
the state highways and transportation department fund.
9. Each application for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for a vehicle
which is classified as a reconstructed motor vehicle, specially constructed motor vehicle, kit
vehicle, motor change vehicle, non-USA-std motor vehicle, or other vehicle as required by
the director of revenue shall be accompanied by a vehicle examination certificate issued by
the Missouri state highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the
100 director of revenue. The vehicle examination shall include a verification of vehicle
101 identification numbers and a determination of the classification of the vehicle. The owner of
102 a vehicle which requires a vehicle examination certificate shall present the vehicle for
103 examination and obtain a completed vehicle examination certificate prior to submitting an
104 application for a certificate of ownership to the director of revenue. Notwithstanding any
105 provision of the law to the contrary, an owner presenting a motor vehicle which has been
106 issued a salvage title and which is ten years of age or older to a vehicle examination described
107 in this subsection in order to obtain a certificate of ownership with the designation prior
108 salvage motor vehicle shall not be required to repair or restore the vehicle to its original
109 appearance in order to pass or complete the vehicle examination. The fee for the vehicle
110 examination application shall be twenty-five dollars and shall be collected by the director of
111 revenue at the time of the request for the application and shall be deposited in the state
112 treasury to the credit of the state highways and transportation department fund. If the vehicle
113 is also to be registered in Missouri, the safety inspection required in chapter 307 and the
114 emissions inspection required under chapter 643 shall be completed and the fees required by
115 section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall be charged to the owner.
116 10. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
117 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri or as required by
118 section 301.020, it shall be accompanied by a current inspection form certified by a duly
119 authorized official inspection station as described in chapter 307. The completed form shall
120 certify that the manufacturer's identification number for the vehicle has been inspected, that it
121 is correctly displayed on the vehicle and shall certify the reading shown on the odometer at
122 the time of inspection. The inspection station shall collect the same fee as authorized in
123 section 307.365 for making the inspection, and the fee shall be deposited in the same manner
124 as provided in section 307.365. If the vehicle is also to be registered in Missouri, the safety
125 inspection required in chapter 307 and the emissions inspection required under chapter 643

HCS HB 3092 60
126 shall be completed and only the fees required by section 307.365 and section 643.315 shall be
127 charged to the owner. This section shall not apply to vehicles being transferred on a
128 manufacturer's statement of origin.
129 11. Motor vehicles brought into this state in a wrecked or damaged condition or after
130 being towed as an abandoned vehicle pursuant to another state's abandoned motor vehicle
131 procedures shall, in lieu of the inspection required by subsection 10 of this section, be
132 inspected by the Missouri state highway patrol in accordance with subsection 9 of this
133 section. If the inspection reveals the vehicle to be in a salvage or junk condition, the director
134 shall so indicate on any Missouri certificate of ownership issued for such vehicle. Any
135 salvage designation shall be carried forward on all subsequently issued certificates of title for
136 the motor vehicle.
137 12. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
138 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri, and the
139 certificate of ownership has been appropriately designated by the issuing state as a
140 reconstructed motor vehicle, motor change vehicle, specially constructed motor vehicle, or
141 prior salvage vehicle, the director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current
142 Missouri and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership the name of the issuing state
143 and such prior designation. The absence of any prior designation shall not relieve a transferor
144 of the duty to exercise due diligence with regard to such certificate of ownership prior to the
145 transfer of a certificate. If a transferor exercises any due diligence with regard to a certificate
146 of ownership, the legal transfer of a certificate of ownership without any designation that is
147 subsequently discovered to have or should have had a designation shall be a transfer free and
148 clear of any liabilities of the transferor associated with the missing designation.
149 13. When an application is made for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for
150 a motor vehicle previously registered or titled in a state other than Missouri, and the
151 certificate of ownership has been appropriately designated by the issuing state as non-USA-
152 std motor vehicle, the director of revenue shall appropriately designate on the current
153 Missouri and all subsequent issues of the certificate of ownership the words "Non-USA-Std
154 Motor Vehicle".
155 14. The director of revenue and the superintendent of the Missouri state highway
156 patrol shall make and enforce rules for the administration of the inspections required by this
157 section.
158 15. Each application for an original Missouri certificate of ownership for a vehicle
159 which is classified as a reconstructed motor vehicle, manufactured forty or more years prior
160 to the current model year, and which has a value of three thousand dollars or less shall be
161 accompanied by:

HCS HB 3092 61
162 (1) A proper affidavit submitted by the owner explaining how the motor vehicle or
163 trailer was acquired and, if applicable, the reasons a valid certificate of ownership cannot be
164 furnished;
165 (2) Photocopies of receipts, bills of sale establishing ownership, or titles, and the
166 source of all major component parts used to rebuild the vehicle;
167 (3) A fee of one hundred fifty dollars in addition to the fees described in subsection 5
168 of this section. Such fee shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the state
169 highways and transportation department fund; and
170 (4) An inspection certificate, other than a motor vehicle examination certificate
171 required under subsection 9 of this section, completed and issued by the Missouri state
172 highway patrol, or other law enforcement agency as authorized by the director of revenue.
173 The inspection performed by the highway patrol or other authorized local law enforcement
174 agency shall include a check for stolen vehicles.
175
176 The department of revenue shall issue the owner a certificate of ownership designated with
177 the words "Reconstructed Motor Vehicle" and deliver such certificate of ownership in
178 accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Notwithstanding subsection 9 of this section,
179 no owner of a reconstructed motor vehicle described in this subsection shall be required to
180 obtain a vehicle examination certificate issued by the Missouri state highway patrol.
301.562. 1. The department may refuse to issue or renew any license required
pursuant to sections 301.550 to 301.580 for any one or any combination of causes stated in
subsection 2 of this section. The department shall notify the applicant or licensee in writing at
his or her last known address of the reasons for the refusal to issue or renew the license and
shall advise the applicant or licensee of his or her right to file a complaint with the
administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The department may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by chapter 621 against any holder of any license issued under
sections 301.550 to 301.580 for any one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) The applicant or license holder was previously the holder of a license issued under
sections 301.550 to 301.580, which license was revoked for cause and never reissued by the
department, or which license was suspended for cause and the terms of suspension have not
been fulfilled;
(2) The applicant or license holder was previously a partner, stockholder, director or
officer controlling or managing a partnership or corporation whose license issued under
sections 301.550 to 301.580 was revoked for cause and never reissued or was suspended for
cause and the terms of suspension have not been fulfilled;

HCS HB 3092 62
(3) The applicant or license holder has, within ten years prior to the date of the
application, been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere, in a prosecution under the laws of any state or of the United States, for any
offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of any business licensed
under sections 301.550 to 301.580; for any offense, an essential element of which is fraud,
dishonesty, or an act of violence; or for any offense involving moral turpitude, whether or not
sentence is imposed;
(4) Use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or bribery in securing any license
issued pursuant to sections 301.550 to 301.580;
(5) Obtaining or attempting to obtain any money, commission, fee, barter, exchange,
or other compensation by fraud, deception, or misrepresentation;
(6) Violation of, or assisting or enabling any person to violate any provisions of this
chapter and chapters 143, 144, 306, 307, 407, 578, and 643 or of any lawful rule or regulation
adopted pursuant to this chapter and chapters 143, 144, 306, 307, 407, 578, and 643;
(7) The applicant or license holder has filed an application for a license which, as of
its effective date, was incomplete in any material respect or contained any statement which
was, in light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect
to any material fact;
(8) The applicant or license holder has failed to pay the proper application or license
fee or other fees required pursuant to this chapter or chapter 306 or fails to establish or
maintain a bona fide place of business;
(9) Uses or permits the use of any special license or license plate assigned to the
license holder for any purpose other than those permitted by law;
(10) The applicant or license holder is finally adjudged insane or incompetent by a
court of competent jurisdiction;
(11) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which is false;
(12) Violations of sections 407.511 to 407.556, section 578.120, which resulted in a
conviction or finding of guilt or violation of any federal motor vehicle laws which result in a
conviction or finding of guilt.
3. Any such complaint shall be filed within one year of the date upon which the
department receives notice of an alleged violation of an applicable statute or regulation. After
the filing of such complaint, the proceedings shall, except for the matters set forth in
subsection 5 of this section, be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 621.
Upon a finding by the administrative hearing commission that the grounds, provided in
subsection 2 of this section, for disciplinary action are met, the department may, singly or in
combination, refuse to issue the person a license, issue a license for a period of less than two
years, issue a private reprimand, place the person on probation on such terms and conditions

HCS HB 3092 63
as the department deems appropriate for a period of one day to five years, suspend the
person's license from one day to six days, or revoke the person's license for such period as the
department deems appropriate. The applicant or licensee shall have the right to appeal the
decision of the administrative hearing commission and department in the manner provided in
chapter 536.
4. Upon the suspension or revocation of any person's license issued under sections
301.550 to 301.580, the department shall recall any distinctive number plates that were issued
to that licensee. If any licensee who has been suspended or revoked shall neglect or refuse to
surrender his or her license or distinctive number license plates issued under sections 301.550
to 301.580, the director shall direct any agent or employee of the department or any law
enforcement officer, to secure possession thereof and return such items to the director. For
purposes of this subsection, a "law enforcement officer" means any member of the highway
patrol, any sheriff or deputy sheriff, or any peace officer certified under chapter 590 acting in
his or her official capacity. Failure of the licensee to surrender his or her license or distinctive
number license plates upon demand by the director, any agent or employee of the department,
or any law enforcement officer shall be a class A misdemeanor.
5. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the following events or
acts by the holder of any license issued under sections 301.550 to 301.580 are deemed to
present a clear and present danger to the public welfare and shall be considered cause for
suspension or revocation of such license under the procedure set forth in subsection 6 of this
section, at the discretion of the director:
(1) The expiration or revocation of any corporate surety bond or irrevocable letter of
credit, as required by section 301.560, without submission of a replacement bond or letter of
credit which provides coverage for the entire period of licensure;
(2) The failure to maintain a bona fide established place of business as required by
section 301.560;
(3) Criminal convictions as set forth in subdivision (3) of subsection 2 of this section;
or
(4) Three or more occurrences of violations which have been established following
proceedings before the administrative hearing commission under subsection 3 of this section,
or which have been established following proceedings before the director under subsection 6
of this section, of this chapter and chapters 143, 144, 306, 307, 578, and 643 or of any lawful
rule or regulation adopted under this chapter and chapters 143, 144, 306, 307, 578, and 643,
not previously set forth herein.
6. (1) Any license issued under sections 301.550 to 301.580 may be suspended or
revoked, following an evidentiary hearing before the director or his or her designated hearing

HCS HB 3092 64
officer, if affidavits or sworn testimony by an authorized agent of the department alleges the
occurrence of any of the events or acts described in subsection 5 of this section.
(2) For any license which the department believes may be subject to suspension or
revocation under this subsection, the director shall immediately issue a notice of hearing to
the licensee of record. The director's notice of hearing:
(a) Shall be served upon the licensee personally or by first class mail to the dealer's
last known address, as registered with the director;
(b) Shall be based on affidavits or sworn testimony presented to the director, and shall
notify the licensee that such information presented therein constitutes cause to suspend or
100 revoke the licensee's license;
101 (c) Shall provide the licensee with a minimum of ten days' notice prior to hearing;
102 (d) Shall specify the events or acts which may provide cause for suspension or
103 revocation of the license, and shall include with the notice a copy of all affidavits, sworn
104 testimony or other information presented to the director which support discipline of the
105 license; and
106 (e) Shall inform the licensee that he or she has the right to attend the hearing and
107 present any evidence in his or her defense, including evidence to show that the event or act
108 which may result in suspension or revocation has been corrected to the director's satisfaction,
109 and that he or she may be represented by counsel at the hearing.
110 (3) At any hearing before the director conducted under this subsection, the director or
111 his or her designated hearing officer shall consider all evidence relevant to the issue of
112 whether the license should be suspended or revoked due to the occurrence of any of the acts
113 set forth in subsection 5 herein. Within twenty business days after such hearing, the director
114 or his or her designated hearing officer shall issue a written order, with findings of fact and
115 conclusions of law, which either grants or denies the issuance of an order of suspension or
116 revocation. The suspension or revocation shall be effective ten days after the date of the
117 order. The written order of the director or his or her hearing officer shall be the final decision
118 of the director and shall be subject to judicial review under the provisions of chapter 536.
119 (4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter or chapter 610 or 621 to the
120 contrary, the proceedings under this subsection shall be closed and no order shall be made
121 public until it is final, for purposes of appeal.
122 7. In lieu of acting under subsection 2 or 6 of this section, the department of revenue
123 may enter into an agreement with the holder of the license to ensure future compliance with
124 sections 301.210, [301.213,] 307.380, sections 301.217 to 301.229, and sections 301.550 to
125 301.580. Such agreement may include an assessment fee not to exceed five hundred dollars
126 per violation or five thousand dollars in the aggregate unless otherwise permitted by law,
127 probation terms and conditions, and other requirements as may be deemed appropriate by the

HCS HB 3092 65
128 department of revenue and the holder of the license. Any fees collected by the department of
129 revenue under this subsection shall be deposited into the motor vehicle commission fund
130 created in section 301.560.
313.270. 1. The director, pursuant to rules and regulations issued by the commission,
may directly purchase or lease such goods or services as are necessary for effectuating the
purposes of sections 313.200 to 313.350, including procurements which integrate functions
such as lottery game design, supply of goods and services, and advertising. The lottery
commission by approved rule may purchase goods made in the United States and sold by a
Missouri business to be given away as prizes within the provisions of section 313.321.
Contracts shall be awarded to lottery contractors or lottery vendors on the basis of lowest and
best bid on an evaluated basis in order to maximize revenues to the lottery fund. The director
may also utilize state purchasing procedures. [The director shall award at least ten percent of
the aggregate dollar amount of all contracts to provide goods and services to the lottery to
minority business enterprises as defined by the office of administration and shall award at
least five percent of the aggregate dollar amount of all contracts to provide goods and services
to the lottery to women business enterprises as defined by the office of administration.] No
contract awarded or entered into by the director may be assigned by the holder thereof except
by specific approval of the commission.
2. [Any contract awarded to any lottery contractor or vendor shall provide that such
contractor or vendor shall award a minimum of ten percent of his subcontracted business to
minority business enterprises as defined by the office of administration and shall award a
minimum of five percent of his subcontracted business to women business enterprises as
defined by the office of administration. This section shall not apply to multistate lottery.
3.] Any lottery vendor which enters into a contract to supply lottery materials,
services or equipment for use in the operation of the state lottery shall first disclose such
information as the commission may require, by rule and regulation, concerning the selection
of lottery vendors.
[4.] 3. The costs of any investigation into the background of the applicant seeking a
contract shall be assessed against the applicant and shall be paid by the applicant at the time
of billing by the state.
[5.] 4. Performance bonds shall be posted by each contractor with the commission
with a surety acceptable to the commission in an amount as may be required by the
commission, but not to exceed the expected total value of the contract. The contract of any
lottery contractor who does not comply with such requirements may be terminated by the
commission. The commission may terminate the contract of any lottery vendor who:
(1) Is convicted of any felony;
(2) Is convicted of any gambling-related offense;

HCS HB 3092 66
(3) Is convicted of any crime involving fraud or misrepresentation;
(4) Fails to comply with the rules and regulations of the commission existing at the
time the contract was entered into; or
(5) Fails to periodically update any disclosure requirements.
[6. The provisions in this section requiring that certain percentages of lottery
contracts and subcontracts be awarded to businesses owned and controlled by women or
ethnic and racial minorities shall expire on January 1, 2005.]
320.092. 1. Tax credits issued pursuant to sections 135.400[,] and 135.750 [and
320.093] shall be subject to oversight provisions. Effective January 1, 2000, notwithstanding
the provisions of section 32.057, the board, department or authority issuing tax credits shall
annually report to the office of administration, president pro tem of the senate, and the
speaker of the house of representatives regarding the tax credits issued pursuant to sections
135.400[,] and 135.750 [and 320.093] which were issued in the previous fiscal year. The
report shall contain, but not be limited to, the aggregate number and dollar amount of tax
credits issued by the board, department or authority, the number and dollar amount of tax
credits claimed by taxpayers, and the number and dollar amount of tax credits unclaimed by
taxpayers as well as the number of years allowed for claims to be made. This report shall be
delivered no later than November of each year.
2. The reporting requirements established pursuant to subsection 1 of this section
shall also apply to the department of economic development and the Missouri development
finance board established pursuant to section 100.265. The department and the Missouri
development finance board shall report on the tax credit programs which they respectively
administer that are authorized under the provisions of chapters 32, 100, 135, 178, 253, 348,
447 and 620.
375.330. 1. No insurance company formed under the laws of this state shall be
permitted to purchase, hold or convey real estate, excepting for the purpose and in the manner
herein set forth, to wit:
(1) Such as shall be necessary for its accommodation in the transaction of its
business; provided that before the purchase of real estate for any such purpose, the approval
of the director of the department of commerce and insurance must be first had and obtained,
and except with the approval of the director, the value of such real estate, together with all
appurtenances thereto, purchased for such purpose shall not exceed twenty percent of the
insurance company's capital and surplus as shown by its last annual statement; or
(2) Such as shall have been mortgaged in good faith by way of security for loans
previously contracted, or for moneys due; or
(3) Such as shall have been conveyed to it in satisfaction of debts contracted in the
course of its dealings; or

HCS HB 3092 67
(4) Such as shall have been purchased at sales upon the judgments, decrees or
mortgages obtained or made for such debts; or
(5) Such as shall be necessary and proper for carrying on its legitimate business under
the provisions of the Urban Redevelopment Corporations Act; or
(6) Such as shall have been acquired under the provisions of the Urban
Redevelopment Corporations Act permitting such company to purchase, own, hold or
convey real estate; or
(7) Such real estate, or any interest therein, as may be acquired or held by it by
purchase, lease or otherwise, as an investment for the production of income, which real estate
or interest therein may thereafter be held, improved, developed, maintained, managed, leased,
sold or conveyed by it as real estate necessary and proper for carrying on its legitimate
business; or
(8) A reciprocal or interinsurance exchange may, in its own name, purchase, sell,
mortgage, hold, encumber, lease, convey, or otherwise affect the title to real property for the
purposes and objects of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange. Such deeds, notes,
mortgages or other documents relating to real property may be executed by the attorney in
fact of the reciprocal or interinsurance exchange. This provision shall be retroactive and shall
apply to real estate owned or sold by a reciprocal insurer prior to August 28, 1990.
2. The investments acquired under subdivision (7) of subsection 1 of this section may
be in either existing or new business or industrial properties, or for new residential properties
or new housing purposes.
3. Provided, no such insurance company shall invest more than ten percent of its
admitted assets, as shown by its last annual statement preceding the date of acquisition, as
filed with the director of the department of commerce and insurance of the state of Missouri,
in the total amount of real estate acquired under subdivision (7) of subsection 1, nor more
under subdivision (7) of subsection 1 than one percent of its admitted assets or ten percent of
its capital and surplus, whichever is greater, in any one property, nor more under subdivision
(7) of subsection 1 than one percent of its admitted assets or ten percent of its capital and
surplus, whichever is greater, in total properties leased or rented to any one individual,
partnership or corporation.
4. It shall not be lawful for any company incorporated as aforesaid to purchase, hold
or convey real estate in any other case or for any other purpose; and all such real estate
acquired in payment of a debt, by foreclosure or otherwise, and real estate exchanged
therefor, shall be sold and disposed of within ten years after such company shall have
acquired absolute title to the same, unless the company owning such real estate or interest
therein shall elect to hold it pursuant to subdivision (7) of subsection 1.

HCS HB 3092 68
5. The director of the department of commerce and insurance may, for good cause
shown, extend the time for holding such real estate acquired in paying of a debt, by
foreclosure or otherwise, and real estate exchanged therefor, and not held by the company
under subdivision (7) of subsection 1, for such period as he may find to be to the best interests
of the policyholders of said company.
6. [If a life insurance company depositing under section 376.170 becomes the owner
of real estate pursuant to this section, the company may execute its own deed for the real
estate to the director of the department of commerce and insurance, as trustee. The deed may
be deposited with the director as proper security, under and according to the provisions of
sections 376.010 to 376.670, the value to be subject to the approval of the director.
7.] This section shall not apply to an insurer organized under chapter 376 or licensed
under chapter 354.
376.309. 1. As used in this section, "separate account" means an account established
by an insurance company, into which any amounts paid to or held by such company under
applicable contracts are credited and the assets of which, subject to the provisions of this
section, may be invested in such investments as shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by
such company's board of directors. The income, if any, and gains and losses, realized or
unrealized, on such account shall be credited to or charged against the amounts allocated to
such account without regard to other income, gains or losses of the company. If and to the
extent so provided under the applicable contracts, that portion of the assets of any such
separate account equal to the reserves and other contract liabilities with respect to such
account shall not be chargeable with liabilities arising out of any other business the company
may conduct.
2. Any domestic life insurance company may, after adoption of a resolution by its
board of directors, establish one or more separate accounts, and may allocate to such account
or accounts any amounts paid to or held by it which are to be applied under the terms of an
individual or group contract to provide benefits payable in fixed or in variable dollar amounts
or in both.
3. To the extent it deems necessary to comply with any applicable federal or state act,
the company may, with respect to any separate account or any portion thereof, provide for the
benefit of persons having beneficial interests therein special voting and other rights and
special procedures for the conduct of the business and affairs of such separate account or
portion thereof, including, without limitation, special rights and procedures relating to
investment policy, investment advisory services, selection of public accountants, and
selection of a committee, the members of which need not be otherwise affiliated with the
company, to manage the business and affairs of such separate account or portion thereof; and
the corporate charter of such company shall be deemed amended to authorize the company to

HCS HB 3092 69
do so. The provisions of this section shall not affect existing laws pertaining to the voting
rights of such company's policyholders.
4. The amounts allocated to any separate account and the accumulations thereon may
be invested and reinvested without regard to any requirements or limitations prescribed by the
laws of this state governing the investments of life insurance companies, and the investments
in such separate account or accounts shall not be taken into account in applying the
investment limitations, including but not limited to quantitative restrictions, otherwise
applicable to the investments of the company, except that to the extent that the company's
reserve liability with regard to benefits guaranteed as to principal amount and duration, and
funds guaranteed as to principal amount or stated rate of interest, is maintained in any
separate account, a portion of the assets of such separate account at least equal to such reserve
liability shall be, except as the director might otherwise approve, invested in accordance with
the laws of this state governing the general investment account of any company. As used
herein, the expression "general investment account" shall mean all of the funds, assets and
investments of the company which are not allocated in a separate account. [The provisions of
section 376.170 relating to deposits for registered policies shall not be applicable to funds and
investments allocated to separate accounts.] No investment in the separate account or in the
general investment account of a life insurance company shall be transferred by sale,
exchange, substitution or otherwise from one account to another unless, in case of a transfer
into a separate account, the transfer is made solely to establish the account or to support the
operation of the contracts with respect to the separate account to which the transfer is made or
unless the transfer, whether into or from a separate account, is made by a transfer of cash, or
by a transfer of other assets having a readily determinable market value, provided that such
transfer of other assets is approved by the director and is for assets of equivalent value. Such
transfer shall be deemed approved to the extent the assets of a separate account so transferred
have been paid to or are being held by the company in connection with a pension, retirement
or profit-sharing plan subject to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and
the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended. The director may
withdraw such deemed approval by providing written notice to the company that its financial
condition or past practices require such withdrawal. The director may approve other transfers
among such accounts if the director concludes that such transfers would be equitable.
5. Unless otherwise approved by the director, assets allocated to a separate account
shall be valued at their market value on the date of valuation, or if there is no readily available
market, then as provided under the terms of the contract or the rules or other written
agreement applicable to such separate account; provided, that the portion of the assets of such
separate account at least equal to the company's reserve liability with regard to the guaranteed

HCS HB 3092 70
benefits and funds referred to in subsection 4 of this section, if any, shall be valued in
accordance with the rules otherwise applicable to the company's assets.
6. The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to regulate the issuance and
authority to regulate the sale of contracts under which amounts are to be allocated to one or
more separate accounts as provided herein, and to issue such reasonable rules, regulations and
licensing requirements as the director shall deem necessary to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this section; and the companies that issue such contracts shall not be subject to
registration with the commissioner of securities. The director may, subject to the provisions
of section 374.185, consult and cooperate with the commissioner of securities in
investigations arising from the offer and sale of contracts regulated under this section and
may request assistance from the commissioner of securities in any proceeding arising from
the offer and sale of any such contracts.
7. No domestic life insurance company, and no other life insurance company admitted
to transact business in this state, shall be authorized to deliver within this state any contract
under which amounts are to be allocated to one or more separate accounts as provided herein
until said company has satisfied the director that its condition or methods of operation in
connection with the issuance of such contracts will not render its operation hazardous to the
public or its policyholders in this state. In determining the qualifications of a company
requesting authority to deliver such contracts within this state, the director shall consider,
among other things:
(1) The history and financial condition of the company;
(2) The character, responsibility and general fitness of the officers and directors of the
company; and
(3) In the case of a company other than a domestic company, whether the statutes and
regulations of the jurisdiction of its incorporation provide a degree of protection to
policyholders and the public which is substantially equal to that provided by this section and
the rules and regulations issued thereunder.
8. An authorized life insurance company, whether domestic, foreign or alien, which
issues contracts under which amounts are to be allocated to one or more separate accounts as
provided herein, and which is a subsidiary of or affiliated through common management or
ownership with another life insurance company authorized to do business in this state, may be
deemed to have met the provisions of subsection 7 of this section if either it or the parent or
affiliated company meets the requirements thereof.
9. If the contract provides for payment of benefits in variable amounts, it shall contain
a statement of the essential features of the procedure to be followed by the company in
determining the dollar amount of such variable benefits. Any such contract, including a
group contract, and any certificate issued thereunder, shall state that such dollar amount may

HCS HB 3092 71
decrease or increase and shall contain on its first page a statement that the benefits thereunder
100 are on a variable basis.
101 10. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all pertinent provisions of the
102 insurance laws of this state shall apply to separate accounts and contracts relating thereto.
379.316. 1. Section 379.017 and sections 379.316 to 379.361 apply to insurance
companies incorporated pursuant to sections 379.035 to [379.355] 379.055, section 379.080,
sections 379.060 to 379.075, sections 379.085 to 379.095, [sections 379.205 to 379.310,] and
to insurance companies of a similar type incorporated pursuant to the laws of any other state
of the United States, and alien insurers licensed to do business in this state, which transact fire
and allied lines, marine and inland marine insurance, to any and all combinations of the
foregoing or parts thereof, and to the combination of fire insurance with other types of
insurance within one policy form at a single premium, on risks or operations in this state,
except:
(1) Reinsurance, other than joint reinsurance to the extent stated in section 379.331;
(2) Insurance of vessels or craft, their cargoes, marine builders' risks, marine
protection and indemnity, or other risks commonly insured pursuant to marine, as
distinguished from inland marine, insurance policies;
(3) Insurance against loss of or damage to aircraft, or against liability, other than
employers' liability, arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of aircraft;
(4) All forms of motor vehicle insurance; and
(5) All forms of life, accident and health, and workers' compensation insurance.
2. Inland marine insurance shall be deemed to include insurance now or hereafter
defined by statute, or by interpretation thereof, or if not so defined or interpreted, by ruling of
the director, or as established by general custom of the business, as inland marine insurance.
3. Commercial property and commercial casualty insurance policies are subject to
rate and form filing requirements as provided in section 379.321.
379.670. The subscribers so contracting among themselves shall, through their
attorney, file with the director of the department of commerce and insurance of this state a
declaration verified by the oath of the attorney setting forth:
(1) The name or title of the office at which the subscribers propose to exchange
indemnity contracts. The name or title shall not be so similar to any other name or title
previously adopted by a similar organization or by any insurance corporation or association as
in the opinion of the director of the department of commerce and insurance is calculated to
result in confusion or deception;
(2) The kind or kinds of insurance to be effected or exchanged;
(3) A copy of the form of policy contract or agreement under or by which the
insurance is to be effected or exchanged;

HCS HB 3092 72
(4) A copy of the form of power of attorney or other authority of the attorney under
which the insurance is to be effected or exchanged;
(5) The location of the offices from which the contracts or agreements are to be
issued;
(6) That, except as to the kinds of insurance herein specifically mentioned in this
subdivision, applications have been made for indemnity upon at least one hundred separate
risks aggregating not less than one and one-half million dollars represented by executed
contracts or bona fide applications to become concurrently effective. In the case of
employer's liability or workers' compensation insurance, applications shall have been made
for indemnity upon at least one hundred separate risks covering a total payroll of not less than
two and one-half million dollars as represented by executed contracts or bona fide
applications to become concurrently effective. In the case of automobile insurance,
applications shall have been made for indemnity upon at least one thousand motor vehicles or
for insurance aggregating not less than one and one-half million dollars represented by
executed contracts or bona fide applications to become concurrently effective on any or all
classes of automobile insurance effected by the subscribers through the attorney;
(7) That there is in the possession of the attorney and available for the payment of
losses, assets conforming to the requirements of [sections 379.700 and] section 379.710.
379.720. 1. If at any time the amounts on hand are less than the requirements of
[sections 379.700 and] section 379.710, the subscribers or their attorney for them shall make
up the deficiency.
2. Where funds other than those which have accrued from premiums or deposits of
subscribers are supplied to make up a deficiency as herein provided for they shall be
deposited and held for the benefit of subscribers under such terms and conditions as the
director of the department of commerce and insurance may require so long as the deficiency
exists, thereafter to be returned to the depositors.
3. "Net premiums" or "deposits" as used in this law shall be construed to mean the
advance premiums or deposits made by subscribers after deducting therefrom the amount for
expenses specifically provided in the subscriber's agreement.
379.1310. 1. A pure captive insurance company may be incorporated as a stock
insurer with its capital divided into shares and held by the stockholders as a nonprofit
corporation with one or more members, or as a manager-managed limited liability company.
2. An association captive insurance company or an industrial insured captive
insurance company may be:
(1) Incorporated as a stock insurer with its capital divided into shares and held by the
stockholders;

HCS HB 3092 73
(2) Incorporated as a mutual insurer without capital stock, the governing body of
which is elected by its insureds;
(3) Organized as a manager-managed limited liability company; or
(4) Organized as a reciprocal insurer in accordance with sections 379.650 to 379.790.
3. A captive insurance company incorporated or organized in this state shall have not
less than three incorporators or three organizers of whom not less than one shall be a resident
of this state.
4. In the case of a captive insurance company:
(1) Formed as a corporation, before the articles of incorporation are transmitted to the
secretary of state, the incorporators shall petition the director to issue a certificate setting forth
the director's finding that the establishment and maintenance of the proposed corporation will
promote the general good of the state. In arriving at such a finding the director shall consider:
(a) The character, reputation, financial standing and purposes of the incorporators;
(b) The character, reputation, financial responsibility, insurance experience, and
business qualifications of the officers and directors; and
(c) Such other aspects as the director shall deem advisable.

The articles of incorporation, such certificate, and the organization fee shall be transmitted to
the secretary of state, who shall thereupon record both the articles of incorporation and the
certificate;
(2) Formed as a limited liability company, before the articles of organization are
transmitted to the secretary of state, the organizers shall petition the director to issue a
certificate setting forth the director's finding that the establishment and maintenance of the
proposed company will promote the general good of the state. In arriving at such a finding,
the director shall consider the items set forth in paragraphs (a) to (c) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection;
(3) Formed as a reciprocal insurer, the organizers shall petition the director to issue a
certificate setting the director's finding that the establishment and maintenance of the
proposed association will promote the general good of the state. In arriving at such a finding
the director shall consider the items set forth in paragraphs (a) to (c) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
5. The capital stock of a captive insurance company incorporated as a stock insurer
may be authorized with no par value.
6. In the case of a captive insurance company:
(1) Formed as a corporation, at least one of the members of the board of directors
shall be a resident of this state;

HCS HB 3092 74
(2) Formed as a limited liability company, at least one of the managers shall be a
resident of this state;
(3) Formed as a reciprocal insurer, at least one of the members of the subscribers'
advisory committee shall be a resident of this state.
7. Other than captive insurance companies formed as limited liability companies
under chapter 347, or as nonprofit corporations under chapter 355, captive insurance
companies formed as corporations under sections 379.1300 to 379.1351 shall have the
privileges and be subject to chapter 351 as well as the applicable provisions contained in
sections 379.1300 to 379.1308. In the event of conflict between the provisions of such
general corporation law and sections 379.1300 to 379.1351, sections 379.1300 to 379.1351
shall control.
8. Captive insurance companies formed under sections 379.1300 to 379.1351:
(1) As limited liability companies shall have the privileges and be subject to the
provisions of chapter 347 as well as the applicable provisions contained in sections 379.1300
to 379.1351. In the event of a conflict between chapter 347 and sections 379.1300 to
379.1351, sections 379.1300 to 379.1351 shall control; or
(2) As nonprofit corporations shall have the privileges and be subject to the
provisions of chapter 355 as well as the applicable provisions contained in sections 379.1300
to 379.1351. In the event of conflict between chapter 355 and sections 379.1300 to 379.1351,
sections 379.1300 to 379.1351 shall control.
9. The provisions of [section 375.355,] section 375.908, sections 379.980 to 379.988,
and chapter 382, pertaining to mergers, consolidations, conversions, mutualizations,
redomestications, and mutual holding companies shall apply in determining the procedures
to be followed by captive insurance companies in carrying out any of the transactions
described therein; except that:
(1) The director may waive or modify the requirements for public notice and hearing,
or in accordance with rules which the director may adopt addressing categories of
transactions, modify the requirements for public notice and hearing. If a notice of public
hearing is required, but no one requests a hearing ten days before the day set for the hearing,
then the director may cancel the hearing;
(2) An alien insurer may be a party to a merger or a redomestication authorized under
this subsection, if approved by the director; and
(3) The director may issue a certificate of general good to permit the formation of a
captive insurance company that is established for the sole purpose of consolidating or
merging with or assuming existing insurance or reinsurance business from an existing
Missouri licensed captive insurance company. The director may, upon a request of such

HCS HB 3092 75
newly formed captive insurance company, waive or modify the requirements of paragraph (b)
of subdivision (1) and subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of section 379.1302.
10. The articles of incorporation or bylaws of a captive insurance company formed as
a corporation may authorize a quorum of its board of directors to consist of no fewer than
one-third of the full board of directors, provided that a quorum shall not consist of fewer than
two directors.
11. Captive insurance companies formed as reciprocal insurers under the provisions
of sections 379.1300 to 379.1351 shall have the privileges and be subject to the provisions of
sections 379.650 to 379.790 in addition to the applicable provisions of sections 379.1300 to
379.1351. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of sections 379.650 to 379.790
and the provisions of sections 379.1300 to 379.1351, the latter shall control, to the extent a
reciprocal insurer is made subject to other provisions of chapters 374, 375, and 379 under
sections 379.650 to 379.790, such provisions shall not be applicable to a reciprocal insurer
formed under sections 379.1300 to 379.1351 unless such provisions are expressly made
applicable to captive insurance companies under sections 379.1300 to 379.1351.
12. The subscribers' agreement or other organizing document of a captive insurance
company formed as a reciprocal insurer may authorize a quorum of its subscribers' advisory
committee to consist of no fewer than one-third of the number of its members.
382.070. The provisions of sections 382.040, 382.050 and 382.060 shall not apply to:
(1) Any transaction which is subject to the provisions of section [375.355 or]
375.861; or
(2) Any offer, request, invitation, agreement or acquisition which the director by
order shall exempt therefrom as not having been made or entered into for the purpose and not
having the effect of changing or influencing the control of a domestic insurer, or as otherwise
not comprehended within the purposes of sections 382.010 to 382.300.
394.120. 1. No person shall become a member of a cooperative unless such person
shall agree to use electric energy furnished by the cooperative when such electric energy shall
be available through its facilities. The bylaws of a cooperative may provide that any person,
including an incorporator, shall cease to be a member thereof if he or she shall fail or refuse to
use electric energy made available by the cooperative or if electric energy shall not be made
available to such person by the cooperative within a specified time after such person shall
have become a member thereof. Membership in the cooperative shall not be transferable,
except as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may prescribe additional qualifications and
limitations in respect of membership.
2. An annual meeting of the members shall be held at such time as shall be provided
in the bylaws.

HCS HB 3092 76
3. Special meetings of the members may be called by the board of directors, by any
three directors, by not less than ten percent of the members, or by the president.
4. Meetings of members shall be held at such place as may be provided in the bylaws.
In the absence of any such provisions, all meetings shall be held in the city or town in which
the principal office of the cooperative is located.
5. Except as herein otherwise provided, written or printed notice stating the time and
place of each meeting of members and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or
purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given to each member, either personally or
by mail, not less than ten nor more than twenty-five days before the date of the meeting.
6. Two percent of the first two thousand members and one percent of the remaining
members, present in person, or if the bylaws so provide, participating electronically or by
mail, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at all meetings of the members,
unless the bylaws prescribe the presence of a greater percentage of the members for a
quorum. If less than a quorum is present at any meeting, a majority of those present in person
may adjourn the meeting from time to time without further notice.
7. Each member shall be entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a
meeting. Voting shall be in person, but, if the bylaws so provide, may also be by proxy, by
electronic means, by mail, or any combination thereof. If the bylaws provide for voting by
proxy, by electronic means, or by mail, they shall also prescribe the conditions under which
proxy, electronic, or mail voting shall be exercised. In any event, no person shall vote as
proxy for more than two members at any meeting of the members.
[8. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 2 and 7 of this section, the board of
directors shall have the power to set the time and place of the annual meeting and also to
provide for voting by proxy, electronic means, by mail, or any combination thereof, and to
prescribe the conditions under which such voting shall be exercised. The meeting
requirement provided in this section may be satisfied through virtual means. The provisions
of this subsection shall expire on August 28, 2022.]
414.407. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "B-20", a blend of twenty percent by volume biodiesel fuel and eighty percent by
volume petroleum-based diesel fuel;
(2) "Biodiesel", fuel as defined in ASTM Standard PS121;
(3) "EPAct", the federal Energy Policy Act, 42 U.S.C. 13201, et seq.;
(4) "EPAct credit", a credit issued pursuant to EPAct;
(5) "Fund", the biodiesel fuel revolving fund;
(6) "Incremental cost", the difference in cost between biodiesel fuel and conventional
petroleum-based diesel fuel at the time the biodiesel fuel is purchased.

HCS HB 3092 77
2. The department, in cooperation with the department of agriculture, shall establish
and administer an EPAct credit banking and selling program to allow state agencies to use
moneys generated by the sale of EPAct credits to purchase biodiesel fuel for use in state
vehicles. Each state agency shall provide the department with all vehicle fleet information
necessary to determine the number of EPAct credits generated by the agency. The department
may sell credits in any manner pursuant to the provisions of EPAct.
3. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Biodiesel Fuel Revolving Fund",
into which shall be deposited moneys received from the sale of EPAct credits banked by state
agencies on August 28, 2001, and in future reporting years, any moneys appropriated to the
fund by the general assembly, and any other moneys obtained or accepted by the department
for deposit into the fund. The fund shall be managed to maximize benefits to the state in the
purchase of biodiesel fuel and, when possible, to accrue those benefits to state agencies in
proportion to the number of EPAct credits generated by each respective agency.
4. Moneys deposited into the fund shall be used to pay for the incremental cost of
biodiesel fuel with a minimum biodiesel concentration of B-20 for use in state vehicles and
for administration of the fund. Not later than January thirty-first of each year, the department
shall submit an annual report to the general assembly on the expenditures from the fund
during the preceding fiscal year.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080, no portion of the fund shall be
transferred to the general revenue fund, and any appropriation made to the fund shall not
lapse. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds
are invested. Interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
6. The department shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement this
section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant to this section shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to chapter 536.
[7. The department shall conduct a study of the use of alternative fuels in motor
vehicles in the state and shall report its findings and recommendations to the general
assembly no later than January 1, 2002. Such study shall include:
(1) An analysis of the current use of alternative fuels in public and private vehicle
fleets in the state;
(2) An assessment of methods that the state may use to increase use of alternative
fuels in vehicle fleets, including the sale of credits generated pursuant to the federal Energy
Policy Act, 42 U.S.C. 13201, et seq., to pay for the difference in cost between alternative
fuels and conventional fuels;
(3) An assessment of the benefits or harm that increased use of alternative fuels may
make to the state's economy and environment;
(4) Any other information that the department deems relevant.]

HCS HB 3092 78
454.433. 1. When a tribunal of another state as defined in section [454.850] 454.1503
has ordered support payments to a person who has made an assignment of child support rights
to the family support division or who is receiving child support services pursuant to section
454.425, the family support division may notify the court of this state in the county in which
the obligor, obligee or the child resides or works. Until October 1, 1999, upon such notice the
circuit clerk shall accept all support payments and remit such payments to the person or entity
entitled to receive the payments. Effective October 1, 1999, the division shall order the
payment center to accept all support payments and remit such payments to the person or
entity entitled to receive the payments.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the notification to the court
by the division shall authorize the court to make the clerk trustee. The clerk shall keep an
accurate record of such payments and shall report all collections to the division in the manner
specified by the division. Effective October 1, 1999, the duties of the clerk as trustee
pursuant to this section shall terminate and all payments shall be made to the payment center
pursuant to section 454.530.
454.470. 1. The director may issue a notice and finding of financial responsibility to
a parent who owes a state debt or who is responsible for the support of a child on whose
behalf the custodian of that child is receiving support enforcement services from the division
pursuant to section 454.425 if a court order has not been previously entered against that
parent, a court order has been previously entered but has been terminated by operation of law
or if a support order from another state has been entered but is not entitled to recognition
under sections [454.850 to 454.997] 454.1500 to 454.1728. Service of the notice and finding
shall be made on the parent or other party in the manner prescribed for service of process in a
civil action by an authorized process server appointed by the director, or by certified mail,
return receipt requested. The director may appoint any uninterested party, including but not
limited to employees of the division, to serve such process. For purposes of this subsection, a
parent who refuses receipt of service by certified mail is deemed to have been served. Service
upon an obligee who is receiving support enforcement services under section 454.425 may be
made by regular mail. When appropriate to the circumstances of the individual action, the
notice shall state:
(1) The name of the person or agency with custody of the dependent child and the
name of the dependent child for whom support is to be paid;
(2) The monthly future support for which the parent shall be responsible;
(3) The state debt, if any, accrued and accruing, and the monthly payment to be made
on the state debt which has accrued;
(4) A statement of the costs of collection, including attorney's fees, which may be
assessed against the parent;

HCS HB 3092 79
(5) That the parent shall be responsible for providing medical insurance for the
dependent child;
(6) That if a parent desires to discuss the amount of support that should be paid, the
parent or person having custody of the child may, within twenty days after being served,
contact the division office which sent the notice and request a negotiation conference. The
other parent or person having custody of the child shall be notified of the negotiated
conference and may participate in the conference. If no agreement is reached on the monthly
amount to be paid, the director may issue a new notice and finding of financial responsibility,
which may be sent to the parent required to pay support by regular mail addressed to the
parent's last known address or, if applicable, the parent's attorney's last known address. A
copy of the new notice and finding shall be sent by regular mail to the other parent or person
having custody of the child;
(7) That if a parent or person having custody of the child objects to all or any part of
the notice and finding of financial responsibility and no negotiation conference is requested,
within twenty days of the date of service the parent or person having custody of the child shall
send to the division office which issued the notice a written response which sets forth any
objections and requests a hearing; and, that if the director issues a new notice and finding of
financial responsibility, the parent or person having custody of the child shall have twenty
days from the date of issuance of the new notice to send a hearing request;
(8) That if such a timely response is received by the appropriate division office, and if
such response raises factual questions requiring the submission of evidence, the parent or
person having custody of the child shall have the right to a hearing before an impartial hearing
officer who is an attorney licensed to practice law in Missouri and, that if no timely written
response is received, the director may enter an order in accordance with the notice and finding
of financial responsibility;
(9) That the parent has the right to be represented at the hearing by an attorney of the
parent's own choosing;
(10) That the parent or person having custody of the child has the right to obtain
evidence and examine witnesses as provided for in chapter 536, together with an explanation
of the procedure the parent or person having custody of the child shall follow in order to
exercise such rights;
(11) That as soon as the order is entered, the property of the parent required to pay
support shall be subject to collection actions, including, but not limited to, wage withholding,
garnishment, liens, and execution thereon;
(12) A reference to sections 454.460 to 454.510;
(13) That the parent is responsible for notifying the division of any change of address
or employment;

HCS HB 3092 80
(14) That if the parent has any questions, the parent should telephone or visit the
appropriate division office or consult an attorney; and
(15) Such other information as the director finds appropriate.
2. The statement of periodic future support required by subdivision (2) of subsection
1 of this section is to be computed under the guidelines established in subsection 8 of section
452.340.
3. Any time limits for notices or requests may be extended by the director, and such
extension shall have no effect on the jurisdiction of the court, administrative body, or other
entity having jurisdiction over the proceedings.
4. If a timely written response setting forth objections and requesting a hearing is
received by the appropriate division office, and if such response raises a factual question
requiring the submission of evidence, a hearing shall be held in the manner provided by
section 454.475. If no timely written response and request for hearing is received by the
appropriate division office, the director may enter an order in accordance with the notice, and
shall specify:
(1) The amount of periodic support to be paid, with directions on the manner of
payment;
(2) The amount of state debt, if any, accrued in favor of the department;
(3) The monthly payment to be made on state debt, if any;
(4) The amount of costs of collection, including attorney's fees, assessed against the
parent;
(5) The name of the person or agency with custody of the dependent child and the
name and birth date of the dependent child for whom support is to be paid;
(6) That the property of the parent is subject to collection actions, including, but not
limited to, wage withholding, garnishment, liens, and execution thereon; and
(7) If appropriate, that the parent shall provide medical insurance for the dependent
child, or shall pay the reasonable and necessary medical expenses of the dependent child.
5. The parent or person having custody of the child shall be sent a copy of the order
by regular mail addressed to the parent's last known address or, if applicable, the parent's
attorney's last known address. The order is final, and action by the director to enforce and
collect upon the order, including arrearages, may be taken from the date of issuance of the
order.
6. Copies of the orders issued pursuant to this section shall be mailed within fourteen
days of the issuance of the order.
7. Any parent or person having custody of the child who is aggrieved as a result of
any allegation or issue of fact contained in the notice and finding of financial responsibility
shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing, upon the request in writing filed with the

HCS HB 3092 81
director not more than twenty days after service of the notice and finding is made upon such
parent or person having custody of the child, and if in requesting such hearing, the aggrieved
parent or person having custody of the child raises a factual issue requiring the submission of
100 evidence.
101 8. At any time after the issuance of an order under this section, the director may issue
102 an order vacating that order if it is found that the order was issued without subject matter or
103 personal jurisdiction or if the order was issued without affording the obligor due process of
104 law.
454.490. 1. A true copy of any order entered by the director pursuant to sections
454.460 to [454.997] 454.1728, along with a true copy of the return of service, may be filed
with the clerk of the circuit court in the county in which the judgment of dissolution or
paternity has been entered, or if no such judgment was entered, in the county where either the
parent or the dependent child resides or where the support order was filed. Upon filing, the
clerk shall enter the order in the judgment docket. Upon docketing, the order shall have all
the force, effect, and attributes of a docketed order or decree of the circuit court, including,
but not limited to, lien effect and enforceability by supplementary proceedings, contempt of
court, execution and garnishment. Any administrative order or decision of the family support
division filed in the office of the circuit clerk of the court shall not be required to be signed by
an attorney, as provided by supreme court rule of civil procedures 55.03(a), or required to
have any further pleading other than the director's order.
2. In addition to any other provision to enforce an order docketed pursuant to this
section or any other support order of the court, the court may, upon petition by the division,
require that an obligor who owes past due support to pay support in accordance with a plan
approved by the court, or if the obligor is subject to such plan and is not incapacitated, the
court may require the obligor to participate in work activities.
3. In addition to any other provision to enforce an order docketed pursuant to this
section or any other support order of the court, division or other IV-D agency, the director
may order that an obligor who owes past due support to pay support in accordance with a plan
approved by the director, or if the obligor is subject to such plan and is not incapacitated, the
director may order the obligor to participate in work activities. The order of the director shall
be filed with a court pursuant to subsection 1 of this section and shall be enforceable as an
order of the court.
4. As used in this section, "work activities" include:
(1) Unsubsidized employment;
(2) Subsidized private sector employment;
(3) Subsidized public sector employment;

HCS HB 3092 82
(4) Work experience (including work associated with the refurbishing of publicly
assisted housing) if sufficient private sector employment is not available;
(5) On-the-job training;
(6) Job search and readiness assistance;
(7) Community services programs;
(8) Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months for any individual;
(9) Job skills training directly related to employment;
(10) Education directly related to employment for an individual who has not received
a high school diploma or its equivalent;
(11) Satisfactory attendance at a secondary school or course of study leading to a
certificate of general equivalence for an individual who has not completed secondary school
or received such a certificate; or
(12) The provision of child care services to an individual who is participating in a
community service program.
488.426. 1. The judges of the circuit court, en banc, in any circuit in this state may
require any party filing a civil case in the circuit court, at the time of filing the suit, to deposit
with the clerk of the court a surcharge in addition to all other deposits required by law or court
rule. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to proceedings when costs are waived or
are to be paid by the county or state or any city.
2. The surcharge in effect on August 28, 2001, shall remain in effect until changed by
the circuit court. The circuit court in any circuit, except the circuit court in Jackson County or
the circuit court in any circuit that reimburses the state for the salaries of family court
commissioners under and pursuant to section 487.020, may change the fee to any amount not
to exceed fifteen dollars. The circuit court in Jackson County or the circuit court in any
circuit that reimburses the state for the salaries of family court commissioners under and
pursuant to section 487.020 may change the fee to any amount not to exceed twenty dollars.
A change in the fee shall become effective and remain in effect until further changed.
3. Sections 488.426 to 488.432 shall not apply to proceedings when costs are waived
or are paid by the county or state or any city.
[4. In addition to any fee authorized by subsection 1 of this section, any county of the
first classification with more than one hundred one thousand but fewer than one hundred
fifteen thousand inhabitants may impose an additional fee of ten dollars excluding cases
concerning adoption and those in small claims court. The provisions of this subsection shall
expire on December 31, 2019.]
620.570. 1. [The Missouri training and employment council, as established in section
620.523, shall review and recommend criteria for evaluating project funding assistance,

HCS HB 3092 83
program criteria, and other requirements and priorities to be used by the division in the
evaluation and monitoring of Missouri youth service and conservation corps projects.
2.] The division shall work with the department of higher education and workforce
development, the department of elementary and secondary education, all colleges,
universities and lending institutions throughout the state to develop a system of academic
credit, tuition grants and deferred loan repayment incentives for young adults who enroll and
complete participation in corps programs. The division shall adopt rules under chapter 536
designed to implement any such incentive programs.
[3.] 2. The division of workforce development of the department of economic
development shall establish and promote the recruitment of "Show-Me Employers" which
shall consist of Missouri-based corporations and businesses agreeing to interview, for entry-
level jobs, participants successfully completing a youth corps program.
[4.] 3. The division of workforce development of the department of economic
development shall recognize and promote within the labor exchange system the youth service
corps and the potential benefits of hiring participants who have successfully completed any of
the corps' programs.
620.1020. There is hereby created within the department of economic development a
"Business Extension Service Team" program. The purpose of the teams shall be to provide
technical and management assistance to Missouri businesses, to improve their
competitiveness and increase their market share of the economy, to assist businesses with
the introduction of improved production processes, and to assist the businesses with their job
training needs. [Each team shall inform the Missouri training and employment council of
specific job training needs which it identifies for an individual business or general job training
needs which it recommends for the state. A team may recommend that, by means of contract,
feasibility studies or productivity assessments be performed for businesses.] Businesses to be
assisted may include those faced with employee layoffs, plant closings or financial instability.
The expenses of a team shall be financed by state and federal appropriations, local
governments, economic development organizations, private contributions and fees paid by
assisted businesses.
620.2020. 1. The department shall respond to a written request, by or on behalf of a
qualified company or qualified military project, for a proposed benefit award under the
provisions of this program within five business days of receipt of such request. The
department shall respond to a written request, by or on behalf of a qualified manufacturing
company, for a proposed benefit award under the provisions of this program within fifteen
business days of receipt of such request. Such response shall contain either a proposal of
benefits for the qualified company or qualified military project, or a written response refusing
to provide such a proposal and stating the reasons for such refusal. A qualified company or

HCS HB 3092 84
qualified military project that intends to seek benefits under the program shall submit to the
department a notice of intent. The department shall respond within thirty days to a notice of
intent with an approval or a rejection, provided that the department may withhold approval or
provide a contingent approval until it is satisfied that proper documentation of eligibility has
been provided. The department shall certify or reject the qualifying company's plan outlined
in their notice of intent as satisfying good faith efforts made to employ, at a minimum,
commensurate with the percentage of minority populations in the state of Missouri, as
reported in the previous decennial census, the following: racial minorities, contractors who
are racial minorities, and contractors that, in turn, employ at a minimum racial minorities
commensurate with the percentage of minority populations in the state of Missouri, as
reported in the previous decennial census. Failure to respond on behalf of the department
shall result in the notice of intent being deemed approved. A qualified company receiving
approval for program benefits may receive additional benefits for subsequent new jobs at the
same facility after the full initial project period if the applicable minimum job requirements
are met. There shall be no limit on the number of project periods a qualified company may
participate in the program, and a qualified company may elect to file a notice of intent to
begin a new project period concurrent with an existing project period if the applicable
minimum job requirements are achieved, the qualified company provides the department with
the required annual reporting, and the qualified company is in compliance with this program
and any other state programs in which the qualified company is currently or has previously
participated. However, the qualified company shall not receive any further program benefits
under the original approval for any new jobs created after the date of the new notice of intent,
and any jobs created before the new notice of intent shall not be included as new jobs for
purposes of the benefit calculation for the new approval. When a qualified company has filed
and received approval of a notice of intent and subsequently files another notice of intent, the
department shall apply the definition of project facility under subdivision (24) of section
620.2005 to the new notice of intent as well as all previously approved notices of intent and
shall determine the application of the definitions of new job, new payroll, project facility base
employment, and project facility base payroll accordingly.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the benefits available to the
qualified company under any other state programs for which the company is eligible and
which utilize withholding tax from the new or retained jobs of the company shall first be
credited to the other state program before the withholding retention level applicable under this
program will begin to accrue. If any qualified company also participates in a job training
program utilizing withholding tax, the company shall retain no withholding tax under this
program, but the department shall issue a refundable tax credit for the full amount of benefit
allowed under this program. The calendar year annual maximum amount of tax credits which

HCS HB 3092 85
may be issued to a qualifying company that also participates in a job training program shall be
increased by an amount equivalent to the withholding tax retained by that company under a
jobs training program.
3. A qualified company or qualified military project receiving benefits under this
program shall provide an annual report of the number of jobs, along with minority jobs
created or retained, and such other information as may be required by the department to
document the basis for program benefits available no later than ninety days prior to the end of
the qualified company's or industrial development authority's tax year immediately following
the tax year for which the benefits provided under the program are attributed. In such annual
report, if the average wage is below the applicable percentage of the county average wage, the
qualified company or qualified military project has not maintained the employee insurance as
required, if the department after a review determines the qualifying company fails to satisfy
other aspects of their notice of intent, including failure to make good faith efforts to employ,
at a minimum, commensurate with the percentage of minority populations in the state of
Missouri, as reported in the previous decennial census, the following: racial minorities,
contractors who are racial minorities, and contractors that, in turn, employ at a minimum
racial minorities commensurate with the percentage of minority populations in the state of
Missouri, as reported in the previous decennial census, or if the number of jobs is below the
number required, the qualified company or qualified military project shall not receive tax
credits or retain the withholding tax for the balance of the project period. If a statewide state
of emergency exists for more than sixteen months, a qualified company or industrial
development authority shall be entitled to a one-time suspension of program deadlines equal
to the number of months such statewide state of emergency existed with any partial month
rounded to the next whole. During such suspension, the qualified company or industrial
development authority shall not be entitled to retain any withholding tax as calculated under
subdivision (38) of section 620.2005 nor shall it earn any awarded tax credit or receive any
tax credit under the program for the suspension period. The suspension period shall run
consecutively and be available to a qualified company or industrial development authority
that, during the statewide state of emergency, submitted notice of intent that was approved or
that was in year one or a subsequent year of benefits under a program agreement with the
department. The suspension period that runs consecutively and may be available to a
qualified company or industrial development authority as provided in this subsection may
apply retroactively. Any qualified company or industrial development authority requesting a
suspension pursuant to this subsection shall submit notice to the department on its provided
form identifying the requested start and end dates of the suspension, not to exceed the
maximum number of months available under this subsection. Such notice shall be submitted
to the department not later than the end of the twelfth month following the termination of the

HCS HB 3092 86
state of emergency. No suspension period shall start later than the date on which the state of
emergency was terminated. The department and the qualified company or the industrial
development authority shall enter into a program agreement or shall amend an existing
program agreement, as applicable, stating the deadlines following the suspension period and
updating the applicable wage requirements. Failure to timely file the annual report required
under this section may result in the forfeiture of tax credits attributable to the year for which
the reporting was required and a recapture of withholding taxes retained by the qualified
company or qualified military project during such year.
4. The department may withhold the approval of any benefits under this program until
it is satisfied that proper documentation has been provided, and shall reduce the benefits to
reflect any reduction in full-time employees or payroll. Upon approval by the department, the
qualified company may begin the retention of the withholding taxes when it reaches the
required number of jobs and the average wage meets or exceeds the applicable percentage of
county average wage. Tax credits, if any, may be issued upon satisfaction by the department
that the qualified company has exceeded the applicable percentage of county average wage
and the required number of jobs; provided that, tax credits awarded under subsection 7 of
section 620.2010 may be issued following the qualified company's acceptance of the
100 department's proposal and pursuant to the requirements set forth in the written agreement
101 between the department and the qualified company under subsection 4 of section 620.2010.
102 5. Any qualified company or qualified military project approved for benefits under
103 this program shall provide to the department, upon request, any and all information and
104 records reasonably required to monitor compliance with program requirements. This
105 program shall be considered a business recruitment tax credit under subdivision (3) of
106 subsection 2 of section 135.800, and any qualified company or qualified military project
107 approved for benefits under this program shall be subject to the provisions of sections
108 135.800 to 135.830.
109 6. Any taxpayer who is awarded benefits under this program who knowingly hires
110 individuals who are not allowed to work legally in the United States shall immediately forfeit
111 such benefits and shall repay the state an amount equal to any state tax credits already
112 redeemed and any withholding taxes already retained.
113 7. (1) The maximum amount of tax credits that may be authorized under this program
114 for any fiscal year shall be limited as follows, less the amount of any tax credits previously
115 obligated for that fiscal year under any of the tax credit programs referenced in subsection 14
116 of this section:
117 (a) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2013, but ending on or before June 30,
118 2014, no more than one hundred six million dollars in tax credits may be authorized;

HCS HB 3092 87
119 (b) For the fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2014, but ending on or before June 30,
120 2015, no more than one hundred eleven million dollars in tax credits may be authorized;
121 (c) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2015, but ending on or before June
122 30, 2020, no more than one hundred sixteen million dollars in tax credits may be authorized
123 for each fiscal year; and
124 (d) For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2020, no more than one hundred
125 six million dollars in tax credits may be authorized for each fiscal year. The provisions of this
126 paragraph shall not apply to tax credits issued to qualified companies under a notice of intent
127 filed prior to July 1, 2020.
128 (2) For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2020, in addition to the amount of
129 tax credits that may be authorized under paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of this subsection,
130 an additional ten million dollars in tax credits may be authorized for each fiscal year for the
131 purpose of the completion of infrastructure projects directly connected with the creation or
132 retention of jobs under the provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 and an additional ten
133 million dollars in tax credits may be authorized for each fiscal year for a qualified
134 manufacturing company based on a manufacturing capital investment as set forth in section
135 620.2010.
136 8. For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2020, the maximum total amount
137 of withholding tax that may be authorized for retention for the creation of new jobs under the
138 provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 by qualified companies with a project facility
139 base employment of at least fifty shall not exceed seventy-five million dollars for each fiscal
140 year. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to withholding tax authorized for
141 retention for the creation of new jobs by qualified companies with a project facility base
142 employment of less than fifty.
143 9. For tax credits for the creation of new jobs under section 620.2010, the department
144 shall allocate the annual tax credits based on the date of the approval, reserving such tax
145 credits based on the department's best estimate of new jobs and new payroll of the project,
146 and any other applicable factors in determining the amount of benefits available to the
147 qualified company or qualified military project under this program; provided that, the
148 department may reserve up to twenty-one and one-half percent of the maximum annual
149 amount of tax credits that may be authorized under subsection 7 of this section for award
150 under subsection 7 of section 620.2010. However, the annual issuance of tax credits shall be
151 subject to annual verification of actual payroll by the department or, for qualified military
152 projects, annual verification of average salary for the jobs directly created by the qualified
153 military project. Any authorization of tax credits shall expire if, within two years from the
154 date of commencement of operations, or approval if applicable, the qualified company has
155 failed to meet the applicable minimum job requirements. The qualified company may retain

HCS HB 3092 88
156 authorized amounts from the withholding tax under the project once the applicable minimum
157 job requirements have been met for the duration of the project period. No benefits shall be
158 provided under this program until the qualified company or qualified military project meets
159 the applicable minimum new job requirements or, for benefits awarded under subsection 7 of
160 section 620.2010, until the qualified company has satisfied the requirements set forth in the
161 written agreement between the department and the qualified company under subsection 4 of
162 section 620.2010. In the event the qualified company or qualified military project does not
163 meet the applicable minimum new job requirements, the qualified company or qualified
164 military project may submit a new notice of intent or the department may provide a new
165 approval for a new project of the qualified company or qualified military project at the project
166 facility or other facilities.
167 10. Tax credits provided under this program may be claimed against taxes otherwise
168 imposed by chapters 143 and 148, and may not be carried forward, but shall be claimed
169 within one year of the close of the taxable year for which they were issued. Tax credits
170 provided under this program may be transferred, sold, or assigned by filing a notarized
171 endorsement thereof with the department that names the transferee, the amount of tax credit
172 transferred, and the value received for the credit, as well as any other information reasonably
173 requested by the department. For a qualified company with flow-through tax treatment to its
174 members, partners, or shareholders, the tax credit shall be allowed to members, partners, or
175 shareholders in proportion to their share of ownership on the last day of the qualified
176 company's tax period.
177 11. Prior to the issuance of tax credits or the qualified company beginning to retain
178 withholding taxes, the department shall verify through the department of revenue and any
179 other applicable state department that the tax credit applicant does not owe any delinquent
180 income, sales, or use tax or interest or penalties on such taxes, or any delinquent fees or
181 assessments levied by any state department and through the department of commerce and
182 insurance that the applicant does not owe any delinquent insurance taxes or other fees. Such
183 delinquency shall not affect the approval, except that any tax credits issued shall be first
184 applied to the delinquency and any amount issued shall be reduced by the applicant's tax
185 delinquency. If the department of revenue, the department of commerce and insurance, or any
186 other state department concludes that a taxpayer is delinquent after June fifteenth but before
187 July first of any year and the application of tax credits to such delinquency causes a tax
188 deficiency on behalf of the taxpayer to arise, then the taxpayer shall be granted thirty days to
189 satisfy the deficiency in which interest, penalties, and additions to tax shall be tolled. After
190 applying all available credits toward a tax delinquency, the administering agency shall notify
191 the appropriate department and that department shall update the amount of outstanding
192 delinquent tax owed by the applicant. If any credits remain after satisfying all insurance,

HCS HB 3092 89
193 income, sales, and use tax delinquencies, the remaining credits shall be issued to the
194 applicant, subject to the restrictions of other provisions of law.
195 12. The director of revenue shall issue a refund to the qualified company to the extent
196 that the amount of tax credits allowed under this program exceeds the amount of the qualified
197 company's tax liability under chapter 143 or 148.
198 13. An employee of a qualified company shall receive full credit for the amount of tax
199 withheld as provided in section 143.211.
200 14. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning August 28, 2013,
201 no new benefits shall be authorized for any project that had not received from the department
202 a proposal or approval for such benefits prior to August 28, 2013, under the development tax
203 credit program created under sections 32.100 to 32.125, the rebuilding communities tax credit
204 program created under section 135.535, the enhanced enterprise zone tax credit program
205 created under sections 135.950 to 135.973, and the Missouri quality jobs program created
206 under sections 620.1875 to 620.1890. The provisions of this subsection shall not be
207 construed to limit or impair the ability of any administering agency to authorize or issue
208 benefits for any project that had received an approval or a proposal from the department under
209 any of the programs referenced in this subsection prior to August 28, 2013, or the ability of
210 any taxpayer to redeem any such tax credits or to retain any withholding tax under an
211 approval issued prior to that date. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to
212 limit or in any way impair the ability of any governing authority to provide any local
213 abatement or designate a new zone under the enhanced enterprise zone program created by
214 sections 135.950 to 135.963. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no
215 qualified company that is awarded benefits under this program shall[:
216 (1)] simultaneously receive benefits under the programs referenced in this subsection
217 at the same capital investment[; or
218 (2) Receive benefits under the provisions of section 620.1910 for the same jobs].
219 15. If any provision of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 or application thereof to any
220 person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
221 application of these sections which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or
222 application, and to this end, the provisions of sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 are hereby
223 declared severable.
224 16. By no later than January 1, 2014, and the first day of each calendar quarter
225 thereafter, the department shall present a quarterly report to the general assembly detailing the
226 benefits authorized under this program during the immediately preceding calendar quarter to
227 the extent such information may be disclosed under state and federal law. The report shall
228 include, at a minimum:
229 (1) A list of all approved and disapproved applicants for each tax credit;

HCS HB 3092 90
230 (2) A list of the aggregate amount of new or retained jobs that are directly attributable
231 to the tax credits authorized;
232 (3) A statement of the aggregate amount of new capital investment directly
233 attributable to the tax credits authorized;
234 (4) Documentation of the estimated net state fiscal benefit for each authorized project
235 and, to the extent available, the actual benefit realized upon completion of such project or
236 activity; and
237 (5) The department's response time for each request for a proposed benefit award
238 under this program.
239 17. The department may adopt such rules, statements of policy, procedures, forms,
240 and guidelines as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 620.2000 to
241 620.2020. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
242 created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
243 with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
244 This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
245 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
246 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
247 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2013, shall be invalid
248 and void.
249 18. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
250 (1) The provisions of the program authorized under sections 620.2000 to 620.2020
251 shall be reauthorized as of August 28, 2018, and shall expire on August 28, 2030; and
252 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
253 automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of sections
254 620.2000 to 620.2020; and
255 (3) Sections 620.2000 to 620.2020 shall terminate on September first of the calendar
256 year immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under sections
257 620.2000 to 620.2020 is sunset.
630.717. 1. Any residential facility or day program which provides services
exclusively to those persons affected by alcohol or drug abuse shall be exempt from licensure
rules promulgated by the department.
2. Any residential facility or day program which offers services, treatment or
rehabilitation to persons affected by alcohol or drug abuse shall submit to the department a
description of the services, treatment or rehabilitation which it offers, a statement of whether
each facility or program is required to meet any fire-safety standards of a municipality,
political subdivision of the state, and documentation of compliance with such standards, if
they apply.

HCS HB 3092 91
3. [The department shall survey all such facilities and programs and shall prepare a
report for submission to the general assembly of actions necessary to bring such facilities and
programs in compliance with fire-safety standards developed by the department for
certification. The report shall be filed with the speaker of the house and the president pro
tem of the senate by January 1, 1983.
4.] Failure of a facility or program to submit information requested by the department
and required by this section shall disqualify such facility or program from receiving
department certification or funding until such information is submitted.
[21.851. 1. There is hereby established a joint committee of the
general assembly, which shall be known as the "Joint Committee on Disaster
Preparedness and Awareness" and shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) Three members of the senate to be appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate;
(2) Two members of the senate to be appointed by the minority floor
leader of the senate;
(3) Three members of the house of representatives to be appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives;
(4) Two members of the house of representatives to be appointed by
the minority floor leader of the house of representatives;
(5) The director of the department of public safety, or his or her
designee;
(6) The director of the department of agriculture, or his or her
designee; and
(7) The adjutant general of the state, or his or her designee.
2. A majority of the members of the committee shall constitute a
quorum, but the concurrence of a majority of the members shall be required for
the determination of any matter within the committee's duties.
3. The joint committee shall make a continuous study and
investigation into issues relating to disaster preparedness and awareness
including, but not limited to, the following areas:
(1) Natural and manmade disasters;
(2) State and local preparedness for floods;
(3) State and local preparedness for tornados, blizzards, and other
severe storms;
(4) Food and energy resiliency;
(5) Cybersecurity;
(6) The budget reserve fund established under Article IV, Section 27
(a) of the Missouri Constitution;
(7) The protection of vulnerable populations in intermediate care
facilities and skilled nursing facilities as those terms are defined in section
198.006; and
(8) Premises that have been previously contaminated with radioactive
material.

HCS HB 3092 92
4. The joint committee shall compile a full report of its activities for
submission to the general assembly. The report shall be submitted not later
than January first of even-numbered years and may include any
recommendations which the committee may have for legislative action. The
report may also include an analysis and statement of the manner in which
statutory provisions relating to disaster preparedness and awareness are being
executed.
5. The joint committee may employ such personnel as it deems
necessary to carry out the duties imposed by this section, within the limits of
any appropriation for such purpose.
6. The members of the committee shall serve without compensation,
but any actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the
committee's official duties by the joint committee, its members, and any staff
assigned to the committee shall be paid from the joint contingent fund.
7. This section shall expire on December 31, 2022.]
[32.088. 1. There is hereby created the "Missouri Task Force on Fair,
Nondiscriminatory Local Taxation Concerning Motor Vehicles, Trailers,
Boats, and Outboard Motors" to consist of the following members:
(1) The following six members of the general assembly:
(a) Three members of the house of representatives, with no more than
two members from the same political party and each member to be appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(b) Three members of the senate, with no more than two members
from the same political party and each member to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(2) The director of the department of revenue or the director's
designee;
(3) Two Missouri motor vehicle dealers, with one to be appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives and one to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(4) Two representatives from Missouri county governments, with one
to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one to be
appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(5) Two representatives from Missouri city governments, with one to
be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one to be
appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate; and
(6) One Missouri marine dealer, to be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives.
2. The task force shall meet within thirty days after its creation and
organize by selecting a chair and a vice chair, one of whom shall be a member
of the senate and the other of whom shall be a member of the house of
representatives. The chair shall designate a person to keep the records of the
task force. A majority of the task force constitutes a quorum and a majority
vote of a quorum is required for any action.
3. The task force shall meet at least quarterly. However, the task force
shall meet at least monthly during each term of the general assembly.

HCS HB 3092 93
Meetings may be held by telephone or video conference at the discretion of the
chair.
4. Members shall serve on the task force without compensation but
may, subject to appropriation, be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their official duties as members of the task
force.
5. The goals of the task force shall address:
(1) The disparity in taxation that resulted from the Missouri Supreme
Court's decision in Street v. Director of Revenue, 361 S.W.3d 355 (Mo. en
banc 2012), concerning the local taxation of motor vehicles, boats, trailers, and
outboard motors if purchased from a source other than a licensed Missouri
dealer;
(2) The need for local jurisdictions to continue to receive revenue to
provide vital services restored by S.B. 23, effective July 5, 2013; and
(3) The need to avoid placing Missouri dealers of motor vehicles,
outboard motors, boats, and trailers at a competitive disadvantage to non-
Missouri dealers of motor vehicles, outboard motors, boats, and trailers.
6. The task force shall:
(1) Review evidence regarding the methods to address the goals of the
task force;
(2) Review the methods used by other states to address the goals of the
task force;
(3) Review the impact of the disparity of treatment on Missouri
dealers; and
(4) Develop legislation that will not discriminate against Missouri
dealers and will safeguard local revenue to provide vital local services.
7. On or before December 31, 2017, the task force shall submit a
report on its findings to the governor and general assembly. The report shall
include any dissenting opinions in addition to any majority opinions.
8. The task force shall expire on January 1, 2018, or upon submission
of a report under subsection 7 of this section, whichever is earlier.]
[67.5125. By December 31, 2018, the department of revenue shall
prepare and deliver a report to the general assembly on the amount of revenue
collected by local governments for the previous three fiscal years from
communications service providers, as such term is defined in section 67.5111;
a direct-to-home satellite service, as defined in Public Law 104-104, Title VI,
Section 602; and any video service provided through electronic commerce, as
defined in Public Law 105-277, Title XI, as amended, Section 1105(3), from
video fees, linear-foot fees, antenna fees, sales and use taxes, gross receipts
taxes, business license fees, business license taxes, or any other taxes or fees
assessed to such providers.]
[99.1205. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Distressed Areas Land Assemblage Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Acquisition costs", the purchase price for the eligible parcel, costs
of environmental assessments, closing costs, real estate brokerage fees,

HCS HB 3092 94
reasonable demolition costs of vacant structures, and reasonable maintenance
costs incurred to maintain an acquired eligible parcel for a period of five years
after the acquisition of such eligible parcel. Acquisition costs shall not include
costs for title insurance and survey, attorney's fees, relocation costs, fines, or
bills from a municipality;
(2) "Applicant", any person, firm, partnership, trust, limited liability
company, or corporation which has:
(a) Incurred, within an eligible project area, acquisition costs for the
acquisition of land sufficient to satisfy the requirements under subdivision (8)
of this subsection; and
(b) Been appointed or selected, pursuant to a redevelopment
agreement by a municipal authority, as a redeveloper or similar designation,
under an economic incentive law, to redevelop an urban renewal area or a
redevelopment area that includes all of an eligible project area or whose
redevelopment plan or redevelopment area, which encompasses all of an
eligible project area, has been approved or adopted under an economic
incentive law. In addition to being designated the redeveloper, the applicant
shall have been designated to receive economic incentives only after the
municipal authority has considered the amount of the tax credits in adopting
such economic incentives as provided in subsection 8 of this section. The
redevelopment agreement shall provide that:
a. The funds generated through the use or sale of the tax credits issued
under this section shall be used to redevelop the eligible project area;
b. No more than seventy-five percent of the urban renewal area
identified in the urban renewal plan or the redevelopment area identified in the
redevelopment plan may be redeveloped by the applicant; and
c. The remainder of the urban renewal area or the redevelopment area
shall be redeveloped by co-redevelopers or redevelopers to whom the
applicant has assigned its redevelopment rights and obligations under the
urban renewal plan or the redevelopment plan;
(3) "Certificate", a tax credit certificate issued under this section;
(4) "Condemnation proceedings", any action taken by, or on behalf of,
an applicant to initiate an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to use the
power of eminent domain to acquire a parcel within the eligible project area.
Condemnation proceedings shall include any and all actions taken after the
submission of a notice of intended acquisition to an owner of a parcel within
the eligible project area by a municipal authority or any other person or entity
under section 523.250;
(5) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(6) "Economic incentive laws", any provision of Missouri law
pursuant to which economic incentives are provided to redevelopers of a
parcel or parcels to redevelop the land, such as tax abatement or payments in
lieu of taxes, or redevelopment plans or redevelopment projects approved or
adopted which include the use of economic incentives to redevelop the land.
Economic incentive laws include, but are not limited to, the land clearance for
redevelopment authority law under sections 99.300 to 99.660, the real property
tax increment allocation redevelopment act under sections 99.800 to 99.865,
the Missouri downtown and rural economic stimulus act under sections 99.915

HCS HB 3092 95
to 99.1060, and the downtown revitalization preservation program under
sections 99.1080 to 99.1092;
(7) "Eligible parcel", a parcel:
(a) Which is located within an eligible project area;
(b) Which is to be redeveloped;
(c) On which the applicant has not commenced construction prior to
November 28, 2007;
(d) Which has been acquired without the commencement of any
condemnation proceedings with respect to such parcel brought by or on behalf
of the applicant. Any parcel acquired by the applicant from a municipal
authority shall not constitute an eligible parcel; and
(e) On which all outstanding taxes, fines, and bills levied by municipal
governments that were levied by the municipality during the time period that
the applicant held title to the eligible parcel have been paid in full;
(8) "Eligible project area", an area which shall have satisfied the
following requirements:
(a) The eligible project area shall consist of at least seventy-five acres
and may include parcels within its boundaries that do not constitute an eligible
parcel;
(b) At least eighty percent of the eligible project area shall be located
within a Missouri qualified census tract area, as designated by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development under 26 U.S.C.
Section 42, or within a distressed community as that term is defined in section
135.530;
(c) The eligible parcels acquired by the applicant within the eligible
project area shall total at least fifty acres, which may consist of contiguous and
noncontiguous parcels;
(d) The average number of parcels per acre in an eligible project area
shall be four or more;
(e) Less than five percent of the acreage within the boundaries of the
eligible project area shall consist of owner-occupied residences which the
applicant has identified for acquisition under the urban renewal plan or the
redevelopment plan pursuant to which the applicant was appointed or selected
as the redeveloper or by which the person or entity was qualified as an
applicant under this section on the date of the approval or adoption of such
plan;
(9) "Interest costs", interest, loan fees, and closing costs. Interest costs
shall not include attorney's fees;
(10) "Maintenance costs", costs of boarding up and securing vacant
structures, costs of removing trash, and costs of cutting grass and weeds;
(11) "Municipal authority", any city, town, village, county, public
body corporate and politic, political subdivision, or land trust of this state
established and authorized to own land within the state;
(12) "Municipality", any city, town, village, or county;
(13) "Parcel", a single lot or tract of land, and the improvements
thereon, owned by, or recorded as the property of, one or more persons or
100 entities;

HCS HB 3092 96
101 (14) "Redeveloped", the process of undertaking and carrying out a
102 redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan pursuant to which the conditions
103 which provided the basis for an eligible project area to be included in a
104 redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan are to be reduced or eliminated by
105 redevelopment or rehabilitation; and
106 (15) "Redevelopment agreement", the redevelopment agreement or
107 similar agreement into which the applicant entered with a municipal authority
108 and which is the agreement for the implementation of the urban renewal plan
109 or redevelopment plan pursuant to which the applicant was appointed or
110 selected as the redeveloper or by which the person or entity was qualified as an
111 applicant under this section; and such appointment or selection shall have been
112 approved by an ordinance of the governing body of the municipality, or
113 municipalities, or in the case of any city not within a county, the board of
114 aldermen, in which the eligible project area is located. The redevelopment
115 agreement shall include a time line for redevelopment of the eligible project
116 area. The redevelopment agreement shall state that the named developer shall
117 be subject to the provisions of chapter 290.
118 3. Any applicant shall be entitled to a tax credit against the taxes
119 imposed under chapters 143, 147, and 148, except for sections 143.191 to
120 143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent of the acquisition costs, and one
121 hundred percent of the interest costs incurred for a period of five years after
122 the acquisition of an eligible parcel. No tax credits shall be issued under this
123 section until after January 1, 2008.
124 4. If the amount of such tax credit exceeds the total tax liability for the
125 year in which the applicant is entitled to receive a tax credit, the amount that
126 exceeds the state tax liability may be carried forward for credit against the
127 taxes imposed under chapters 143, 147, and 148 for the succeeding six years,
128 or until the full credit is used, whichever occurs first. The applicant shall not
129 be entitled to a tax credit for taxes imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
130 Applicants entitled to receive such tax credits may transfer, sell, or assign the
131 tax credits. Tax credits granted to a partnership, a limited liability company
132 taxed as a partnership, or multiple owners of property shall be passed through
133 to the partners, members, or owners respectively pro rata or pursuant to an
134 executed agreement among the partners, members, or owners documenting an
135 alternate distribution method.
136 5. A purchaser, transferee, or assignee of the tax credits authorized
137 under this section may use acquired tax credits to offset up to one hundred
138 percent of the tax liabilities otherwise imposed under chapters 143, 147, and
139 148, except for sections 143.191 to 143.265. A seller, transferor, or assignor
140 shall perfect such transfer by notifying the department in writing within thirty
141 calendar days following the effective date of the transfer and shall provide any
142 information as may be required by the department to administer and carry out
143 the provisions of this section.
144 6. To claim tax credits authorized under this section, an applicant shall
145 submit to the department an application for a certificate. An applicant shall
146 identify the boundaries of the eligible project area in the application. The
147 department shall verify that the applicant has submitted a valid application in
148 the form and format required by the department. The department shall verify

HCS HB 3092 97
149 that the municipal authority held the requisite hearings and gave the requisite
150 notices for such hearings in accordance with the applicable economic incentive
151 act, and municipal ordinances. On an annual basis, an applicant may file for
152 the tax credit for the acquisition costs, and for the tax credit for the interest
153 costs, subject to the limitations of this section. If an applicant applying for the
154 tax credit meets the criteria required under this section, the department shall
155 issue a certificate in the appropriate amount. If an applicant receives a tax
156 credit for maintenance costs as a part of the applicant's acquisition costs, the
157 department shall post on its internet website the amount and type of
158 maintenance costs and a description of the redevelopment project for which
159 the applicant received a tax credit within thirty days after the department
160 issues the certificate to the applicant.
161 7. The total aggregate amount of tax credits authorized under this
162 section shall not exceed ninety-five million dollars. At no time shall the
163 annual amount of the tax credits issued under this section exceed twenty
164 million dollars. If the tax credits that are to be issued under this section
165 exceed, in any year, the twenty million dollar limitation, the department shall
166 either:
167 (1) Issue tax credits to the applicant in the amount of twenty million
168 dollars, if there is only one applicant entitled to receive tax credits in that year;
169 or
170 (2) Issue the tax credits on a pro rata basis to all applicants entitled to
171 receive tax credits in that year. Any amount of tax credits, which an applicant
172 is, or applicants are, entitled to receive on an annual basis and are not issued
173 due to the twenty million dollar limitation, shall be carried forward for the
174 benefit of the applicant or applicants to subsequent years.
175
176 No tax credits provided under this section shall be authorized after August 28,
177 2013. Any tax credits which have been authorized on or before August 28,
178 2013, but not issued, may be issued, subject to the limitations provided under
179 this subsection, until all such authorized tax credits have been issued.
180 8. Upon issuance of any tax credits pursuant to this section, the
181 department shall report to the municipal authority the applicant's name and
182 address, the parcel numbers of the eligible parcels for which the tax credits
183 were issued, the itemized acquisition costs and interest costs for which tax
184 credits were issued, and the total value of the tax credits issued. The municipal
185 authority and the state shall not consider the amount of the tax credits as an
186 applicant's cost, but shall include the tax credits in any sources and uses and
187 cost benefit analysis reviewed or created for the purpose of awarding other
188 economic incentives. The amount of the tax credits shall not be considered an
189 applicant's cost in the evaluation of the amount of any award of any other
190 economic incentives, but shall be considered in measuring the reasonableness
191 of the rate of return to the applicant with respect to such award of other
192 economic incentives. The municipal authority shall provide the report to any
193 relevant commission, board, or entity responsible for the evaluation and
194 recommendation or approval of other economic incentives to assist in the
195 redevelopment of the eligible project area. Tax credits authorized under this
196 section shall constitute redevelopment tax credits, as such term is defined

HCS HB 3092 98
197 under section 135.800, and shall be subject to all provisions applicable to
198 redevelopment tax credits provided under sections 135.800 to 135.830.
199 9. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
200 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
201 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
202 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
203 of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
204 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
205 assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
206 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
207 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
208 28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.]
[103.175. The board shall study and report to the general assembly, on
or before December 15, 2003, on the feasibility of including in this plan
individuals who are employees of eligible agencies which have not elected to
join the plan or who are retirees of school districts.]
[103.178. 1. Beginning on a date specified by the board of trustees of
the Missouri consolidated health care plan but not later than July 1, 1995, the
Missouri consolidated health care plan established under section 103.005 shall
implement a pilot project to make available to those residing in the pilot
project area who are covered by the plan an alternative system of benefits for
the treatment of chemical dependency added to those benefits regularly
available to plan participants. The benefits provided under the pilot project
shall be similar in scope and comprehensiveness, but not limited to, the
benefits provided for the treatment and rehabilitation of persons who are
chemically dependent under the department of mental health's comprehensive
substance treatment and rehabilitation program, popularly described as the C-
STAR program. Such a pilot project shall operate for a period not to exceed
four years. To the extent that participation in the pilot project incurs additional
cost to a person covered under the plan, participation shall be voluntary. If no
additional cost is incurred, the alternative system of benefits may be made in
lieu of the regular benefits for the services in the pilot project area.
2. The Missouri state employees' retirement system or the Missouri
health care plan, as appropriate, shall in cooperation with the department of
mental health and the department of commerce and insurance design the pilot
project so as to generate data to evaluate the costs and benefits of providing
coverage of chemical dependency using an alternative set of benefits as
provided in this section. The Missouri consolidated health care plan shall at
the completion of the pilot project submit to the governor and the members of
the general assembly a report which describes the results of the evaluation of
this pilot project. As authorized by appropriations made for that purpose, the
Missouri state employees' retirement system or the Missouri consolidated
health care plan may contract with persons to conduct an independent
evaluation of the pilot project established in this section.]

HCS HB 3092 99
[135.276. As used in sections 135.276 to 135.283, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Continuation of commercial operations" shall be deemed to occur
during the first taxable year following the taxable year during which the
business entered into an agreement with the department pursuant to section
135.283 in order to receive the tax exemption, tax credits and refundable
credits authorized by sections 135.276 to 135.283;
(2) "Department", the department of economic development;
(3) "Director", the director of the department of economic
development;
(4) "Enterprise zone", an enterprise zone created under section
135.210 that includes all or part of a home rule city with more than twenty-six
thousand but less than twenty-seven thousand inhabitants located in any
county with a charter form of government and with more than one million
inhabitants;
(5) "Facility", any building used as a revenue-producing enterprise
located within an enterprise zone, including the land on which the facility is
located and all machinery, equipment, and other real and depreciable tangible
personal property acquired for use at and located at or within such facility and
used in connection with the operation of such facility;
(6) "NAICS", the industrial classification as such classifications are
defined in the 1997 edition of the North American Industrial Classification
System Manual as prepared by the Executive Office of the President, Office of
Management and Budget;
(7) "Retained business facility", a facility in an enterprise zone
operated by the taxpayer which satisfies the following requirements as
determined by the department and included in an agreement with the
department:
(a) The taxpayer agrees to a capital investment project at the facility of
at least five hundred million dollars to take place over a period of two
consecutive taxable years ending no later than the fifth taxable year after
continuation of commercial operations;
(b) The taxpayer has maintained at least two thousand employees per
year at the facility for each of the five taxable years preceding the year of
continuation of commercial operations;
(c) The taxpayer agrees to maintain at least the level of employment
that it had at the facility in the taxable year immediately preceding the year of
continuation of commercial operations for ten consecutive taxable years
beginning with the year of the continuation of commercial operations.
Temporary layoffs necessary to implement the capital investment project will
not be considered a violation of this requirement;
(d) The taxpayer agrees that the amount of the average wage paid by
the taxpayer at the facility will exceed the average wage paid within the county
in which the facility is located for ten consecutive taxable years beginning
with the year of the continuation of commercial operations;
(e) Significant local incentives with respect to the project or retained
facility have been committed, which incentives may consist of:

HCS HB 3092 100
a. Cash or in-kind incentives derived from any nonstate source,
including incentives provided by the affected political subdivisions, private
industry and/or local chambers of commerce or similar such organizations; or
b. Relief from local taxes;
(f) Receipt of the tax exemption, tax credits, and refunds are major
factors in the taxpayer's decision to retain its operations at the facility in
Missouri and go forward with the capital investment project and not receiving
the exemption, credits, and refunds will result in the taxpayer moving its
operations out of Missouri; and
(g) There is at least one other state that the taxpayer verifies is being
considered as the site to which the facility's operations will be relocated;
(8) "Retained business facility employee", a person employed by the
taxpayer in the operation of a retained business facility during the taxable year
for which the credit allowed by section 135.279 is claimed, except that truck
drivers and rail and barge vehicle operators shall not constitute retained
business facility employees. A person shall be deemed to be so employed if
such person performs duties in connection with the operation of the retained
business facility on a regular, full-time basis. The number of retained business
facility employees during any taxable year shall be determined by dividing by
twelve the sum of the number of individuals employed on the last business day
of each month of such taxable year. If the retained business facility is in
operation for less than the entire taxable year, the number of retained business
facility employees shall be determined by dividing the sum of the number of
individuals employed on the last business day of each full calendar month
during the portion of such taxable year during which the retained business
facility was in operation by the number of full calendar months during such
period;
(9) "Retained business facility income", the Missouri taxable income,
as defined in chapter 143, derived by the taxpayer from the operation of the
retained business facility. If a taxpayer has income derived from the operation
of a retained business facility as well as from other activities conducted within
this state, the Missouri taxable income derived by the taxpayer from the
operation of the retained business facility shall be determined by multiplying
the taxpayer's Missouri taxable income, computed in accordance with chapter
143, by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor, as defined in
paragraph (a) of this subdivision, plus the payroll factor, as defined in
paragraph (b) of this subdivision, and the denominator of which is two:
(a) The "property factor" is a fraction, the numerator of which is the
retained business facility investment certified for the tax period, and the
denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer's real and
depreciable tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this state
during the tax period. The average value of all such property shall be
determined as provided in chapter 32;
(b) The "payroll factor" is a fraction, the numerator of which is the
total amount paid during the tax period by the taxpayer for compensation to
persons qualifying as retained business facility employees at the retained
business facility, and the denominator of which is the total amount paid in this

HCS HB 3092 101
state during the tax period by the taxpayer for compensation. The
compensation paid in this state shall be determined as provided in chapter 32;
(10) "Retained business facility investment", the value of real and
depreciable tangible personal property, acquired by the taxpayer as part of the
retained business facility after the date of continuation of commercial
100 operations, which is used by the taxpayer in the operation of the retained
101 business facility, during the taxable year for which the credit allowed by
102 section 135.279 is claimed, except that trucks, truck-trailers, truck semitrailers,
103 rail vehicles, barge vehicles, aircraft and other rolling stock for hire, track,
104 switches, barges, bridges, tunnels, rail yards, and spurs shall not constitute
105 retained business facility investments. The total value of such property during
106 such taxable year shall be:
107 (a) Its original cost if owned by the taxpayer; or
108 (b) Eight times the net annual rental rate, if leased by the taxpayer. The
109 net annual rental rate shall be the annual rental rate paid by the taxpayer less
110 any annual rental rate received by the taxpayer from subrentals. The retained
111 business facility investment shall be determined by dividing by twelve the sum
112 of the total value of such property on the last business day of each calendar
113 month of the taxable year. If the retained business facility is in operation for
114 less than an entire taxable year, the retained business facility investment shall
115 be determined by dividing the sum of the total value of such property on the
116 last business day of each full calendar month during the portion of such
117 taxable year during which the retained business facility was in operation by the
118 number of full calendar months during such period;
119 (11) "Revenue-producing enterprise", manufacturing activities
120 classified as NAICS 336211.]
[135.277. The provisions of chapter 143 notwithstanding, one-half of
the Missouri taxable income attributed to an approved retained business
facility that is earned by a taxpayer operating the approved retained business
facility may be exempt from taxation under chapter 143. That portion of
income attributed to the retained business facility shall be determined in a
manner prescribed in paragraph (b) of subdivision (9) of section 135.276,
except that compensation paid to truck drivers, rail, or barge vehicle operators
shall be excluded from the fraction.]
[135.279. 1. Any taxpayer that operates an approved retained business
facility in an enterprise zone may be allowed a credit, each year for ten years,
in an amount determined pursuant to subsection 2 or 3 of this section,
whichever is applicable, against the tax imposed by chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, as follows:
(1) The credit allowed for each retained business facility employee
shall be four hundred dollars, except that for each retained business facility
employee that exceeds the level of employment set forth in paragraph (b) of
subdivision (7) of section 135.276, the credit shall be five hundred dollars.
Transfers from another facility operated by the taxpayer in the state will not
count as retained business facility employees;

HCS HB 3092 102
(2) An additional credit of four hundred dollars shall be granted for
each twelve-month period that a retained business facility employee is a
resident of an enterprise zone;
(3) An additional credit of four hundred dollars shall be granted for
each twelve-month period that the person employed as a retained business
facility employee is a person who, at the time of such employment by the new
business facility, met the criteria as set forth in section 135.240;
(4) To the extent that expenses incurred by a retained business facility
in an enterprise zone for the training of persons employed in the operation of
the retained business facility is not covered by an existing federal, state, or
local program, such retained business facility shall be eligible for a full tax
credit equal to eighty percent of that portion of such training expenses which
are in excess of four hundred dollars for each trainee who is a resident of an
enterprise zone or who was at the time of such employment at the retained
business facility unemployable or difficult to employ as defined in section
135.240, provided such credit shall not exceed four hundred dollars for each
employee trained;
(5) The credit allowed for retained business facility investment shall
be equal to the sum of ten percent of the first ten thousand dollars of such
qualifying investment, plus five percent of the next ninety thousand dollars of
such qualifying investment, plus two percent of all remaining qualifying
investments within an enterprise zone. The taxpayer's retained business
facility investment shall be reduced by the amount of investment made by the
taxpayer or related taxpayer which was subsequently transferred to the
retained business facility from another Missouri facility and for which credits
authorized in this section are not being earned.
2. The credits allowed by subsection 1 of this section shall offset the
greater of:
(1) Some portion of the income tax otherwise imposed by chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, with
respect to such taxpayer's retained business facility income for the taxable year
for which such credit is allowed; or
(2) If the taxpayer operates no other facility in Missouri, the credits
allowed in subsection 1 of this section shall offset up to fifty percent or, in the
case of an economic development project located within a distressed
community as defined in section 135.530, seventy-five percent of the
business income tax otherwise imposed by chapter 143, excluding
withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, if the business
operates no other facilities in Missouri;
(3) If the taxpayer operates more than one facility in Missouri, the
credits allowed in subsection 1 of this section shall offset up to the greater of
the portion prescribed in subdivision (1) of this subsection or twenty-five
percent or, in the case of an economic development project located within a
distressed community as defined in section 135.530, thirty-five percent of the
business' tax, except that no taxpayer operating more than one facility in
Missouri shall be allowed to offset more than twenty-five percent or, in the
case of an economic development project located within a distressed
community as defined in section 135.530, thirty-five percent of the

HCS HB 3092 103
taxpayer's business income tax in any tax period under the method prescribed
in this subdivision.
3. In the case where a person employed by the retained business
facility is a resident of the enterprise zone for less than a twelve-month period,
or in the case where a person employed as a retained business facility
employee is a person who, at the time of such employment by the retained
business facility, met the criteria as set forth in section 135.240, is employed
for less than a twelve-month period, the credits allowed by subdivisions (2)
and (3) of subsection 1 of this section shall be determined by multiplying the
dollar amount of the credit by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number
of calendar days during the taxpayer's tax year for which such credits are
claimed, in which the person met the requirements prescribed in subdivision
(2) or (3) of this subsection, and the denominator of which is three hundred
sixty-five.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any taxpayer
who claims the exemption and credits allowed in sections 135.276 to 135.283
shall not be eligible to receive the exemption allowed in section 135.220, the
credits allowed in sections 135.225 and 135.235, and the refund authorized by
section 135.245 or the tax credits allowed in section 135.110. The taxpayer
must elect among the options. To perfect the election, the taxpayer shall attach
written notification of such election to the taxpayer's initial application for
claiming tax credits. The election shall be irreversible once perfected.
5. A taxpayer shall not receive the income exemption described in
section 135.276 and the tax credits described in subsection 1 of this section for
any year in which the terms and conditions of sections 135.276 to 135.283 are
not met. Such incentives shall not exceed the fifteen-year limitation pursuant
to subsection 1 of section 135.230 or the seven-year limitation pursuant to
subsection 5 of section 135.230.
6. The initial application for claiming tax credits must be made in the
taxpayer's tax period immediately following the tax period in which
commencement of commercial operations began at the new business facility.
7. Credits may not be carried forward but shall be claimed for the
taxable year during which continuation of commercial operations occurs at
such retained business facility, and for each of the nine succeeding taxable
years.]
[135.281. 1. Any taxpayer operating an approved retained business
facility that is located within a state enterprise zone established pursuant to
sections 135.200 to 135.256 may make an application to the department of
economic development for an income tax refund.
2. Such refunds shall be approved only if the amount of tax credits
certified for the taxpayer in the taxable year exceeded the company's total
Missouri tax on taxable income in that year by an amount equal to at least one
million dollars. In such cases, a portion of tax credits earned shall constitute
an overpayment of taxes and may be refunded to the taxpayer in the manner
authorized by this section.
3. The department shall evaluate and may approve such applications
based upon the importance of the approved retained business facility to the

HCS HB 3092 104
economy of Missouri, the company's investment of at least five hundred
million dollars in facilities or equipment, and the number of jobs to be created
or retained. Such applications may be approved annually for no longer than
five successive years. The maximum amount of refund that may be awarded
to the manufacturer or assembler shall not exceed two million dollars per year.
Notwithstanding other provisions of law to the contrary, if the taxpayer's tax
credits issued under sections 135.276 to 135.283 for a taxable year exceed the
taxpayer's taxable income by more than two million dollars, the credits may be
carried forward for five years or until used, whichever is earlier, and may be
included in refund amounts otherwise authorized by this section.]
[135.283. 1. A taxpayer shall apply to the department for approval to
participate in the program authorized by sections 135.276 to 135.283. The
application shall be in a form prescribed by and contain all information
requested by the department to determine eligibility for the program and for
the department to make its decision whether to approve the taxpayer for
participation in the program.
2. The department may issue an approval contingent upon the
successful execution of an agreement between the department and the taxpayer
seeking approval of a facility as a retained business facility which shall
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) A detailed description of the project that is the subject of the
agreement;
(2) A requirement that the taxpayer shall annually report to the
department the total amount of salaries and wages paid to eligible employees
in retained business facility jobs, and any other information the department
requires to confirm compliance with the requirements of sections 135.276 to
135.283;
(3) A requirement that the taxpayer shall provide written notification
to the director not more than thirty days after the taxpayer makes or receives a
proposal that would transfer the taxpayer's state tax liability obligations to a
successor taxpayer;
(4) A requirement that the taxpayer shall maintain operations at the
facility location for at least ten years at a certain employment level;
(5) The requirements otherwise required by sections 135.276 to
135.283; and
(6) A provision for repayment of incentives upon breach of the
agreement.]
[135.313. 1. Any person, firm or corporation who engages in the
business of producing charcoal or charcoal products in the state of Missouri
shall be eligible for a tax credit on income taxes otherwise due pursuant to
chapter 143, except sections 143.191 to 143.261, as an incentive to implement
safe and efficient environmental controls. The tax credit shall be equal to fifty
percent of the purchase price of the best available control technology
equipment connected with the production of charcoal in the state of Missouri
or, if the taxpayer manufactures such equipment, fifty percent of the
manufacturing cost of the equipment, to and including the year the

HCS HB 3092 105
equipment is put into service. The credit may be claimed for a period of eight
years beginning with the 1998 calendar year and is to be a tax credit against
the tax otherwise due.
2. Any amount of credit which exceeds the tax due shall not be
refunded but may be carried over to any subsequent taxable year, not to exceed
seven years.
3. The charcoal producer may elect to assign to a third party the
approved tax credit. Certification of assignment and other appropriate forms
must be filed with the Missouri department of revenue and the department of
economic development.
4. When applying for a tax credit, the charcoal producer specified in
subsection 1 of this section shall make application for the credit to the division
of environmental quality of the department of natural resources. The
application shall identify the specific best available control technology
equipment and the purchase price, or manufacturing cost of such equipment.
The director of the department of natural resources is authorized to require
permits to construct prior to the installation of best available control
technology equipment and other information which he or she deems
appropriate.
5. The director of the department of natural resources in conjunction
with the department of economic development shall certify to the department
of revenue that the best available control technology equipment meets the
requirements to obtain a tax credit as specified in this section.]
[135.545. A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit for taxes paid pursuant
to chapter 143, 147 or 148 in an amount equal to fifty percent of a qualified
investment in transportation development for aviation, mass transportation,
including parking facilities for users of mass transportation, railroads, ports,
including parking facilities and limited access roads within ports, waterborne
transportation, bicycle and pedestrian paths, or rolling stock located in a
distressed community as defined in section 135.530, and which are part of a
development plan approved by the appropriate local agency. If the department
of economic development determines the investment has been so approved,
the department shall grant the tax credit in order of date received. A taxpayer
may carry forward any unused tax credit for up to ten years and may carry it
back for the previous three years until such credit has been fully claimed.
Certificates of tax credit issued in accordance with this section may be
transferred, sold or assigned by notarized endorsement which names the
transferee. The tax credits allowed pursuant to this section shall be for an
amount of no more than ten million dollars for each year. This credit shall
apply to returns filed for all taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
1999. Any unused portion of the tax credit authorized pursuant to this section
shall be available for use in the future by those entities until fully claimed. For
purposes of this section, a "taxpayer" shall include any charitable organization
that is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated business
taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143.]

HCS HB 3092 106
[135.546. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, no
tax credits shall be approved, awarded, or issued to any person or entity
claiming any tax credit under section 135.545; if an organization has been
allocated credits for contribution-based credits prior to January 1, 2005, the
organization may issue such credits prior to January 1, 2007, for qualified
contributions.]
[135.680. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adjusted purchase price", the product of:
(a) The amount paid to the issuer of a qualified equity investment for
such qualified equity investment; and
(b) The following fraction:
a. The numerator shall be the dollar amount of qualified low-income
community investments held by the issuer in this state as of the credit
allowance date during the applicable tax year; and
b. The denominator shall be the total dollar amount of qualified low-
income community investments held by the issuer in all states as of the credit
allowance date during the applicable tax year;
c. For purposes of calculating the amount of qualified low-income
community investments held by an issuer, an investment shall be considered
held by an issuer even if the investment has been sold or repaid; provided that
the issuer reinvests an amount equal to the capital returned to or recovered by
the issuer from the original investment, exclusive of any profits realized, in
another qualified low-income community investment within twelve months of
the receipt of such capital. An issuer shall not be required to reinvest capital
returned from qualified low-income community investments after the sixth
anniversary of the issuance of the qualified equity investment, the proceeds of
which were used to make the qualified low-income community investment,
and the qualified low-income community investment shall be considered held
by the issuer through the seventh anniversary of the qualified equity
investment's issuance;
(2) "Applicable percentage", zero percent for each of the first two
credit allowance dates, seven percent for the third credit allowance date, and
eight percent for the next four credit allowance dates;
(3) "Credit allowance date", with respect to any qualified equity
investment:
(a) The date on which such investment is initially made; and
(b) Each of the six anniversary dates of such date thereafter;
(4) "Long-term debt security", any debt instrument issued by a
qualified community development entity, at par value or a premium, with an
original maturity date of at least seven years from the date of its issuance, with
no acceleration of repayment, amortization, or prepayment features prior to its
original maturity date, and with no distribution, payment, or interest features
related to the profitability of the qualified community development entity or
the performance of the qualified community development entity's investment
portfolio. The foregoing shall in no way limit the holder's ability to accelerate
payments on the debt instrument in situations where the issuer has defaulted

HCS HB 3092 107
on covenants designed to ensure compliance with this section or Section 45D
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(5) "Qualified active low-income community business", the meaning
given such term in Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended; provided that any business that derives or projects to derive fifteen
percent or more of its annual revenue from the rental or sale of real estate shall
not be considered to be a qualified active low-income community business;
(6) "Qualified community development entity", the meaning given
such term in Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
provided that such entity has entered into an allocation agreement with the
Community Development Financial Institutions Fund of the U.S. Treasury
Department with respect to credits authorized by Section 45D of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which includes the state of Missouri
within the service area set forth in such allocation agreement;
(7) "Qualified equity investment", any equity investment in, or long-
term debt security issued by, a qualified community development entity that:
(a) Is acquired after September 4, 2007, at its original issuance solely
in exchange for cash;
(b) Has at least eighty-five percent of its cash purchase price used by
the issuer to make qualified low-income community investments; and
(c) Is designated by the issuer as a qualified equity investment under
this subdivision and is certified by the department of economic development
as not exceeding the limitation contained in subsection 2 of this section. This
term shall include any qualified equity investment that does not meet the
provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivision if such investment was a
qualified equity investment in the hands of a prior holder;
(8) "Qualified low-income community investment", any capital or
equity investment in, or loan to, any qualified active low-income community
business. With respect to any one qualified active low-income community
business, the maximum amount of qualified low-income community
investments made in such business, on a collective basis with all of its
affiliates, that may be used from the calculation of any numerator described in
subparagraph a. of paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
ten million dollars whether issued to one or several qualified community
development entities;
(9) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter
143, excluding withholding tax imposed in sections 143.191 to 143.265, or
otherwise due under section 375.916 or chapter 147, 148, or 153;
(10) "Taxpayer", any individual or entity subject to the tax imposed in
chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed in sections 143.191 to
143.265, or the tax imposed in section 375.916 or chapter 147, 148, or 153.
2. A taxpayer that makes a qualified equity investment earns a vested
right to tax credits under this section. On each credit allowance date of such
qualified equity investment the taxpayer, or subsequent holder of the qualified
equity investment, shall be entitled to a tax credit during the taxable year
including such credit allowance date. The tax credit amount shall be equal to
the applicable percentage of the adjusted purchase price paid to the issuer of
such qualified equity investment. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall

HCS HB 3092 108
not exceed the amount of the taxpayer's state tax liability for the tax year for
which the tax credit is claimed. No tax credit claimed under this section shall
be refundable or transferable. Tax credits earned by a partnership, limited
liability company, S-corporation, or other pass-through entity may be allocated
to the partners, members, or shareholders of such entity for their direct use in
accordance with the provisions of any agreement among such partners,
members, or shareholders. Any amount of tax credit that the taxpayer is
prohibited by this section from claiming in a taxable year may be carried
forward to any of the taxpayer's five subsequent taxable years. The
department of economic development shall limit the monetary amount of
qualified equity investments permitted under this section to a level necessary
100 to limit tax credit utilization at no more than twenty-five million dollars of tax
101 credits in any fiscal year. Such limitation on qualified equity investments shall
102 be based on the anticipated utilization of credits without regard to the potential
103 for taxpayers to carry forward tax credits to later tax years.
104 3. The issuer of the qualified equity investment shall certify to the
105 department of economic development the anticipated dollar amount of such
106 investments to be made in this state during the first twelve-month period
107 following the initial credit allowance date. If on the second credit allowance
108 date, the actual dollar amount of such investments is different than the amount
109 estimated, the department of economic development shall adjust the credits
110 arising on the second allowance date to account for such difference.
111 4. The department of economic development shall recapture the tax
112 credit allowed under this section with respect to such qualified equity
113 investment under this section if:
114 (1) Any amount of the federal tax credit available with respect to a
115 qualified equity investment that is eligible for a tax credit under this section is
116 recaptured under Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
117 amended; or
118 (2) The issuer redeems or makes principal repayment with respect to a
119 qualified equity investment prior to the seventh anniversary of the issuance of
120 such qualified equity investment. Any tax credit that is subject to recapture
121 shall be recaptured from the taxpayer that claimed the tax credit on a return.
122 5. The department of economic development shall promulgate rules to
123 implement the provisions of this section, including recapture provisions on a
124 scaled proportional basis, and to administer the allocation of tax credits issued
125 for qualified equity investments, which shall be conducted on a first-come,
126 first-serve basis. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
127 section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
128 shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
129 provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
130 chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
131 assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
132 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
133 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
134 September 4, 2007, shall be invalid and void.
135 6. For fiscal years following fiscal year 2010, qualified equity
136 investments shall not be made under this section unless reauthorization is

HCS HB 3092 109
137 made pursuant to this subsection. For all fiscal years following fiscal year
138 2010, unless the general assembly adopts a concurrent resolution granting
139 authority to the department of economic development to approve qualified
140 equity investments for the Missouri new markets development program and
141 clearly describing the amount of tax credits available for the next fiscal year,
142 or otherwise complies with the provisions of this subsection, no qualified
143 equity investments may be permitted to be made under this section. The
144 amount of available tax credits contained in such a resolution shall not exceed
145 the limitation provided under subsection 2 of this section. In any year in
146 which the provisions of this section shall sunset pursuant to subsection 7 of
147 this section, reauthorization shall be made by general law and not by
148 concurrent resolution. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a taxpayer
149 who makes a qualified equity investment prior to the expiration of authority to
150 make qualified equity investments from claiming tax credits relating to such
151 qualified equity investment for each applicable credit allowance date.
152 7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
153 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
154 shall automatically sunset six years after September 4, 2007, unless
155 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
156 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
157 section shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the
158 reauthorization of this section; and
159 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
160 immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
161 under this section is sunset. However, nothing in this subsection shall preclude
162 a taxpayer who makes a qualified equity investment prior to sunset of this
163 section under the provisions of section 23.253 from claiming tax credits
164 relating to such qualified equity investment for each credit allowance date.]
[135.682. 1. The director of the department of economic development
or the director's designee shall issue letter rulings regarding the tax credit
program authorized under section 135.680, subject to the terms and conditions
set forth in this section. The director of the department of economic
development may impose additional terms and conditions consistent with this
section to requests for letter rulings by regulation promulgated under chapter
536. For the purposes of this section, the term "letter ruling" means a written
interpretation of law to a specific set of facts provided by the applicant
requesting a letter ruling.
2. The director or director's designee shall respond to a request for a
letter ruling within sixty days of receipt of such request. The applicant may
provide a draft letter ruling for the department's consideration. The applicant
may withdraw the request for a letter ruling, in writing, prior to the issuance of
the letter ruling. The director or the director's designee may refuse to issue a
letter ruling for good cause, but must list the specific reasons for refusing to
issue the letter ruling. Good cause includes, but is not limited to:
(1) The applicant requests the director to determine whether a statute
is constitutional or a regulation is lawful;
(2) The request involves a hypothetical situation or alternative plans;

HCS HB 3092 110
(3) The facts or issues presented in the request are unclear, overbroad,
insufficient, or otherwise inappropriate as a basis upon which to issue a letter
ruling; and
(4) The issue is currently being considered in a rulemaking procedure,
contested case, or other agency or judicial proceeding that may definitely
resolve the issue.
3. Letter rulings shall bind the director and the director's agents and
their successors until such time as the taxpayer or its shareholders, members,
or partners, as applicable, claim all of such tax credits on a Missouri tax return,
subject to the terms and conditions set forth in properly published regulations.
The letter ruling shall apply only to the applicant.
4. Letter rulings issued under the authority of this section shall not be a
rule as defined in section 536.010 in that it is an interpretation issued by the
department with respect to a specific set of facts and intended to apply only to
that specific set of facts, and therefore shall not be subject to the rulemaking
requirements of chapter 536.
5. Information in letter ruling requests as described in section 620.014
shall be closed to the public. Copies of letter rulings shall be available to the
public provided that the applicant identifying information and otherwise
protected information is redacted from the letter ruling as provided in
subsection 1 of section 610.024.]
[135.710. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Alternative fuel vehicle refueling property", property in this state
owned by an eligible applicant and used for storing alternative fuels and for
dispensing such alternative fuels into fuel tanks of motor vehicles owned by
such eligible applicant or private citizens;
(2) "Alternative fuels", any motor fuel at least seventy percent of the
volume of which consists of one or more of the following:
(a) Ethanol;
(b) Natural gas;
(c) Compressed natural gas, or CNG;
(d) Liquified natural gas, or LNG;
(e) Liquified petroleum gas, or LP gas, propane, or autogas;
(f) Any mixture of biodiesel and diesel fuel, without regard to any use
of kerosene;
(g) Hydrogen;
(3) "Department", the department of economic development;
(4) "Electric vehicle recharging property", property in this state owned
by an eligible applicant and used for recharging electric motor vehicles owned
by such eligible applicant or private citizens;
(5) "Eligible applicant", a business entity or private citizen that is the
owner of an electric vehicle recharging property or an alternative fuel vehicle
refueling property;
(6) "Qualified Missouri contractor", a contractor whose principal place
of business is located in Missouri and has been located in Missouri for a period
of not less than five years;

HCS HB 3092 111
(7) "Qualified property", an electric vehicle recharging property or an
alternative fuel vehicle refueling property which, if constructed after August
28, 2014, was constructed with at least fifty-one percent of the costs being paid
to qualified Missouri contractors for the:
(a) Fabrication of premanufactured equipment or process piping used
in the construction of such facility;
(b) Construction of such facility; and
(c) General maintenance of such facility during the time period in
which such facility receives any tax credit under this section.

If no qualified Missouri contractor is located within seventy-five miles of the
property, the requirement that fifty-one percent of the costs shall be paid to
qualified Missouri contractors shall not apply.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, but before
January 1, 2018, any eligible applicant who installs and operates a qualified
property shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter
143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections 143.191 to 143.265, or
due under chapter 147 or chapter 148 for any tax year in which the applicant is
constructing the qualified property. The credit allowed in this section per
eligible applicant who is a private citizen shall not exceed fifteen hundred
dollars or per eligible applicant that is a business entity shall not exceed the
lesser of twenty thousand dollars or twenty percent of the total costs directly
associated with the purchase and installation of any alternative fuel storage and
dispensing equipment or any recharging equipment on any qualified property,
which shall not include the following:
(1) Costs associated with the purchase of land upon which to place a
qualified property;
(2) Costs associated with the purchase of an existing qualified
property; or
(3) Costs for the construction or purchase of any structure.
3. Tax credits allowed by this section shall be claimed by the eligible
applicant at the time such applicant files a return for the tax year in which the
storage and dispensing or recharging facilities were placed in service at a
qualified property, and shall be applied against the income tax liability
imposed by chapter 143, chapter 147, or chapter 148 after all other credits
provided by law have been applied. The cumulative amount of tax credits
which may be claimed by eligible applicants claiming all credits authorized in
this section shall not exceed one million dollars in any calendar year, subject to
appropriations.
4. If the amount of the tax credit exceeds the eligible applicant's tax
liability, the difference shall not be refundable. Any amount of credit that an
eligible applicant is prohibited by this section from claiming in a taxable year
may be carried forward to any of such applicant's two subsequent taxable
years. Tax credits allowed under this section may be assigned, transferred,
sold, or otherwise conveyed.
5. Any qualified property, for which an eligible applicant receives tax
credits under this section, which ceases to sell alternative fuel or recharge
electric vehicles shall cause the forfeiture of such eligible applicant's tax

HCS HB 3092 112
credits provided under this section for the taxable year in which the qualified
property ceased to sell alternative fuel or recharge electric vehicles and for
future taxable years with no recapture of tax credits obtained by an eligible
applicant with respect to such applicant's tax years which ended before the sale
of alternative fuel or recharging of electric vehicles ceased.
6. The director of revenue shall establish the procedure by which the
tax credits in this section may be claimed, and shall establish a procedure by
which the cumulative amount of tax credits is apportioned equally among all
eligible applicants claiming the credit. To the maximum extent possible, the
director of revenue shall establish the procedure described in this subsection in
such a manner as to ensure that eligible applicants can claim all the tax credits
possible up to the cumulative amount of tax credits available for the taxable
year. No eligible applicant claiming a tax credit under this section shall be
liable for any interest or penalty for filing a tax return after the date fixed for
filing such return as a result of the apportionment procedure under this
subsection.
7. Any eligible applicant desiring to claim a tax credit under this
section shall submit the appropriate application for such credit with the
department. The application for a tax credit under this section shall include
any information required by the department. The department shall review the
applications and certify to the department of revenue each eligible applicant
that qualifies for the tax credit.
8. The department and the department of revenue may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
100 subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
101 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
102 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
103 delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
104 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
105 proposed or adopted after August 28, 2008, shall be invalid and void.
106 9. The provisions of section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act
107 notwithstanding:
108 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
109 shall automatically sunset three years after December 31, 2014, unless
110 reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
111 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
112 section shall automatically sunset six years after the effective date of the
113 reauthorization of this section; and
114 (3) This section shall terminate on December thirty-first of the
115 calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program
116 authorized under this section is sunset; and
117 (4) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit or
118 in any way impair the department's ability to redeem tax credits authorized on
119 or before the date the program authorized under this section expires or a
120 taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.]

HCS HB 3092 113
[135.766. An eligible small business, as defined in Section 44 of the
Internal Revenue Code, shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due
pursuant to chapter 143, not including sections 143.191 to 143.265, in an
amount equal to any amount paid by the eligible small business to the United
States Small Business Administration as a guaranty fee pursuant to obtaining
Small Business Administration guaranteed financing and to programs
administered by the United States Department of Agriculture for rural
development or farm service agencies. No tax credits provided under this
section shall be authorized on or after the thirtieth day following the effective
date of this act. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to
limit or in any way impair the department's ability to issue tax credits
authorized prior to the thirtieth day following the effective date of this act, or a
taxpayer's ability to redeem such tax credits.]
[135.980. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "NAICS", the classification provided by the most recent edition of
the North American Industry Classification System as prepared by the
Executive Office of the President, Office of Management and Budget;
(2) "Public financial incentive", any economic or financial incentive
offered including:
(a) Any tax reduction, credit, forgiveness, abatement, subsidy, or other
tax-relieving measure;
(b) Any tax increment financing or similar financial arrangement;
(c) Any monetary or nonmonetary benefit related to any bond, loan, or
similar financial arrangement;
(d) Any reduction, credit, forgiveness, abatement, subsidy, or other
relief related to any bond, loan, or similar financial arrangement; and
(e) The ability to form, own, direct, or receive any economic or
financial benefit from any special taxation district.
2. No city not within a county shall by ballot measure impose any
restriction on any public financial incentive authorized by statute for a
business with a NAICS code of 212111.
3. The provisions of this section shall expire on December 31, 2017.]
[136.450. 1. There is hereby established the "Study Commission on
State Tax Policy" which shall be composed of the following members:
(1) The members of the joint committee on tax policy established in
section 21.810;
(2) The state treasurer;
(3) The state budget director;
(4) The director of the department of revenue, but only if such person
has been appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate
in accordance with Article IV, Section 51 of the Constitution of Missouri;
(5) Three individuals representing the needs and concerns of
individual taxpayers in this state, one of whom shall be appointed by the
lieutenant governor, one of whom shall be appointed by the minority floor
leader of the house of representatives, and one of whom shall be appointed by
the minority floor leader of the senate;

HCS HB 3092 114
(6) A certified public accountant, who shall be appointed by the
lieutenant governor in consultation with the Missouri Society of Certified
Public Accountants;
(7) An independent tax practitioner, who shall be appointed by the
lieutenant governor in consultation with the Missouri Society of Accountants;
(8) An individual with experience operating a business with a
headquarters in this state and fewer than fifty employees, who shall be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(9) An individual with experience operating a business with a
headquarters in this state and at least fifty employees, who shall be appointed
by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(10) Two individuals with significant experience in state and local
taxation, public or private budgeting and finance, or public services delivery,
one of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives
in consultation with the Missouri Association of Counties and the other
appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate in consultation with
Missouri Municipal League; and
(11) A member of the Missouri Bar with knowledge of the tax laws of
this state, including tax administration and compliance, who shall be appointed
by the board of governors of the Missouri Bar.
2. Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled in the same manner
as the original appointment. Any appointed member of the commission shall
serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Commission members shall
serve without compensation but shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual
and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.
3. The commission shall meet in the capitol building within ten days
after its creation and organize by selecting a chair and vice chair from its
members. After its organization, the commission shall adopt an agenda
establishing at least five hearing dates. The hearings shall be held in different
geographic regions of the state and open to the public. Additional meetings
may be scheduled and held as often as the chair deems advisable. A majority
of the members shall constitute a quorum.
4. It shall be the duty of the commission:
(1) To make a complete, detailed review and study of the tax structure
of the state and its political subdivisions, including tax sources, the impact of
taxes, collection procedures, administrative regulations, and all other factors
pertinent to the fiscal operation of the state;
(2) To identify the strengths and weaknesses of state tax laws, and
develop a broad range of improvements that could be made to modernize the
tax system, maximize economic development and growth, and maintain
necessary government services at an appropriate level;
(3) To investigate measures and methods to simplify state tax law,
improve tax compliance, and reduce administrative costs; and
(4) To examine and study any other aspects of state and local
government which may be related to the tax structure of the state.
5. In order to carry out its duties and responsibilities under this section,
the commission shall have the authority to:

HCS HB 3092 115
(1) Consult with public and private universities and academies, public
and private organizations, and private citizens in the performance of its duties;
(2) Within the limits of appropriations made for such purpose, employ
consultants or others to assist the commission in its work, or contract with
public and private entities for analysis and study of current or proposed
changes to state and local tax policy; and
(3) Make reasonable requests for staff assistance from the research and
appropriations staffs of the house of representatives and senate and the
committee on legislative research, as well as the office of administration and
the department of revenue.
6. All state agencies and political subdivisions of the state responsible
for the administration of tax policies shall cooperate with and assist the
commission in the performance of its duties and shall make available all
books, records, and information requested, except such books, records, and
information as are by law declared confidential in nature, including
individually identifiable information regarding a specific taxpayer.
7. The commission may issue interim reports as it deems fit, but it
shall provide the governor and the general assembly with reports of its
findings and recommendations for legal and administrative changes, along
with any proposed legislation the commission recommends for adoption by the
general assembly. A preliminary report shall be due by December 31, 2016. A
final report shall be due December 31, 2017.
8. The commission shall cease all activities by January 1, 2018. This
section shall expire August 28, 2018.]
[142.1000. 1. There is hereby created within the department of
revenue the "Electric Vehicle Task Force" to consist of the following members:
(1) The director of the department of revenue, or his or her designee,
who shall serve as chair;
(2) The chairman of the public service commission, or his or her
designee, who shall serve as vice chair;
(3) The director of the department of transportation, or his or her
designee;
(4) One member of the senate committee with jurisdiction over
transportation matters, to be appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
(5) One member of the house of representatives committee with
jurisdiction over transportation matters, to be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(6) One member of the senate committee with jurisdiction over
transportation matters, to be appointed by the minority floor leader of the
senate;
(7) One member of the house of representatives committee with
jurisdiction over transportation matters, to be appointed by the minority floor
leader of the house of representatives;
(8) One representative of the trucking or heavy vehicle industry, to be
appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate;

HCS HB 3092 116
(9) One representative of electric vehicle manufacturers or dealers, to
be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(10) One representative of conventional motor vehicle manufacturers
or dealers, to be appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(11) One representative of the petroleum industry or convenience
stores, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(12) One representative of electric vehicle charging station
manufacturers or operators, to be appointed by the president pro tempore of
the senate; and
(13) One representative of electric utilities, to be appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives.
2. The task force shall analyze the following in the context of
transportation funding, and make recommendations as to any actions the state
should take to fund transportation infrastructure in anticipation of more
widespread adoption of electric vehicles:
(1) Removal or mitigation of barriers to electric vehicle charging,
including strategies, such as time-of-use rates, to reduce operating costs for
current and future electric vehicle owners without shifting costs to electric
ratepayers who do not own or operate electric vehicles;
(2) Strategies for managing the impact of electric vehicles on, and
services provided for electric vehicles by, the electricity transmission and
distribution system;
(3) Electric system benefits and costs of electric vehicle charging,
electric utility planning for electric vehicle charging, and rate design for
electric vehicle charging;
(4) The appropriate role of electric utilities with regard to the
deployment and operation of electric vehicle charging systems;
(5) How and on what terms, including quantity, pricing, and time of
day, charging stations owned or operated by entities other than electric utilities
will obtain electricity to provide to electric vehicles;
(6) What safety standards should apply to the charging of electric
vehicles;
(7) The recommended scope of the jurisdiction of the public service
commission, the department of revenue, and other state agencies over charging
stations owned or operated by entities other than electric utilities;
(8) Whether charging stations owned or operated by entities other than
electric utilities will be free to set the rates or prices at which they provide
electricity to electric vehicles, and any other issues relevant to the appropriate
oversight of the rates and prices charged by such stations, including
transparency to the consumer of those rates and prices; and
(9) The recommended billing and complaint procedures for charging
stations;
(10) Options to address how electric vehicle users pay toward the cost
of maintaining the state's transportation infrastructure, including methods to
assess the impact of electric vehicles on that infrastructure and how to
calculate a charge based on that impact, the potential assessment of a charge to
electric vehicles as a rate per kilowatt hour delivered to an electric vehicle,

HCS HB 3092 117
varying such per-kilowatt-hour charge by size and type of electric vehicle, and
phasing in such per-kilowatt-hour charge;
(11) The accuracy of electric metering and submetering technology for
charging electric vehicles;
(12) Strategies to encourage electric vehicle usage without shifting
costs to electric ratepayers who do not own or charge electric vehicles; and
(13) Any other issues the task force considers relevant.
3. The department of revenue shall provide such research, clerical,
technical, and other services as the task force may require in the performance
of its duties.
4. The task force may hold public meetings at which it may invite
testimony from experts, or it may solicit information from any party it deems
may have information relevant to its duties under this section.
5. No later than December 31, 2022, the task force shall provide to the
general assembly and the governor a written report detailing its findings and
recommendations, including identifying any recommendations that may
require enabling legislation.
6. Members shall serve on the task force without compensation, but
may, at the discretion of the director of the department of revenue, be
reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of
their official duties as members of the task force.
7. The task force shall expire on December 31, 2022.]
[143.173. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "County average wage", the average wages in each county as
determined by the department of economic development for the most recently
completed full calendar year. However, if the computed county average wage
is above the statewide average wage, the statewide average wage shall be
deemed the county average wage for such county for the purpose of this
section;
(2) "Deduction", an amount subtracted from the taxpayer's Missouri
adjusted gross income to determine Missouri taxable income, or federal
taxable income in the case of a corporation, for the tax year in which such
deduction is claimed;
(3) "Full-time employee", a position in which the employee is
considered full-time by the taxpayer and is required to work an average of at
least thirty-five hours per week for a fifty-two week period;
(4) "New job", the number of full-time employees employed by the
small business in Missouri on the qualifying date that exceeds the number of
full-time employees employed by the small business in Missouri on the same
date of the immediately preceding taxable year;
(5) "Qualifying date", any date during the tax year as chosen by the
small business;
(6) "Small business", any small business, including any sole
proprietorship, partnership, S-corporation, C-corporation, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, or other business entity, consisting of
fewer than fifty full- or part-time employees;

HCS HB 3092 118
(7) "Taxpayer", any small business subject to the income tax imposed
in this chapter, including any sole proprietorship, partnership, S-corporation,
C-corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or other
business entity.
2. In addition to all deductions listed in this chapter, for all taxable
years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, and ending on or before
December 31, 2014, a taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction for each new job
created by the small business in the taxable year. Tax deductions allowed to
any partnership, limited liability company, S-corporation, or other pass-
through entity may be allocated to the partners, members, or shareholders of
such entity for their direct use in accordance with the provisions of any
agreement among such partners, members, or shareholders. The deduction
amount shall be as follows:
(1) Ten thousand dollars for each new job created with an annual
salary of at least the county average wage; or
(2) Twenty thousand dollars for each new job created with an annual
salary of at least the county average wage if the small business offers health
insurance and pays at least fifty percent of such insurance premiums.
3. The department of revenue shall establish the procedure by which
the deduction provided in this section may be claimed, and may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly under chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2011, shall be invalid and void.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first three years after August 28,
2011, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first three years after the
effective date of the reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]
[143.732. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no
taxpayer who has an individual tax liability under chapter 143 for the tax year
beginning January 1, 2018, and ending December 31, 2018, shall be assessed
any penalty before December 31, 2019, for a delayed payment or
underpayment on such liability, provided that such taxpayer timely files his
or her individual income tax return for such tax year and participates, in good
faith, in any payment plan authorized by the department of revenue with
respect to such liability. Such taxpayer may nonetheless be assessed interest

HCS HB 3092 119
on such liability under the provisions of section 143.731 and any other relevant
provision of law, provided that no interest on such liability shall be assessed
before May 15, 2019. If such taxpayer paid interest or penalty on such liability
under the provisions of section 143.731 and any other relevant provision of
law before May 15, 2019, he or she shall be entitled to a refund of such interest
or penalty, which shall be due no later than December 31, 2019.
2. The department of revenue is authorized to adopt such rules and
regulations as are reasonable and necessary to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after July 11,
2019, shall be invalid and void.
3. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset on December 31, 2019; and
(2) This section shall terminate on December thirty-first of the
calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program
authorized under this section is sunset.]
[143.1008. 1. In each taxable year beginning on or after January 1,
2008, each individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount
sufficient to make a designation under this section may designate that one
dollar or any amount in excess of one dollar on a single return, and two dollars
or any amount in excess of two dollars on a combined return, of the refund due
be credited to the after-school retreat reading and assessment grant program
fund. The contribution designation authorized by this section shall be clearly
and unambiguously printed on the first page of each income tax return form
provided by this state. If any individual or corporation that is not entitled to a
tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a designation under this section
wishes to make a contribution to the after-school retreat reading and
assessment grant program fund, such individual or corporation may, by
separate check, draft, or other negotiable instrument, send in with the payment
of taxes, or may send in separately, that amount, clearly designated for the
after-school retreat reading and assessment grant program fund, the individual
or corporation wishes to contribute. The department of revenue shall deposit
such amount to the after-school retreat reading and assessment grant program
fund as provided in subsection 2 of this section.
2. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the after-school retreat reading and assessment grant
program fund. The fund shall be administered by the department of
elementary and secondary education with moneys in the fund distributed as
provided under section 167.680.

HCS HB 3092 120
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by the corporations under this section, less an
amount sufficient to cover the cost of collection, handling, and administration
by the department of revenue during fiscal year 2008, to the after-school
retreat reading and assessment grant program fund.
4. A contribution designated under this section shall only be deposited
in the after-school retreat reading and assessment grant program fund after all
other claims against the refund from which such contribution is to be made
have been satisfied.
5. Moneys deposited in the after-school retreat reading and assessment
grant program fund shall be distributed by the department of elementary and
secondary education in accordance with the provisions of this section and
section 167.680.
6. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same
manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
7. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset six years after August 28, 2007, unless reauthorized
by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on December thirty-first of the
calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program
authorized under this section is sunset.]
[143.1009. 1. In each taxable year beginning on or after January 1,
2008, each individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount
sufficient to make a designation under this section may designate that one
dollar or any amount in excess of one dollar on a single return, and two dollars
or any amount in excess of two dollars on a combined return, of the refund due
be credited to the breast cancer awareness trust fund, hereinafter referred to as
the trust fund. If any individual or corporation that is not entitled to a tax
refund in an amount sufficient to make a designation under this section wishes
to make a contribution to the trust fund, such individual or corporation may, by
separate check, draft, or other negotiable instrument, send in with the payment
of taxes, or may send in separately, that amount, clearly designated for the
breast cancer awareness trust fund, the individual or corporation wishes to
contribute. The department of revenue shall deposit such amount to the trust
fund as provided in subsections 2 and 3 of this section. All moneys credited to
the trust fund shall be considered nonstate funds under the provisions of
Article IV, Section 15 of the Missouri Constitution.
2. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the trust fund.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by the corporations under this section, less an

HCS HB 3092 121
amount sufficient to cover the costs of collection and handling by the
department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the trust fund.
4. A contribution designated under this section shall only be deposited
in the trust fund after all other claims against the refund from which such
contribution is to be made have been satisfied.
5. All moneys transferred to the trust fund shall be distributed by the
director of revenue at times the director deems appropriate to the department
of health and senior services. Such funds shall be used solely for the purpose
of providing breast cancer services. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the trust fund at the end of any biennium
shall not be transferred to the credit of the general revenue fund.
6. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Breast Cancer
Awareness Trust Fund", which shall consist of money collected under this
section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset six years after August 28, 2008, unless reauthorized
by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on December thirty-first of the
calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program
authorized under this section is sunset.]
[143.1013. 1. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2011, each individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount
sufficient to make a designation under this section may designate that one
dollar or any amount in excess of one dollar on a single return, and two dollars
or any amount in excess of two dollars on a combined return, of the refund due
be credited to the American Red Cross trust fund. If any individual or
corporation that is not entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a
designation under this section wishes to make a contribution to the fund, such
individual or corporation may, by separate check, draft, or other negotiable
instrument, send in with the payment of taxes, or may send in separately, that
amount the individual or corporation wishes to contribute. Such amounts shall
be clearly designated for the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "American Red
Cross Trust Fund", which shall consist of money collected under this section.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, money in the fund shall be
used solely for the administration of this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund
at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue
fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner
as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such

HCS HB 3092 122
investments shall be credited to the fund. All moneys credited to the trust fund
shall be considered nonstate funds under Section 15, Article IV, Constitution
of Missouri. The treasurer shall distribute all moneys deposited in the fund at
times the treasurer deems appropriate to the American Red Cross.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director of revenue shall deposit at
least monthly all contributions designated by the corporations under this
section, less an amount sufficient to cover the costs of collection and handling
by the department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the fund. A
contribution designated under this section shall only be deposited in the fund
after all other claims against the refund from which such contribution is to be
made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first six years after August 28,
2011, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first twelve years after
the effective date of the reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]
[143.1014. 1. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2011, each individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount
sufficient to make a designation under this section may designate that one
dollar or any amount in excess of one dollar on a single return, and two dollars
or any amount in excess of two dollars on a combined return, of the refund due
be credited to the puppy protection trust fund. If any individual or corporation
that is not entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to make a designation
under this section wishes to make a contribution to the fund, such individual or
corporation may, by separate check, draft, or other negotiable instrument, send
in with the payment of taxes, or may send in separately, that amount the
individual or corporation wishes to contribute. Such amounts shall be clearly
designated for the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Puppy Protection
Trust Fund", which shall consist of money collected under this section. The
state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, money in the fund shall be
used solely for the state department of agriculture's administration of section
273.345. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any
moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the
credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in
the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and
moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund. All moneys
credited to the trust fund shall be considered nonstate funds under Section 15,

HCS HB 3092 123
Article IV, Constitution of Missouri. The treasurer shall distribute all moneys
deposited in the fund at times the treasurer deems appropriate to the
department of agriculture.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director of revenue shall deposit at
least monthly all contributions designated by the corporations under this
section, less an amount sufficient to cover the costs of collection and handling
by the department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the fund. A
contribution designated under this section shall only be deposited in the fund
after all other claims against the refund from which such contribution is to be
made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first six years after August 28,
2011, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first twelve years after
the effective date of the reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]
[143.1017. 1. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2011, each individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount
sufficient to make a designation under this section may designate that one
dollar or any amount in excess of one dollar on a single return, and two dollars
or any amount in excess of two dollars on a combined return, of the refund due
be credited to the developmental disabilities waiting list equity trust fund. If
any individual or corporation that is not entitled to a tax refund in an amount
sufficient to make a designation under this section wishes to make a
contribution to the fund, such individual or corporation may, by separate
check, draft, or other negotiable instrument, send in with the payment of taxes,
or may send in separately, that amount the individual or corporation wishes to
contribute. Such amounts shall be clearly designated for the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Developmental
Disabilities Waiting List Equity Trust Fund", which shall consist of money
collected under this section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund.
In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, money in the fund shall be used solely for the administration of
this section and for providing community services and support to people with
developmental disabilities and such person's families who are on the
developmental disabilities waiting list and are eligible for but not receiving
services. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any
moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the
credit of the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in
the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and

HCS HB 3092 124
moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund. All moneys
credited to the trust fund shall be considered nonstate funds under Section 15,
Article IV, Constitution of Missouri. The treasurer shall distribute all moneys
deposited in the fund at times the treasurer deems appropriate to the
department of mental health. The moneys in the developmental disabilities
waiting list equity trust fund established in this subsection shall not be
appropriated in lieu of general state revenues.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director of revenue shall deposit at
least monthly all contributions designated by the corporations under this
section, less an amount sufficient to cover the costs of collection and handling
by the department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the fund. A
contribution designated under this section shall only be deposited in the fund
after all other claims against the refund from which such contribution is to be
made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first six years after August 28,
2011, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first twelve years after
the effective date of the reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]
[143.1027. 1. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2014, each individual or corporation entitled to a tax refund in an amount
sufficient to make a designation under this section may designate that one
dollar or any amount in excess of one dollar on a single return, and two dollars
or any amount in excess of two dollars on a combined return, of the refund due
be credited to the Missouri National Guard Foundation fund. If any individual
or corporation that is not entitled to a tax refund in an amount sufficient to
make a designation under this section wishes to make a contribution to the
fund, such individual or corporation may, by separate check, draft, or other
negotiable instrument, send in with the payment of taxes, or may send in
separately, that amount the individual or corporation wishes to contribute.
Such amounts shall be clearly designated for the fund.
2. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri National
Guard Foundation Fund", which shall consist of money collected under this
section. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, money in the fund
shall be used solely for the administration of this section. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund
at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue
fund. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner

HCS HB 3092 125
as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund. The treasurer shall distribute all
moneys deposited in the fund at least monthly to the Missouri National Guard
Foundation.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit at least monthly all
contributions designated by individuals under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit to the fund. The director of revenue shall deposit at
least monthly all contributions designated by the corporations under this
section, less an amount sufficient to cover the costs of collection and handling
by the department of revenue, to the state treasury for deposit to the fund. A
contribution designated under this section shall only be deposited in the fund
after all other claims against the refund from which such contribution is to be
made have been satisfied.
4. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first six years after August 28,
2014, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset on December thirty-first twelve years after
the effective date of the reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]
[143.1100. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Bring Jobs Home Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Business unit":
(a) Any trade or business; and
(b) Any line of business or function unit which is part of any trade or
business;
(2) "Deduction":
(a) For individuals, an amount subtracted from the taxpayer's Missouri
adjusted gross income to determine Missouri taxable income for the tax year in
which such deduction is claimed; and
(b) For corporations, an amount subtracted from the taxpayer's federal
taxable income to determine Missouri taxable income for the tax year in which
such deduction is claimed;
(3) "Department", the department of economic development;
(4) "Eligible expenses":
(a) Any amount for which a deduction is allowed to the taxpayer under
Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(b) Permit and license fees, lease brokerage fees, equipment
installation costs, and other similar expenses;
(5) "Eligible insourcing expenses":
(a) Eligible expenses paid or incurred by the taxpayer in connection
with the elimination of any business unit of the taxpayer or of any member of

HCS HB 3092 126
any expanded affiliated group in which the taxpayer is also a member located
outside the state of Missouri; and
(b) Eligible expenses paid or incurred by the taxpayer in connection
with the establishment of any business unit of the taxpayer or of any member
of any expanded affiliated group in which the taxpayer is also a member
located within the state of Missouri if such establishment constitutes the
relocation of the business unit so eliminated.

For purposes of this subdivision, expenses shall be eligible if such elimination
of the business unit in another state or country occurs in a different taxable
year from the establishment of the business unit in Missouri;
(6) "Expanded affiliated group", an affiliated group as defined under
Section 1504(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except to
be determined without regard to Section 1504(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, and determined by substituting "at least eighty
percent" with "more than fifty percent" each place the phrase appears under
Section 1504(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. A
partnership or any other entity other than a corporation shall be treated as a
member of an expanded affiliated group if such entity is controlled by
members of such group including any entity treated as a member of such group
by reason of this subdivision;
(7) "Full-time equivalent employee", a number of employees equal to
the number determined by dividing the total number of hours of service for
which wages were paid by the employer to employees during the taxable year,
by two thousand eighty;
(8) "Insourcing plan", a written plan to carry out the establishment of a
business unit in Missouri;
(9) "Taxpayer", any individual, firm, partner in a firm, corporation,
partnership, shareholder in an S corporation, or member of a limited liability
company subject to the income tax imposed under this chapter, excluding
withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265.
3. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, a
taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction equal to fifty percent of the taxpayer's
eligible insourcing expenses in the taxable year chosen under subsection 5 of
this section. The amount of the deduction claimed shall not exceed the amount
of:
(1) For individuals, the taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income for
the taxable year the deduction is claimed; and
(2) For corporations, the taxpayer's Missouri taxable income for the
taxable year the deduction is claimed.

However, any amount of the deduction that cannot be claimed in the taxable
year may be carried over to the next five succeeding taxable years until the full
deduction has been claimed.
4. No deduction shall be allowed under this section until the
department determines that the number of full-time equivalent employees of
the taxpayer in the taxable year the deduction is claimed exceeds the number

HCS HB 3092 127
of full-time equivalent employees of the taxpayer in the taxable year prior to
the taxpayer incurring any eligible insourcing expenses.
5. Only eligible insourcing expenses that occur in the taxable year
such expenses are paid or incurred and:
(1) The taxpayer's insourcing plan is completed; or
(2) The first taxable year after the taxpayer's insourcing plan is
completed;

shall be used to calculate the deduction allowed under this section.
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no
deduction shall be allowed for any expenses incurred due to dissolving a
business unit in Missouri and relocating such business unit to another state.
7. The total amount of deductions authorized under this section shall
not exceed five million dollars in any taxable year. In the event that more than
five million dollars in deductions are claimed in a taxable year, deductions
shall be issued on a first-come, first-served filing basis.
8. A taxpayer who receives a deduction under the provisions of this
section shall be ineligible to receive incentives under the provisions of any
other state tax deduction program for the same expenses incurred.
9. Any taxpayer allowed a deduction under this section who, within
ten years of receiving such deduction, eliminates the business unit for which
the deduction was allowed shall repay the amount of tax savings realized from
the deduction to the state, prorated by the number of years the business unit
was in this state.
10. The department of economic development and the department of
revenue shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.
Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536
100 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
101 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
102 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
103 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
104 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2016,
105 shall be invalid and void.
106 11. Under section 23.253:
107 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
108 shall automatically sunset six years after August 28, 2016, unless reauthorized
109 by an act of the general assembly; and
110 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
111 section shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the
112 reauthorization of this section; and
113 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
114 immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
115 under this section is sunset.]
[161.825. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Bryce's
Law".

HCS HB 3092 128
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Autism spectrum disorder", pervasive developmental disorder;
Asperger syndrome; childhood disintegrative disorder; Rett syndrome; and
autism;
(2) "Contribution", a donation of cash, stock, bonds, or other
marketable securities, or real property;
(3) "Department", the department of elementary and secondary
education;
(4) "Director", the commissioner of education;
(5) "Dyslexia therapy", an appropriate specialized dyslexia
instructional program that is systematic, multisensory, and research-based
offered in a small group setting to teach students the components of reading
instruction including but not limited to phonemic awareness, graphophonemic
knowledge, morphology, semantics, syntax, and pragmatics, instruction on
linguistic proficiency and fluency with patterns of language so that words and
sentences are carriers of meaning, and strategies that students use for
decoding, encoding, word recognition, fluency and comprehension delivered
by qualified personnel;
(6) "Educational scholarships", grants to students or children to cover
all or part of the tuition and fees at a qualified nonpublic school, a qualified
public school, or a qualified service provider, including transportation;
(7) "Eligible child", any child from birth to age five living in Missouri
who has an individualized family services program under the first steps
program, sections 160.900 to 160.933, and whose parent or guardian has
completed the complaint procedure under the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act, Part C, and has received an unsatisfactory response; or any
child from birth to age five who has been evaluated for qualifying needs as
defined in this section by a person qualified to perform evaluations under the
first steps program and has been determined to have a qualifying need but who
falls below the threshold for eligibility by no less than twenty-five percent;
(8) "Eligible student", any elementary or secondary student who
attended public school in Missouri the preceding semester, or who will be
attending school in Missouri for the first time, who has an individualized
education program based on a qualifying needs condition or who has a medical
or clinical diagnosis by a qualified health professional of a qualifying needs
condition which in the case of dyslexia, may be based on the C-TOPP
assessment as an initial indicator of dyslexia and confirmed by further medical
or clinical diagnosis;
(9) "Parent", includes a guardian, custodian, or other person with
authority to act on behalf of the student or child;
(10) "Program", the program established in this section;
(11) "Qualified health professional", a person licensed under chapter
334 or 337 who possesses credentials as described in rules promulgated jointly
by the department of elementary and secondary education and the department
of mental health to make a diagnosis of a student's qualifying needs for this
program;
(12) "Qualified school", either an accredited public elementary or
secondary school in a district that is accredited without provision outside of

HCS HB 3092 129
the district in which a student resides or an accredited nonpublic elementary or
secondary school in Missouri that complies with all of the requirements of the
program and complies with all state laws that apply to nonpublic schools
regarding criminal background checks for employees and excludes from
employment any person not permitted by state law to work in a nonpublic
school;
(13) "Qualified service provider", a person or agency authorized by
the department to provide services under the first steps program, sections
160.900 to 160.933, and in the case of a provider offering dyslexia therapy, the
term also includes a person with national certification as an academic language
therapist;
(14) "Qualifying needs", an autism spectrum disorder, Down
Syndrome, Angelman Syndrome, cerebral palsy, or dyslexia;
(15) "Scholarship granting organization", a charitable organization
that:
(a) Is exempt from federal income tax;
(b) Complies with the requirements of this program;
(c) Provides education scholarships to students attending qualified
schools of their parents' choice or to children receiving services from qualified
service providers; and
(d) Does not accept contributions on behalf of any eligible student or
eligible child from any donor with any obligation to provide any support for
the eligible student or eligible child.
3. The department of elementary and secondary education shall
develop a master list of resources available to the parents of children with an
autism spectrum disorder or dyslexia and shall maintain a web page for the
information. The department shall also actively seek financial resources in the
form of grants and donations that may be devoted to scholarship funds or to
clinical trials for behavioral interventions that may be undertaken by qualified
service providers. The department may contract out or delegate these duties to
a nonprofit organization. Priority in referral for funding shall be given to
children who have not yet entered elementary school.
4. The director shall determine, at least annually, which organizations
in this state may be classified as scholarship granting organizations. The
director may require of an organization seeking to be classified as a
scholarship granting organization whatever information that is reasonably
necessary to make such a determination. The director shall classify an
organization as a scholarship granting organization if such organization meets
the definition set forth in this section.
5. The director shall establish a procedure by which a donor can
determine if an organization has been classified as a scholarship granting
organization. Scholarship granting organizations shall be permitted to decline
a contribution from a donor.
6. Each scholarship granting organization shall provide information to
the director concerning the identity of each donor making a contribution to the
scholarship granting organization.
7. (1) The director shall annually make a determination on the number
of students in Missouri with an individualized education program based upon

HCS HB 3092 130
qualifying needs as defined in this section. The director shall use ten percent
100 of this number to determine the maximum number of students to receive
101 scholarships from a scholarship granting organization in that year for students
102 with qualifying needs who have at the time of application an individualized
103 education program, plus a number calculated by the director by applying the
104 state's latest available autism, cerebral palsy, Down Syndrome, Angelman
105 Syndrome, and dyslexia incidence rates to the state's population of children
106 from age five to nineteen who are not enrolled in public schools and taking ten
107 percent of that number. The total of these two calculations shall constitute the
108 maximum number of scholarships available to students.
109 (2) The director shall also annually make a determination on the
110 number of children in Missouri whose parent or guardian has enrolled the
111 child in first steps, received an individualized family services program based
112 on qualifying needs, and filed a complaint through the Individuals with
113 Disabilities Education Act, Part C, and received an unsatisfactory response. In
114 addition to this number, the director shall apply the latest available autism,
115 cerebral palsy, Down Syndrome, Angelman Syndrome, and dyslexia incidence
116 rates to the latest available census information for children from birth to age
117 five and determine ten percent of that number for the maximum number of
118 scholarships for children.
119 (3) The director shall publicly announce the number of each category
120 of scholarship opportunities available each year. Once a scholarship granting
121 organization has decided to provide a student or child with a scholarship, it
122 shall promptly notify the director. The director shall keep a running tally of
123 the number of scholarships granted in the order in which they were reported.
124 Once the tally reaches the annual limit of scholarships for eligible students or
125 children, the director shall notify all of the participating scholarship granting
126 organizations that they shall not issue any more scholarships and any more
127 receipts for contributions. If the scholarship granting organizations have not
128 expended all of their available scholarship funds in that year at the time when
129 the limit is reached, the available scholarship funds may be carried over into
130 the next year. These unexpended funds shall not be counted as part of the
131 requirement in subdivision (3) of subsection 8 of this section for that year.
132 Any receipt for a scholarship contribution issued by a scholarship granting
133 organization before the director has publicly announced the student or child
134 limit has been reached shall be valid. Beginning with school year 2016-17, the
135 director may adjust the allocation of the proportion of scholarships using
136 information on unmet need and use patterns from the previous school years.
137 The director shall provide notice of the change to the state board of education
138 for its approval.
139 8. Each scholarship granting organization participating in the program
140 shall:
141 (1) Notify the department of its intent to provide educational
142 scholarships to students attending qualified schools or children receiving
143 services from qualified service providers;
144 (2) Provide a department-approved receipt to donors for contributions
145 made to the organization;

HCS HB 3092 131
146 (3) Ensure that at least ninety percent of its revenue from donations is
147 spent on educational scholarships, and that all revenue from interest or
148 investments is spent on educational scholarships;
149 (4) Ensure that the scholarships provided do not exceed an average of
150 twenty thousand dollars per eligible child or fifty thousand dollars per eligible
151 student;
152 (5) Inform the parent or guardian of the student or child applying for a
153 scholarship that accepting the scholarship is tantamount to a parentally placed
154 private school student pursuant to 34 CFR 300.130 and, thus, neither the
155 department nor any Missouri public school is responsible to provide the
156 student with a free appropriate public education pursuant to the Individuals
157 with Disabilities Education Act or Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of
158 1973;
159 (6) Distribute periodic scholarship payments as checks made out to a
160 student's or child's parent and mailed to the qualified school where the student
161 is enrolled or qualified service provider used by the child. The parent or
162 guardian shall endorse the check before it can be deposited;
163 (7) Cooperate with the department to conduct criminal background
164 checks on all of its employees and board members and exclude from
165 employment or governance any individual who might reasonably pose a risk to
166 the appropriate use of contributed funds;
167 (8) Ensure that scholarships are portable during the school year and
168 can be used at any qualified school that accepts the eligible student or at a
169 different qualified service provider for an eligible child according to a parent's
170 wishes. If a student moves to a new qualified school during a school year or to
171 a different qualified service provider for an eligible child, the scholarship
172 amount may be prorated;
173 (9) Demonstrate its financial accountability by:
174 (a) Submitting a financial information report for the organization that
175 complies with uniform financial accounting standards established by the
176 department and conducted by a certified public accountant; and
177 (b) Having the auditor certify that the report is free of material
178 misstatements;
179 (10) Demonstrate its financial viability, if the organization is to receive
180 donations of fifty thousand dollars or more during the school year, by filing
181 with the department before the start of the school year:
182 (a) A surety bond payable to the state in an amount equal to the
183 aggregate amount of contributions expected to be received during the school
184 year; or
185 (b) Financial information that demonstrates the financial viability of
186 the scholarship granting organization.
187 9. Each scholarship granting organization shall ensure that each
188 participating school or service provider that accepts its scholarship students or
189 children shall:
190 (1) Comply with all health and safety laws or codes that apply to
191 nonpublic schools or service providers;
192 (2) Hold a valid occupancy permit if required by its municipality;

HCS HB 3092 132
193 (3) Certify that it will comply with 42 U.S.C. Section 1981, as
194 amended;
195 (4) Provide academic accountability to parents of the students or
196 children in the program by regularly reporting to the parent on the student's or
197 child's progress;
198 (5) Certify that in providing any educational services or behavior
199 strategies to a scholarship recipient with a medical or clinical diagnosis of or
200 an individualized education program based upon autism spectrum disorder it
201 will:
202 (a) Adhere to the best practices recommendations of the Missouri
203 Autism Guidelines Initiative or document why it is varying from the
204 guidelines;
205 (b) Not use any evidence-based interventions that have been found
206 ineffective by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as described in
207 the Missouri Autism Guidelines Initiative guide to evidence-based
208 interventions; and
209 (c) Provide documentation in the student's or child's record of the
210 rationale for the use of any intervention that is categorized as unestablished,
211 insufficient evidence, or level 3 by the Missouri Autism Guidelines Initiative
212 guide to evidence-based interventions; and
213 (6) Certify that in providing any educational services or behavior
214 strategies to a scholarship recipient with a medical or clinical diagnosis of, or
215 an individualized family services program based upon Down Syndrome,
216 Angelman Syndrome, cerebral palsy, or dyslexia, it will use student, teacher,
217 teaching, and school influences that rank in the zone of desired effects in the
218 meta-analysis of John Hattie, or equivalent analyses as determined by the
219 department, or document why it is using a method that has not been
220 determined by analysis to rank in the zone of desired effects.
221 10. Scholarship granting organizations shall not provide educational
222 scholarships for students to attend any school or children to receive services
223 from any qualified service provider with paid staff or board members who are
224 relatives within the first degree of consanguinity or affinity.
225 11. A scholarship granting organization shall publicly report to the
226 department, by June first of each year, the following information prepared by a
227 certified public accountant regarding its grants in the previous calendar year:
228 (1) The name and address of the scholarship granting organization;
229 (2) The total number and total dollar amount of contributions received
230 during the previous calendar year; and
231 (3) The total number and total dollar amount of educational
232 scholarships awarded during the previous calendar year, including the
233 category of each scholarship, and the total number and total dollar amount
234 of educational scholarships awarded during the previous year to students
235 eligible for free and reduced lunch.
236 12. The department shall adopt rules and regulations consistent with
237 this section as necessary to implement the program.
238 13. The department shall provide a standardized format for a receipt to
239 be issued by a scholarship granting organization to a donor to indicate the
240 value of a contribution received.

HCS HB 3092 133
241 14. The department shall provide a standardized format for scholarship
242 granting organizations to report the information in this section.
243 15. The department may conduct either a financial review or audit of a
244 scholarship granting organization.
245 16. If the department believes that a scholarship granting organization
246 has intentionally and substantially failed to comply with the requirements of
247 this section, the department may hold a hearing before the director or the
248 director's designee to bar a scholarship granting organization from
249 participating in the program. The director or the director's designee shall
250 issue a decision within thirty days. A scholarship granting organization may
251 appeal the director's decision to the administrative hearing commission for a
252 hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 621.
253 17. If the scholarship granting organization is barred from
254 participating in the program, the department shall notify affected scholarship
255 students or children and their parents of this decision within fifteen days.
256 18. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
257 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
258 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
259 of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
260 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
261 assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
262 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
263 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
264 28, 2013, shall be invalid and void.
265 19. The department shall conduct a study of the program with funds
266 other than state funds. The department may contract with one or more
267 qualified researchers who have previous experience evaluating similar
268 programs. The department may accept grants to assist in funding this study.
269 20. The study shall assess:
270 (1) The level of participating students' and children's satisfaction with
271 the program in a manner suitable to the student or child;
272 (2) The level of parental satisfaction with the program;
273 (3) The percentage of participating students who were bullied or
274 harassed because of their special needs status at their resident school district
275 compared to the percentage so bullied or harassed at their qualified school;
276 (4) The percentage of participating students who exhibited behavioral
277 problems at their resident school district compared to the percentage exhibiting
278 behavioral problems at their qualified school;
279 (5) The class size experienced by participating students at their
280 resident school district and at their qualified school; and
281 (6) The fiscal impact to the state and resident school districts of the
282 program.
283 21. The study shall be completed using appropriate analytical and
284 behavioral sciences methodologies to ensure public confidence in the study.
285 22. The department shall provide the general assembly with a final
286 copy of the evaluation of the program by December 31, 2016.
287 23. The public and nonpublic participating schools and service
288 providers from which students transfer to participate in the program shall

HCS HB 3092 134
289 cooperate with the research effort by providing student or child assessment
290 instrument scores and any other data necessary to complete this study.
291 24. The general assembly may require periodic updates on the status of
292 the study from the department. The individuals completing the study shall
293 make their data and methodology available for public review while complying
294 with the requirements of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, as
295 amended.
296 25. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
297 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
298 shall sunset automatically on December 31, 2019, unless reauthorized by an
299 act of the general assembly; and
300 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
301 section shall sunset automatically on December 31, 2031; and
302 (3) This section shall terminate on December thirty-first of the
303 calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the program
304 authorized under this section is sunset.]
[161.1055. 1. Subject to appropriations, the department of elementary
and secondary education shall establish the "Trauma-Informed Schools Pilot
Program".
2. Under the trauma-informed schools pilot program, the department
of elementary and secondary education shall choose five schools to receive
intensive training on the trauma-informed approach.
3. The five schools chosen for the pilot program shall be located in the
following areas:
(1) One public school located in a metropolitan school district;
(2) One public school located in a home rule city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county;
(3) One public school located in a school district that has most or all of
its land area located in a county with a charter form of government and with
more than nine hundred fifty thousand inhabitants;
(4) One public school located in a school district that has most or all of
its land area located in a county with a charter form of government and with
more than six hundred thousand but fewer than seven hundred thousand
inhabitants; and
(5) One public school located in any one of the following counties:
(a) A county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than forty-one thousand but fewer than forty-five
thousand inhabitants;
(b) A county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than six thousand but fewer than seven thousand
inhabitants and with a city of the fourth classification with more than eight
hundred but fewer than nine hundred inhabitants as the county seat;
(c) A county of the third classification with a township form of
government and with more than thirty-one thousand but fewer than thirty-five
thousand inhabitants;
(d) A county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than sixteen

HCS HB 3092 135
thousand inhabitants and with a city of the third classification with more than
five thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants as the county seat;
(e) A county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty
thousand inhabitants and with a city of the fourth classification with more than
three thousand but fewer than three thousand seven hundred inhabitants as the
county seat;
(f) A county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty
thousand inhabitants and with a city of the third classification with more than
six thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants as the county seat;
(g) A county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than fourteen thousand but fewer than sixteen
thousand inhabitants and with a city of the fourth classification with more than
one thousand nine hundred but fewer than two thousand one hundred
inhabitants as the county seat;
(h) A county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than thirty-seven thousand but fewer than forty-one
thousand inhabitants and with a city of the fourth classification with more than
eight hundred but fewer than nine hundred inhabitants as the county seat;
(i) A county of the third classification with a township form of
government and with more than twenty-eight thousand but fewer than thirty-
one thousand inhabitants; or
(j) A county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than twelve thousand but fewer than fourteen
thousand inhabitants and with a city of the fourth classification with more than
five hundred but fewer than five hundred fifty inhabitants as the county seat.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall:
(1) Train the teachers and administrators of the five schools chosen for
the pilot program regarding the trauma-informed approach and how to become
trauma-informed schools;
(2) Provide the five schools with funds to implement the trauma-
informed approach; and
(3) Closely monitor the progress of the five schools in becoming
trauma-informed schools and provide further assistance if necessary.
5. The department of elementary and secondary education shall
terminate the trauma-informed schools pilot program on August 28, 2019.
Before December 31, 2019, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall submit a report to the general assembly that contains the results
of the pilot program, including any benefits experienced by the five schools
chosen for the program.
6. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Trauma-
Informed Schools Pilot Program Fund". The fund shall consist of any
appropriations to such fund. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund.
In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements of public moneys in accordance with distribution
requirements and procedures developed by the department of elementary and
secondary education. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon

HCS HB 3092 136
appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used solely for the administration of
this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary,
any moneys remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to
the credit of the general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same
manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
7. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Trauma-informed approach", an approach that involves
understanding and responding to the symptoms of chronic interpersonal
trauma and traumatic stress across the lifespan;
(2) "Trauma-informed school", a school that:
(a) Realizes the widespread impact of trauma and understands
potential paths for recovery;
(b) Recognizes the signs and symptoms of trauma in students,
teachers, and staff;
(c) Responds by fully integrating knowledge about trauma into its
policies, procedures, and practices; and
(d) Seeks to actively resist retraumatization.
100 8. The provisions of this section shall expire December 31, 2019.]
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established the "Career Readiness Course
Task Force" to explore the possibility of a course covering the topics described
in this section being offered in the public schools to students in eighth grade or
ninth grade. Task force members shall be chosen to represent the geographic
diversity of the state. All task force members shall be appointed before
October 31, 2018. The task force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending elementary school, appointed by
the joint committee on education;
(2) A parent of a student attending a grade not lower than the sixth nor
higher than the eighth grade, appointed by the joint committee on education;
(3) A parent of a student attending high school, appointed by the joint
committee on education;
(4) An elementary education professional from an accredited school
district, appointed by the joint committee on education from names submitted
by statewide education employee organizations;
(5) Two education professionals giving instruction in a grade or grades
not lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in accredited school
districts, appointed by the joint committee on education from names submitted
by statewide education employee organizations;
(6) Two secondary education professionals from accredited school
districts, appointed by the joint committee on education from names submitted
by statewide education employee organizations;
(7) A career and technical education professional who has experience
serving as an advisor to a statewide career and technical education
organization, appointed by a statewide career and technical education
organization;

HCS HB 3092 137
(8) An education professional from an accredited technical high
school, appointed by a statewide career and technical education organization;
(9) A public school board member, appointed by a statewide
association of school boards;
(10) A secondary school principal, appointed by a statewide
association of secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade, appointed by a statewide
association of secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor, appointed by a statewide
association of school counselors;
(13) Two school counselors from a school giving instruction in a grade
or grades not lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade, appointed
by a statewide association of school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor, appointed by a statewide
association of school counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college counselor, appointed by a
statewide association of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional, appointed by the division of
workforce development of economic development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project Lead the Way, appointed by
the statewide Project Lead the Way organization;
(18) A representative of the state technical college, appointed by the
state technical college;
(19) A representative of a public community college, appointed by a
statewide organization of community colleges; and
(20) A representative of a public four-year institution of higher
education, appointed by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force established under subsection 1 of this
section shall elect a chair from among the membership of the task force. The
task force shall meet as needed to complete its consideration of the course
described in subsection 5 of this section and provide its findings and
recommendations as described in subsection 6 of this section. Members of the
task force shall serve without compensation. No school district policy or
administrative action shall require any education employee member to use
personal leave or incur a reduction in pay for participating on the task force.
3. The task force shall hold at least three public hearings to provide an
opportunity to receive public testimony including, but not limited to, testimony
from educators, local school boards, parents, representatives from business
and industry, labor and community leaders, members of the general assembly,
and the general public.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall
provide such legal, research, clerical, and technical services as the task force
may require in the performance of its duties.
5. The task force established under subsection 1 of this section shall
consider a course that:
(1) Gives students an opportunity to explore various career and
educational opportunities by:

HCS HB 3092 138
(a) Administering career surveys to students and helping students use
Missouri Connections to determine their career interests and develop plans to
meet their career goals;
(b) Explaining the differences between types of colleges, including
two-year and four-year colleges and noting the availability of registered
apprenticeship programs as alternatives to college for students;
(c) Describing technical degrees offered by colleges;
(d) Explaining the courses and educational experiences offered at
community colleges;
(e) Describing the various certificates and credentials available to earn
at the school or other schools including, but not limited to, career and technical
education certificates described under section 170.029 and industry-
recognized certificates and credentials;
(f) Advising students of any advanced placement courses that they
may take at the school;
(g) Describing any opportunities at the school for dual enrollment;
(h) Advising students of any Project Lead the Way courses offered at
the school and explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help students
learn valuable skills;
(i) Informing students of the availability of funding for postsecondary
education through the A+ schools program described under section 160.545;
(j) Describing the availability of virtual courses;
(k) Describing the types of skills and occupations most in demand in
the current job market and those skills and occupations likely to be in high
demand in future years;
100 (l) Describing the typical salaries for occupations, salary trends, and
101 opportunities for advancement in various occupations;
102 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities available in careers involving
103 science, technology, engineering, and math;
104 (n) Advising students of the resources offered by workforce or job
105 centers;
106 (o) Preparing students for the ACT assessment or the ACT WorkKeys
107 assessments required for the National Career Readiness Certificate;
108 (p) Administering a practice ACT assessment or practice ACT
109 WorkKeys assessments required for the National Career Readiness Certificate
110 to students;
111 (q) Advising students of opportunities to take the SAT and the Armed
112 Services Vocational Aptitude Battery;
113 (r) Administering a basic math test to students so that they can assess
114 their math skills;
115 (s) Administering a basic writing test to students so that they can
116 assess their writing skills;
117 (t) Helping each student prepare a personal plan of study that outlines
118 a sequence of courses and experiences that concludes with the student reaching
119 his or her postsecondary goals; and
120 (u) Explaining how to complete college applications and the Free
121 Application for Federal Student Aid;

HCS HB 3092 139
122 (2) Focuses on career readiness and emphasizes the importance of
123 work ethic, communication, collaboration, critical thinking, and creativity;
124 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a four-year college is not the
125 only pathway to success by describing to students at least sixteen pathways to
126 success in detail and including guest visitors who represent each pathway
127 described. In exploring how these pathways could be covered in the course,
128 the task force shall consider how instructors for the course may be able to rely
129 on assistance from Missouri's career pathways within the department of
130 elementary and secondary education;
131 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
132 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
133 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force established under
134 subsection 1 of this section shall present its findings and recommendations to
135 the speaker of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the
136 senate, the joint committee on education, and the state board of education.
137 Upon presenting the findings and recommendations as described in this
138 subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
[167.910. 1. There is hereby established the "Career Readiness Course
Task Force" to explore the possibility of a course covering the topics described
in this section being offered in the public schools to students in eighth grade or
ninth grade. Task force members shall be chosen to represent the geographic
diversity of the state. All task force members shall be appointed before
October 31, 2018. The task force members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) A parent of a student attending elementary school, appointed by a
statewide association of parents and teachers;
(2) A parent of a student attending a grade not lower than the sixth nor
higher than the eighth grade, appointed by a statewide association of parents
and teachers;
(3) A parent of a student attending high school, appointed by a
statewide association of parents and teachers;
(4) An elementary education professional from an accredited school
district, appointed by agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education Association, and the American
Federation of Teachers of Missouri;
(5) An education professional giving instruction in a grade or grades
not lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade in an accredited
school district, appointed by agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education Association, and the American
Federation of Teachers of Missouri;
(6) A secondary education professional from an accredited school
district, appointed by agreement among the Missouri State Teachers
Association, the Missouri National Education Association, and the American
Federation of Teachers of Missouri;
(7) A career and technical education professional who has experience
serving as an advisor to a statewide career and technical education
organization, appointed by a statewide career and technical education
organization;

HCS HB 3092 140
(8) An education professional from an accredited technical high
school, appointed by a statewide career and technical education organization;
(9) A public school board member, appointed by a statewide
association of school boards;
(10) A secondary school principal, appointed by a statewide
association of secondary school principals;
(11) A principal of a school giving instruction in a grade or grades not
lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade, appointed by a statewide
association of secondary school principals;
(12) An elementary school counselor, appointed by a statewide
association of school counselors;
(13) A school counselor from a school giving instruction in a grade or
grades not lower than the sixth nor higher than the eighth grade, appointed by
a statewide association of school counselors;
(14) A secondary school counselor, appointed by a statewide
association of school counselors;
(15) A secondary school career and college counselor, appointed by a
statewide association of school counselors;
(16) An apprenticeship professional, appointed by the division of
workforce development of the department of economic development;
(17) A representative of Missouri Project Lead the Way, appointed by
the statewide Project Lead the Way organization;
(18) A representative of the State Technical College of Missouri,
appointed by the State Technical College of Missouri;
(19) A representative of a public community college, appointed by a
statewide organization of community colleges; and
(20) A representative of a public four-year institution of higher
education, appointed by the commissioner of higher education.
2. The members of the task force established under subsection 1 of this
section shall elect a chair from among the membership of the task force. The
task force shall meet as needed to complete its consideration of the course
described in subsection 5 of this section and provide its findings and
recommendations as described in subsection 6 of this section. Members of the
task force shall serve without compensation. No school district policy or
administrative action shall require any education employee member to use
personal leave or incur a reduction in pay for participating on the task force.
3. The task force shall hold at least three public hearings to provide an
opportunity to receive public testimony including, but not limited to, testimony
from educators, local school boards, parents, representatives from business
and industry, labor and community leaders, members of the general assembly,
and the general public.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education shall
provide such legal, research, clerical, and technical services as the task force
may require in the performance of its duties.
5. The task force established under subsection 1 of this section shall
consider a course that:
(1) Gives students an opportunity to explore various career and
educational opportunities by:

HCS HB 3092 141
(a) Administering career surveys to students and helping students use
Missouri Connections to determine their career interests and develop plans to
meet their career goals;
(b) Explaining the differences between types of colleges, including
two-year and four-year colleges, and noting the availability of registered
apprenticeship programs as alternatives to college for students;
(c) Describing technical degrees offered by colleges;
(d) Explaining the courses and educational experiences offered at
community colleges;
(e) Describing the various certificates and credentials available to earn
at the school or other schools including, but not limited to, career and technical
education certificates described under section 170.029 and industry-
recognized certificates and credentials;
(f) Advising students of any advanced placement courses that they
may take at the school;
(g) Describing any opportunities at the school for dual enrollment;
(h) Advising students of any Project Lead the Way courses offered at
the school and explaining how Project Lead the Way courses help students
learn valuable skills;
(i) Informing students of the availability of funding for postsecondary
education through the A+ schools program described under section 160.545;
100 (j) Describing the availability of virtual courses;
101 (k) Describing the types of skills and occupations most in demand in
102 the current job market and those skills and occupations likely to be in high
103 demand in future years;
104 (l) Describing the typical salaries for occupations, salary trends, and
105 opportunities for advancement in various occupations;
106 (m) Emphasizing the opportunities available in careers involving
107 science, technology, engineering, and math;
108 (n) Advising students of the resources offered by workforce or job
109 centers;
110 (o) Preparing students for the ACT assessment or the ACT WorkKeys
111 assessments required for the National Career Readiness Certificate;
112 (p) Administering a practice ACT assessment or practice ACT
113 WorkKeys assessments required for the National Career Readiness Certificate
114 to students;
115 (q) Advising students of opportunities to take the SAT and the Armed
116 Services Vocational Aptitude Battery;
117 (r) Administering a basic math test to students so that they can assess
118 their math skills;
119 (s) Administering a basic writing test to students so that they can
120 assess their writing skills;
121 (t) Helping each student prepare a personal plan of study that outlines
122 a sequence of courses and experiences that concludes with the student reaching
123 his or her postsecondary goals; and
124 (u) Explaining how to complete college applications and the Free
125 Application for Federal Student Aid;

HCS HB 3092 142
126 (2) Focuses on career readiness and emphasizes the importance of
127 work ethic, communication, collaboration, critical thinking, and creativity;
128 (3) Demonstrates that graduation from a four-year college is not the
129 only pathway to success by describing to students at least sixteen pathways to
130 success in detail and including guest visitors who represent each pathway
131 described. In exploring how these pathways could be covered in the course,
132 the task force shall consider how instructors for the course may be able to rely
133 on assistance from Missouri Career Pathways within the department of
134 elementary and secondary education;
135 (4) Provides student loan counseling; and
136 (5) May include parent-student meetings.
137 6. Before December 1, 2019, the task force established under
138 subsection 1 of this section shall present its findings and recommendations to
139 the speaker of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the
140 senate, the joint committee on education, and the state board of education.
141 Upon presenting the findings and recommendations as described in this
142 subsection, the task force shall dissolve.]
[171.034. Any school district that is eligible to reduce its requirement
to make up days pursuant to subsection 3 of section 171.033 may provide food
service on a summer school food service basis if it resumes school with double
sessions.]
[172.287. 1. The University of Missouri shall annually request an
appropriation under capital improvements, subject to availability of funds, for
a program of grants established for the engineering colleges of the University
of Missouri for the purpose of assisting such colleges in the purchase of
teaching and research laboratory equipment exclusive of laboratory or
classroom furniture. The amount granted for each engineering college may
not exceed the lesser of an amount equal to one thousand two hundred dollars
per each such bachelor's degree awarded in the previous fiscal year in all
engineering programs currently accredited by the accreditation board for
engineering and technology, or the dollar value of new funds for equipment
purchase which such colleges may obtain from sources other than state
appropriations for laboratory equipment.
2. For purposes of this section, the fair market value of in-kind
contributions of laboratory equipment to the colleges may be included as funds
for equipment purchase from sources other than state appropriations. In the
event that new funds for laboratory equipment purchase obtained by any
college of engineering from such nonstate sources exceed the amount
necessary to reach the maximum dollar limits herein specified, such excess
amounts will be carried over to the following fiscal year and considered the
same as that year's new equipment funds from nonstate sources.
3. In the event that the appropriations for this grant program are
insufficient to fund all grants approved for a given fiscal year, all such grants
shall be reduced pro rata as necessary.
4. The provisions of this section shall terminate on June 30, 2017.]

HCS HB 3092 143
[173.196. 1. Any business firm, as defined in section 32.105, may
make a donation to the "Missouri Higher Education Scholarship Donation
Fund", which is hereby created in the state treasury. A donating business firm
shall receive a tax credit as provided in this section equal to fifty percent of the
amount of the donation, except that tax credits shall be awarded each fiscal
year in the order donations are received and the amount of tax credits
authorized shall total no more than two hundred and fifty thousand dollars for
each fiscal year.
2. The department of revenue shall grant tax credits approved under
this section which shall be applied in the order specified in subsection 1 of
section 32.115 until used. The tax credits provided under this section shall be
refundable, and any tax credit not used in the fiscal year in which approved
may be carried over the next five succeeding calendar or fiscal years until the
full credit has been claimed. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
any tax credits granted under this section may be assigned, transferred, sold, or
otherwise conveyed without consent or approval. Such taxpayer, hereinafter
the assignor for purposes of this section, may sell, assign, exchange, or
otherwise transfer earned tax credits:
(1) For no less than seventy-five percent of the par value of such
credits; and
(2) In an amount not to exceed one hundred percent of annual earned
credits.
3. No tax credit authorized under this section may be applied against
any tax applied in a tax year beginning prior to January 1, 1995.
4. All revenues credited to the fund shall be used, subject to
appropriations, to provide scholarships authorized under sections 173.197 to
173.199, and for no other purpose.
5. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, no tax
credits shall be authorized, awarded, or issued to any person or entity claiming
any tax credit under this section.]
[173.236. 1. As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Board", the coordinating board for higher education;
(2) "Grant", the Vietnam veteran's survivors grant as established in this
section;
(3) "Institution of postsecondary education", any approved public or
private institution as defined in section 173.205;
(4) "Survivor", a child or spouse of a Vietnam veteran as defined in
this section;
(5) "Tuition", any tuition or incidental fee or both charged by an
institution of postsecondary education, as defined in this section, for
attendance at the institution by a student as a resident of this state;
(6) "Vietnam veteran", a person who served in the military in Vietnam
or the war zone in Southeast Asia and to whom the following criteria shall
apply:
(a) The veteran was a Missouri resident when first entering the
military service and at the time of death;

HCS HB 3092 144
(b) The veteran's death was attributable to illness that could possibly
be a result of exposure to toxic chemicals during the Vietnam Conflict; and
(c) The veteran served in the Vietnam theater between 1961 and 1972.
2. Within the limits of the amounts appropriated therefor, the
coordinating board for higher education shall award annually up to twelve
grants to survivors of Vietnam veterans to attend institutions of postsecondary
education in this state. If the waiting list of eligible survivors exceeds fifty, the
coordinating board may petition the general assembly to expand the quota. If
the quota is not expanded the eligibility of survivors on the waiting list shall be
extended.
3. A survivor may receive a grant pursuant to this section only so long
as the survivor is enrolled in a program leading to a certificate, or an associate
or baccalaureate degree. In no event shall a survivor receive a grant beyond
the completion of the first baccalaureate degree, regardless of age. No
survivor shall receive more than one hundred percent of tuition when
combined with similar funds made available to such survivor.
4. The coordinating board for higher education shall:
(1) Promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
implementation of this section;
(2) Determine minimum standards of performance in order for a
survivor to remain eligible to receive a grant under this program;
(3) Make available on behalf of a survivor an amount toward the
survivor's tuition which is equal to the grant to which the survivor is entitled
under the provisions of this section;
(4) Provide the forms and determine the procedures necessary for a
survivor to apply for and receive a grant under this program.
5. In order to be eligible to receive a grant pursuant to this section, a
survivor shall be certified as eligible by a Missouri state veterans service
officer. Such certification shall be made upon qualified medical certification
by a Veterans Administration medical authority that exposure to toxic
chemicals contributed to or was the cause of death of the veteran, as defined in
subsection 1 of this section.
6. A survivor who is enrolled or has been accepted for enrollment as
an undergraduate postsecondary student at an approved institution of
postsecondary education shall receive a grant in an amount not to exceed
the least of the following:
(1) The actual tuition, as defined in this section, charged at an
approved institution where the child is enrolled or accepted for enrollment; or
(2) The average amount of tuition charged a Missouri resident at the
institutions identified in section 174.020 for attendance as a full-time student,
as defined in section 173.205.
7. A survivor who is a recipient of a grant may transfer from one
approved public or private institution of postsecondary education to another
without losing his entitlement under this section. The board shall make
necessary adjustments in the amount of the grant. If a grant recipient at any
time withdraws from the institution of postsecondary education so that under
the rules and regulations of that institution he is entitled to a refund of any
tuition, fees, or other charges, the institution shall pay the portion of the refund

HCS HB 3092 145
to which he is entitled attributable to the grant for that semester or similar
grading period to the board.
8. If a survivor is granted financial assistance under any other student
aid program, public or private, the full amount of such aid shall be reported to
the board by the institution and the eligible survivor.
9. Nothing in this section shall be construed as a promise or guarantee
that a person will be admitted to an institution of postsecondary education or to
a particular institution of postsecondary education, will be allowed to continue
to attend an institution of postsecondary education after having been admitted,
or will be graduated from an institution of postsecondary education.
10. The benefits conferred by this section shall be available to any
academically qualified surviving children and spouses of Vietnam veterans as
defined in subsection 1 of this section, regardless of the survivor's age, until
December 31, 1995. After December 31, 1995, the benefits conferred by this
section shall not be available to such persons who are twenty-five years of age
or older, except spouses will remain eligible until the fifth anniversary after the
death of the veteran.
11. This section shall expire on December 31, 2015.]
[173.680. 1. The department of higher education and workforce
development shall conduct a study to identify the information technology
industry certifications most frequently requested by employers in Missouri.
The department of higher education and workforce development may conduct
the study with the assistance of other state departments and agencies, the
Missouri mathematics and science coalition, and the governor's advisory
council on science, technology, engineering, and mathematical issues.
2. The department of higher education and workforce development
shall complete the study no later than January 31, 2015. The department shall
prepare the findings in a report and provide it to:
(1) The president pro tempore of the senate;
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives;
(3) The joint committee on education;
(4) The governor;
(5) The coordinating board for higher education; and
(6) The state board of education.]
[184.384. The district and subdistricts and the officers and employees
thereof shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 296 or any amendment
thereto hereafter enacted.]
[190.450. By December 31, 2017, the department of public safety
shall complete a study of the number of public safety answering points
necessary to provide the best possible 911 technology and service to all areas
of the state in the most efficient and economical manner possible, issue a state
public safety answering point consolidation plan based on the study, and
provide such plan to the Missouri 911 service board.]

HCS HB 3092 146
[191.425. 1. Upon receipt of federal funding in accordance with
subsection 4 of this section, there is hereby established within the department
of health and senior services the "Women's Heart Health Program" to provide
heart disease risk screening to uninsured and underinsured women.
2. The following women shall be eligible for program services:
(1) Women between the ages of thirty-five and sixty-four years;
(2) Women who are receiving breast and cervical cancer screenings
under the Missouri show me healthy women program;
(3) Women who are uninsured or whose insurance does not provide
coverage for heart disease risk screenings; and
(4) Women with a gross family income at or below two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.
3. The department shall contract with health care providers who are
currently providing services under the Missouri show me healthy women
program to provide screening services under the women's heart health
program. Screening shall include but not be limited to height, weight, and
body mass index (BMI), blood pressure, total cholesterol, HDL, and blood
glucose. Any woman whose screening indicates an increased risk for heart
disease shall be referred for appropriate follow-up health care services and be
offered lifestyle education services to reduce her risk for heart disease.
4. The women's heart health program shall be subject to receipt of
federal funding which designates such funding for heart disease risk screening
to uninsured and underinsured women. In the event that federal funds are not
available for such program, the department shall not be required to establish or
implement the program.
5. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset three years after August 28, 2012, unless reauthorized by
an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset three years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]
[191.950. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(2) "Economically challenged men", men who have a gross income up
to one hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level;
(3) "Program", the prostate cancer pilot program established in this
section;
(4) "Rural area", a rural area which is in either any county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than
twenty thousand but fewer than twenty thousand one hundred inhabitants, any
county of the second classification with more than nineteen thousand seven
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand eight hundred inhabitants, or any
county of the third classification with a township form of government and with

HCS HB 3092 147
more than thirty-three thousand one hundred but fewer than thirty-three
thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(5) "Uninsured men", men for whom services provided by the program
are not covered by private insurance, MO HealthNet or Medicare;
(6) "Urban area", an urban area which is located in a city not within a
county.
2. Subject to securing a cooperative agreement with a nonprofit entity
for funding of the program, there is hereby established within the department
of health and senior services two "Prostate Cancer Pilot Programs" to fund
prostate cancer screening and treatment services and to provide education to
men residing in this state. One prostate cancer pilot program shall be located
in an urban area and one prostate cancer pilot program shall be located in a
rural area. The department may directly contract with the Missouri
Foundation for Health, or a successor entity, in the delivery of the pilot
program. For purposes of this section, the contracting process of the
department with these entities need not be governed by the provisions of
chapter 34.
3. The program shall be open to:
(1) Uninsured men or economically challenged men who are at least
fifty years old; and
(2) On the advice of a physician or at the request of the individual,
uninsured men or economically challenged men who are at least thirty-five
years of age but less than fifty years of age and who are at high risk for
prostate cancer.
4. The program shall provide:
(1) Prostate cancer screening;
(2) Referral services, including services necessary for diagnosis;
(3) Treatment services for individuals who are diagnosed with prostate
cancer after being screened; and
(4) Outreach and education activities to ensure awareness and
utilization of program services by uninsured men and economically challenged
men.
5. Upon appropriation, the department shall distribute grants to
administer the program to:
(1) Local health departments; and
(2) Federally qualified health centers.
6. Three years from the date on which the grants were first
administered under this section, the department shall report to the governor
and general assembly:
(1) The number of individuals screened and treated under the program,
including racial and ethnic data on the individuals who were screened and
treated; and
(2) To the extent possible, any cost savings achieved by the program as
a result of early detection of prostate cancer.
7. The department shall promulgate rules to establish guidelines
regarding eligibility for the program and to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall

HCS HB 3092 148
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2011, shall be invalid and void.
8. Under and pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall automatically sunset six years after August 28, 2011, unless reauthorized
by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset six years after the effective date of the
reauthorization of this section; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]
[191.1075. As used in sections 191.1075 to 191.1085, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(2) "Health care professional", a physician or other health care
practitioner licensed, accredited, or certified by the state of Missouri to
perform specified health services;
(3) "Hospital":
(a) A place devoted primarily to the maintenance and operation of
facilities for the diagnosis, treatment, or care of not less than twenty-four
consecutive hours in any week of three or more nonrelated individuals
suffering from illness, disease, injury, deformity, or other abnormal physical
conditions; or
(b) A place devoted primarily to provide for not less than twenty-four
consecutive hours in any week medical or nursing care for three or more
unrelated individuals. "Hospital" does not include convalescent, nursing,
shelter, or boarding homes as defined in chapter 198.]
[191.1080. 1. There is hereby created within the department of health
and senior services the "Missouri Palliative Care and Quality of Life
Interdisciplinary Council", which shall be a palliative care consumer and
professional information and education program to improve quality and
delivery of patient-centered and family-focused care in this state.
2. On or before December 1, 2016, the following members shall be
appointed to the council:
(1) Two members of the senate, appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate;
(2) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;

HCS HB 3092 149
(3) Two board-certified hospice and palliative medicine physicians
licensed in this state, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of
the senate;
(4) Two certified hospice and palliative nurses licensed in this state,
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate;
(5) A certified hospice and palliative social worker, appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the senate;
(6) A patient and family caregiver advocate representative, appointed
by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate; and
(7) A spiritual professional with experience in palliative care and
health care, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the
senate.
3. Council members shall serve for a term of three years. The
members of the council shall elect a chair and vice chair whose duties shall be
established by the council. The department shall determine a time and place
for regular meetings of the council, which shall meet at least biannually.
4. Members of the council shall serve without compensation, but shall,
subject to appropriations, be reimbursed for their actual and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the
council.
5. The council shall consult with and advise the department on matters
related to the establishment, maintenance, operation, and outcomes evaluation
of palliative care initiatives in this state, including the palliative care consumer
and professional information and education program established in section
191.1085.
6. The council shall submit an annual report to the general assembly,
which includes an assessment of the availability of palliative care in this state
for patients at early stages of serious disease and an analysis of barriers to
greater access to palliative care.
7. The council authorized under this section shall automatically expire
August 28, 2022.]
[191.1085. 1. There is hereby established the "Palliative Care
Consumer and Professional Information and Education Program" within the
department of health and senior services.
2. The purpose of the program is to maximize the effectiveness of
palliative care in this state by ensuring that comprehensive and accurate
information and education about palliative care is available to the public,
health care providers, and health care facilities.
3. The department shall publish on its website information and
resources, including links to external resources, about palliative care for the
public, health care providers, and health care facilities, including but not
limited to:
(1) Continuing education opportunities for health care providers;
(2) Information about palliative care delivery in the home, primary,
secondary, and tertiary environments; and
(3) Consumer educational materials and referral information for
palliative care, including hospice.

HCS HB 3092 150
4. Each hospital in this state is encouraged to have a palliative care
presence on its intranet or internet website which provides links to one or more
of the following organizations: the Institute of Medicine, the Center to
Advance Palliative Care, the Supportive Care Coalition, the National Hospice
and Palliative Care Organization, the American Academy of Hospice and
Palliative Medicine, and the National Institute on Aging.
5. Each hospital in this state is encouraged to have patient education
information about palliative care available for distribution to patients.
6. The department shall consult with the palliative care and quality of
life interdisciplinary council established in section 191.1080 in implementing
the section.
7. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of sections 191.1075 to 191.1085. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
sections 191.1075 to 191.1085 shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. Sections 191.1075 to 191.1085 and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2016, shall be invalid and void.
8. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23.253 to the contrary,
the program authorized under this section shall automatically expire on August
28, 2022.]
[192.926. 1. By September 1, 2015, the department of social services
in cooperation with the department of health and senior services and the
department of mental health shall establish a committee to assess the
continuation of the money follows the person demonstration program in order
to support Missourians who have disabilities and those who are aging to
transition from nursing facilities or habilitation centers to quality community
settings. The committee shall study sustainability of the program beyond the
current demonstration time frame for all transitions to occur by September 30,
2018. The committee shall be administered and its members, with the
exception of the members from the house of representatives and the senate,
chosen by the director of the department of social services.
2. The committee shall:
(1) Review the extent to which the demonstration program has
achieved its purposes;
(2) Assess any possible improvements to the program;
(3) Investigate program elements and costs to sustain the program
beyond its current demonstration period;
(4) Explore cost savings achieved through the demonstration program;
(5) Investigate the possibility and need to apply for a waiver from the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
3. The committee shall include fiscal staff from the department of
social services, the department of health and senior services, the department of
mental health, and the office of administration's division of budget and

HCS HB 3092 151
planning. The committee shall also be comprised of a representative from
each of the following:
(1) The division of senior and disability services within the department
of health and senior services;
(2) The MO HealthNet division within the department of social
services;
(3) The division of developmental disabilities within the department of
mental health;
(4) Centers for independent living and area agencies on aging
currently serving as money follows the person local contact agencies;
(5) The Missouri assistive technology council;
(6) The Missouri developmental disabilities council;
(7) The skilled nursing community predominately serving MO
HealthNet participants;
(8) The Missouri house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives; and
(9) The Missouri senate, appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate.
4. The committee may also include other members or work groups
deemed necessary to accomplish its purposes, including but not limited to
representatives from state agencies, local advisory groups and community
members, and members of the general assembly with valuable input regarding
the activities of the money follows the person demonstration program.
5. The department of social services in cooperation with the
department of health and senior services and the department of mental
health shall make recommendations based on the findings of the committee
and report them to the general assembly and the governor by July 1, 2016.
6. The provisions of this section shall expire on January 1, 2017.]
[199.020. 1. The following officers and their families shall, with the
permission of the department of health and senior services, reside on the
premises or other property of the center: center director, assistant director,
physicians, and other personnel required for the center's operation as
recommended by the center's director. Personnel residing at the center shall
pay a monthly rental determined annually at the lower of cost or fair market
value; except that the center director, with the approval of the director of the
department of health and senior services, may establish a lower rate as
required to fill the center's personnel needs.
2. This section shall terminate thirty days following the date notice is
provided to the revisor of statutes that an agreement has been executed which
transfers the Missouri rehabilitation center from the department of health and
senior services to the board of curators of the University of Missouri.]
[208.482. 1. The MO HealthNet division shall not recover
disproportionate share hospital audit recoupments from any tier 1 safety net
hospital, excluding department of mental health state-operated psychiatric
hospitals, for which an intergovernmental transfer was used for the nonfederal
share of its disproportionate share hospital payments. General revenue funds

HCS HB 3092 152
shall not be used to offset any expenditure of funds to pay such recoupments to
the federal government.
2. The provisions of this section shall expire on September 30, 2022.]
[208.627. 1. The department of social services shall seek input from
the department of mental health and community-based social service agencies,
which provide case management services to the elderly, for the purpose of
developing a report outlining areas and strategies by which the department can
deliver case management services to the elderly by collaboration and
cooperation with community-based social service agencies, employing
licensed personnel. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the
identification of at-risk elderly, transportation services, case management
services, nutrition services, health services, and socialization activities and
programs. The goal of strategies outlined should be to enhance the quality of
life and welfare of Missouri's elderly population, and specifically Missouri's
at-risk elderly.
2. The report required by subsection 1 of this section shall be delivered
to the governor, the president pro tem of the senate, and the speaker of the
house not later than January 1, 1995. The report shall identify effective and
efficient methods of delivering necessary services to at-risk elderly.]
[210.154. 1. There is hereby created within the department of social
services the "Missouri Task Force on the Prevention of Infant Abuse and
Neglect" to study and make recommendations to the governor and general
assembly concerning the prevention of infant abuse and neglect in Missouri.
The task force shall consist of the following nine members:
(1) Two members of the senate from different political parties,
appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(2) Two members of the house of representatives from different
political parties, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(3) The director of the department of social services, or his or her
designee;
(4) The director of the department of health and senior services, or his
or her designee;
(5) A SAFE CARE provider as described in section 334.950;
(6) A representative of a child advocacy organization specializing in
prevention of child abuse and neglect; and
(7) A representative of a licensed Missouri hospital or licensed
Missouri birthing center.

Members of the task force, other than the legislative members and the directors
of state departments, shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and
consent of the senate by September 15, 2016.
2. A majority vote of a quorum of the task force is required for any
action.
3. The task force shall elect a chair and vice chair at its first meeting,
which shall be convened by the director of the department of social services, or

HCS HB 3092 153
his or her designee, no later than October 1, 2016. Meetings may be held by
telephone or video conference at the discretion of the chair.
4. Members shall serve on the task force without compensation but
may, subject to appropriations, be reimbursed for actual and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as members of the
task force.
5. On or before December 31, 2016, the task force shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the governor and general
assembly.
6. The task shall develop recommendations to reduce infant abuse and
neglect, including but not limited to:
(1) Sharing information between the children's division and hospitals
and birthing centers for the purpose of identifying newborn infants who may
be at risk of abuse and neglect; and
(2) Training division employees and medical providers to recognize
the signs of infant child abuse and neglect.

The recommendations may include proposals for specific statutory and
regulatory changes and methods to foster cooperation between state and local
governmental bodies, medical providers, and child welfare agencies.
7. The task force shall expire on January 1, 2017, or upon submission
of a report as provided for under subsection 5 of this section.]
[210.1030. 1. There is hereby created the "Trauma-Informed Care for
Children and Families Task Force". The mission of the task force shall be to
promote the healthy development of children and their families living in
Missouri communities by promoting comprehensive trauma-informed children
and family support systems and interagency cooperation.
2. The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) The directors, or their designees, of the departments of elementary
and secondary education, health and senior services, mental health, social
services, public safety, and corrections;
(2) The director, or his or her designee, of the office of child advocate;
(3) Six members from the private sector with knowledge of trauma-
informed care methods, two of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives, one of whom shall be appointed by the minority
leader of the house of representatives, two of whom shall be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate, and one of whom shall be appointed by
the minority leader of the senate;
(4) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives and one member of the house of
representatives appointed by the minority leader of the house of
representatives;
(5) Two members of the senate appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate and one member of the senate appointed by the minority leader of
the senate; and
(6) The executive director, or his or her designee, of the Missouri
Juvenile Justice Association.

HCS HB 3092 154
3. The task force shall incorporate evidence-based and evidence-
informed best practices including, but not limited to, the Missouri Model: A
Developmental Framework for Trauma-Informed, with respect to:
(1) Early identification of children and youth and their families, as
appropriate, who have experienced or are at risk of experiencing trauma;
(2) The expeditious referral of such children and youth and their
families, as appropriate, who require specialized services to the appropriate
trauma-informed support services, including treatment, in accordance with
applicable privacy laws; and
(3) The implementation of trauma-informed approaches and
interventions in child and youth-serving schools, organizations, homes, and
other settings to foster safe, stable, and nurturing environments and
relationships that prevent and mitigate the effects of trauma.
4. The department of social services shall provide such research,
clerical, technical, and other services as the task force may require in the
performance of its duties.
5. The task force, its members, and any staff assigned to the task force
shall receive reimbursement for their actual and necessary expenses incurred
in attending meetings of the task force or any subcommittee thereof.
6. The task force shall meet within two months of August 28, 2018.
7. The task force shall report a summary of its activities and any
recommendations for legislation to the general assembly and to the joint
committee on child abuse and neglect under section 21.771 by January 1,
2019.
8. The task force shall terminate on January 1, 2019.]
[215.263. 1. For purposes of sections 215.261 to 215.263, the term
"affordable housing" means all residential structures newly constructed or
rehabilitated, which a person earning one hundred fifteen percent or less of the
median income for the person's county, as determined by the United States
Census Bureau's American Community Survey, based on the most recent of
five-year period estimate data in which the final year of the estimate ends in
either zero or five, could afford if spending twenty-nine percent of that
person's gross income annually on such housing.
2. Clerical, research and general administrative support staff for the
commission shall be provided by the Missouri department of economic
development.]
[217.147. 1. There is hereby created the "Sentencing and Corrections
Oversight Commission". The commission shall be composed of thirteen
members as follows:
(1) A circuit court judge to be appointed by the chief justice of the
Missouri supreme court;
(2) Three members to be appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate, one of whom shall be a victim's advocate, one of
whom shall be a representative from the Missouri Sheriffs' Association, and
one of whom shall be a representative of the Missouri Association of Counties;
(3) The following shall be ex officio, voting members:

HCS HB 3092 155
(a) The chair of the senate judiciary committee, or any successor
committee that reviews legislation involving crime and criminal procedure,
who shall serve as co-chair of the commission and the ranking minority
member of such senate committee;
(b) The chair of the appropriations-public safety and corrections
committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committee that
reviews similar legislation, who shall serve as co-chair and the ranking
minority member of such house committee;
(c) The director of the Missouri state public defender system, or his or
her designee who is a practicing public defender;
(d) The executive director of the Missouri office of prosecution
services, or his or her designee who is a practicing prosecutor;
(e) The director of the department of corrections, or his or her
designee;
(f) The chairman of the board of probation and parole, or his or her
designee;
(g) The chief justice of the Missouri supreme court, or his or her
designee.
2. Beginning with the appointments made after August 28, 2012, the
circuit court judge member shall be appointed for four years, two of the
members appointed by the governor shall be appointed for three years, and one
member appointed by the governor shall be appointed for two years.
Thereafter, the members shall be appointed to serve four-year terms and shall
serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy in the office of a member shall
be filled by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.
3. The co-chairs are responsible for establishing and enforcing
attendance and voting rules, bylaws, and the frequency, location, and time of
meetings, and distributing meeting notices, except that the commission's first
meeting shall occur by February 28, 2013, and the commission shall meet at
least twice each calendar year.
4. The duties of the commission shall include:
(1) Monitoring and assisting the implementation of sections 217.703,
217.718, and subsection 4 of section 559.036, and evaluating recidivism
reductions, cost savings, and other effects resulting from the implementation;
(2) Determining ways to reinvest any cost savings to pay for the
continued implementation of the sections listed in subdivision (1) of this
subsection and other evidence-based practices for reducing recidivism; and
(3) Examining the issue of restitution for crime victims, including the
amount ordered and collected annually, methods and costs of collection, and
restitution's order of priority in official procedures and documents.
5. The department, board, and office of state courts administrator shall
collect and report any data requested by the commission in a timely fashion.
6. The commission shall issue a report to the speaker of the house of
representatives, senate president pro tempore, chief justice of the Missouri
supreme court, and governor on December 31, 2013, and annually thereafter,
detailing the effects of the sections listed in subdivision (1) of subsection 4 and
providing the data and analysis demonstrating those effects. The report may
also recommend ways to reinvest any cost savings into evidence-based

HCS HB 3092 156
practices to reduce recidivism and possible changes to sentencing and
corrections policies and statutes.
7. The department of corrections shall provide administrative support
to the commission to carry out the duties of this section.
8. No member shall receive any compensation for the performance of
official duties, but the members who are not otherwise reimbursed by their
agency shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses actually and
necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.
9. The provisions of this section shall automatically expire on August
28, 2018.]
[227.817. The portion of U.S. Highway 169 from State Highway VV
continuing to State Highway DD in Clinton and Clay counties shall be
designated the "Championship Way". The department of transportation shall
erect and maintain appropriate signs designating such highway, with the costs
to be paid by private donations. This designation shall expire on December
31, 2022.]
[252.300. 1. Sections 252.300 to 252.333 shall be known and may be
cited as "The Missouri Economic Diversification and Afforestation Act of
1990".
2. It is the intent of sections 252.300 to 252.333 to address
environmental, economic, and social programs with a long-term, integrated
strategy that will result in soil conservation, improved water and air quality,
enhanced wildlife habitat, increased job opportunities, and reduced social
problems, to the benefit of all citizens of the state of Missouri.]
[252.303. The department may develop and implement, in cooperation
with the University of Missouri college of agriculture, the University of
Missouri center for agroforestry, the University of Missouri extension service,
the Missouri department of natural resources, private industry councils and the
Missouri department of agriculture, an agroforestry program. The program
shall be designed to encourage the development of a state program of
agroforestry, and shall encourage soil conservation and diversifications of the
state's agricultural base through the use of trees planted in an agroforestry
configuration to accommodate alley cropping, forested-riparian buffers,
silvopasture and windbreaks.]
[252.306. As used in sections 252.300 to 252.333, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Alley cropping", planting rows of trees at wide spacings and
cropping the alleyways;
(2) "Conservation reserve program", the conservation reserve program
authorized by the Federal Food Security Act of 1985, as amended, (Title XII,
P.L. 99-198), or its successor program;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department of conservation;
(4) "Director", the director of the Missouri department of
conservation;

HCS HB 3092 157
(5) "Eligible land", agricultural land which is susceptible to soil
erosion that has a recent cropping history, marginal pastureland, land
surrounding livestock enclosures and riparian zones;
(6) "Eligible practices", single or multiple rows of trees, alone or
combined with other plants such as grass, conventional row crops or
horticulture crops, and animals located at intervals of distance within or
around fields, around livestock enclosures, and along streams and rivers,
specifically designed to provide production and environmental enhancement
benefits in accordance with the practices identified in section 252.303;
(7) "Enhancement phase", the period of time, not to exceed ten years,
immediately following the establishment phase, during which payments are
made by the state of Missouri to landowners who use their eligible land for
agroforestry purposes as required by the department;
(8) "Establishment phase", the period of time during which eligible
land is being prepared for planting trees and developing agroforestry practices,
as determined by the director of the department;
(9) "Forested-riparian buffers", a combination of trees and other
vegetation established parallel to streams and rivers;
(10) "Silvopasture", combining trees with forage and livestock;
(11) "Windbreaks", planting single or multiple rows of trees for
protection and enhanced production of crops and animals.]
[252.309. 1. The director may enter into agreements with individual
landowners to make incentive payments during the enhancement phase to
landowners. Recipients of such payments shall utilize the land for which such
payment is made for agroforestry purposes as required by the director pursuant
to sections 252.300 to 252.333.
2. The amount of state incentive payment made to a landowner per
acre of eligible land shall be an amount which, when added to any cash or in-
kind net income produced by crops raised on the land, is substantially equal to
the amount per acre previously paid or which would have been paid to the
landowner under the federal conservation reserve program.
3. If an application made pursuant to section 252.315 is approved by
the director, the director shall develop a schedule of annual payments to be
made by the state.
4. The state shall not make any payment to a landowner to maintain
the use of eligible land during the enhancement phase for agroforestry
purposes after ten years have elapsed since the first such incentive payment is
made.]
[252.312. The state payments provided for in sections 252.309,
252.330, and 252.333 may be made from funds available to the department of
conservation, soil conservation funds made available by the department of
natural resources from the tax imposed by Sections 47(a), 47(b) and 47(c) of
Article IV of the Constitution of Missouri, funds appropriated by the general
assembly for that purpose, grants, bequests or gifts, or any combination
thereof.]

HCS HB 3092 158
[252.315. 1. To participate in the program, the landowner shall make
application to the director in writing. The written application shall show the
number of acres to be placed in the program and that the land which is to be
placed in the agroforestry program meets the eligibility requirements of this
section. The application shall also contain a detailed plan of the landowner's
proposal to meet the requirements of sections 252.300 to 252.333, including
the type and number of trees to be planted, established, or managed, the type
of compatible grass, other crops and such other information as may be deemed
necessary. The number of trees required to satisfy eligibility may vary with
agroforestry practice, but in each case shall be a sufficient number to guarantee
the success of the practice and shall be consistent with standards established
for each practice.
2. The director shall review each application. In reviewing the
application the director shall determine the type or types of soil located in the
area of the land proposed to be included in the agroforestry program and shall
apply the land capability classification system to determine the potential or
limitations of the land for inclusion in the program. Before the director acts
upon the application, an on-site inspection shall be made by a representative of
the department of conservation or its approved agent. The inspecting
representative shall attest to the efficacy of the agroforestry plan to be used,
the number of acres to be placed under agroforestry management, the species
and number of trees to be planted, established, or managed, and other crop
components of the proposed program. After the report of the on-site inspector
and the review by the director, the director shall determine the landowner's
eligibility to participate in the agroforestry program and shall determine the
amount of cost sharing, including in-kind and labor components, for the
landowner. If the director fails to approve an application, the aggrieved
landowner may request a hearing before the conservation commission or its
authorized representative within thirty days of notice to the landowner of the
failure of the conservation department to approve the application, or the
landowner may proceed under the provisions of section 536.150 as if the act of
the conservation department was one not subject to administrative review. If
an action is brought pursuant to section 536.150, venue shall be in Cole
County.]
[252.318. 1. All land participating in the agroforestry program shall
be inspected annually by a representative of the director, to ensure that the land
continues to comply with the requirements of sections 252.300 to 252.333 and
that practice specifications are being maintained in accordance with applicable
rules and regulations.
2. If the annual inspection determines that the land is no longer in
compliance with the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333 or with the
rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of sections
252.300 to 252.333, the director shall notify the landowner of that fact and
shall detail the specifics in which the land fails to meet the requirements. The
landowner may respond to the notice within thirty days of receipt, either by
contesting the inspection report or by providing the director with a proposal to
correct the problems which form the basis of the notice. If the landowner

HCS HB 3092 159
contests the findings of the annual inspection, the aggrieved landowner may
request a hearing before the conservation commission or its authorized
representative or the landowner may proceed under the provisions of section
536.150, as if the act of the conservation department was one not subject to
administrative review. If an action is brought pursuant to section 536.150,
venue shall be in Cole County. If the landowner provides the director with a
proposal to correct the problems which form the basis of the notice, the
director shall review the proposal and, if the director finds such proposal
acceptable, shall allow the landowner to implement the proposal to correct the
alleged problems and shall not suspend the annual payment to the landowner
under the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333. If the landowner is
unable or unwilling to correct the alleged problems in a manner acceptable to
the director, the landowner shall not receive the subsequent payments due
under the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.321. The University of Missouri center for agroforestry and
extension service, in consultation with the director, shall establish agroforestry
demonstration areas, and develop and deliver the educational components of
sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.324. 1. The director may promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 252.300 to 252.333. Before
promulgating any such rule, the director shall seek the advice and comments of
the University of Missouri college of agriculture, the University of Missouri
center for agroforestry, the University of Missouri extension service, the
Missouri department of natural resources, private industry councils, the
Missouri department of economic development and the Missouri department
of agriculture. The director may seek advice and comments before
promulgating rules and regulations from the United States Department of
Agriculture and any other entities deemed advisable by the director. No rule or
portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall become
effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter
536.
2. The Missouri department of conservation may contract with the
division of soil and water conservation of the Missouri department of natural
resources for any administrative functions required under the provisions of
sections 252.300 to 252.333.]
[252.327. 1. The department of conservation and the department of
economic development and the University of Missouri college of agriculture
shall, by each of the dates specified in subsection 2 of this section, jointly
produce a report on the agroforestry program which:
(1) Provides a status report on the afforestation aspects of the
agroforestry program by presenting a forecast of anticipated economic
developments from the afforestation in the state as a result of the
agroforestry program;

HCS HB 3092 160
(2) Suggests public or private sector initiatives that will potentially
serve to maximize the economic benefits for related new development and
expansion of existing businesses resulting from the agroforestry program;
(3) Suggests methods to promote the development of wood and other
forestry related products;
(4) Suggests public or private sector initiatives or methods which will
result in significant increases in job opportunities and employment.
2. The report shall be submitted to the governor and to the general
assembly by January thirty-first of each of the following years: 1996, 2001,
2006, 2011, 2016, 2021, and 2026.]
[252.330. During the establishment phase, the director may pay for the
planting of trees on eligible land which is used for agroforestry pursuant to
sections 252.300 to 252.333. Such payment shall be limited to expenses which
are determined to be reasonable and necessary by the director, but shall not
exceed seventy-five percent of the cost of establishment.]
[252.333. The director may make incentive payments for agroforestry
purposes of land enrolled in this program. The duration of such payments
shall not exceed ten years. The director may also expend funds to plant trees
on such land. Such expenditures may include both planting and associated
practices as determined by the director.]
[260.900. As used in sections 260.900 to 260.960, unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Abandoned dry-cleaning facility", any real property premises or
individual leasehold space in which a dry-cleaning facility formerly operated;
(2) "Active dry-cleaning facility", any real property premises or
individual leasehold space in which a dry-cleaning facility currently operates;
(3) "Chlorinated dry-cleaning solvent", any dry-cleaning solvent
which contains a compound which has a molecular structure containing the
element chlorine;
(4) "Commission", the hazardous waste management commission
created in section 260.365;
(5) "Corrective action", those activities described in subsection 1 of
section 260.925;
(6) "Corrective action plan", a plan approved by the director to
perform corrective action at a dry-cleaning facility;
(7) "Department", the Missouri department of natural resources;
(8) "Director", the director of the Missouri department of natural
resources;
(9) "Dry-cleaning facility", a commercial establishment that operates,
or has operated in the past in whole or in part for the purpose of cleaning
garments or other fabrics on site utilizing a process that involves any use of
dry-cleaning solvents. Dry-cleaning facility includes all contiguous land,
structures and other appurtenances and improvements on the land used in
connection with a dry-cleaning facility but does not include prisons,

HCS HB 3092 161
governmental entities, hotels, motels or industrial laundries. Dry-cleaning
facility does include coin-operated dry-cleaning facilities;
(10) "Dry-cleaning solvent", any and all nonaqueous solvents used or
to be used in the cleaning of garments and other fabrics at a dry-cleaning
facility and includes but is not limited to perchloroethylene, also known as
tetrachloroethylene, chlorinated dry-cleaning, and the products into which
such solvents degrade;
(11) "Dry-cleaning unit", a machine or device which utilizes dry-
cleaning solvents to clean garments and other fabrics and includes any
associated piping and ancillary equipment and any containment system;
(12) "Environmental response surcharge", either the active dry-
cleaning facility registration surcharge or the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge;
(13) "Fund", the dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund
created in section 260.920;
(14) "Immediate response to a release", containment and control of a
known release in excess of a reportable quantity and notification to the
department of any known release in excess of a reportable quantity;
(15) "Operator", any person who is or has been responsible for the
operation of dry-cleaning operations at a dry-cleaning facility;
(16) "Owner", any person who owns the real property where a dry-
cleaning facility is or has operated;
(17) "Person", an individual, trust, firm, joint venture, consortium,
joint-stock company, corporation, partnership, association or limited liability
company. Person does not include any governmental organization;
(18) "Release", any spill, leak, emission, discharge, escape, leak or
disposal of dry-cleaning solvent from a dry-cleaning facility into the soils or
waters of the state;
(19) "Reportable quantity", a known release of a dry-cleaning solvent
deemed reportable by applicable federal or state law or regulation.]
[260.905. 1. The commission shall promulgate and adopt such initial
rules and regulations, effective no later than July 1, 2007, as shall be necessary
to carry out the purposes and provisions of sections 260.900 to 260.960. Prior
to the promulgation of such rules, the commission shall meet with
representatives of the dry-cleaning industry and other interested parties.
The commission, thereafter, shall promulgate and adopt additional rules and
regulations or change existing rules and regulations when necessary to carry
out the purposes and provisions of sections 260.900 to 260.960.
2. Any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to sections 260.900 to
260.960 shall be reasonably necessary to protect human health, to preserve,
protect and maintain the water and other natural resources of this state and to
provide for prompt corrective action of releases from dry-cleaning facilities.
Consistent with these purposes, the commission shall adopt rules and
regulations, effective no later than July 1, 2007:
(1) Establishing requirements that owners who close dry-cleaning
facilities remove dry-cleaning solvents and wastes from such facilities in order
to prevent any future releases;

HCS HB 3092 162
(2) Establishing criteria to prioritize the expenditure of funds from the
dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund. The criteria shall include
consideration of:
(a) The benefit to be derived from corrective action compared to the
cost of conducting such corrective action;
(b) The degree to which human health and the environment are
actually affected by exposure to contamination;
(c) The present and future use of an affected aquifer or surface water;
(d) The effect that interim or immediate remedial measures will have
on future costs; and
(e) Such additional factors as the commission considers relevant;
(3) Establishing criteria under which a determination may be made by
the department of the level at which corrective action shall be deemed
completed. Criteria for determining completion of corrective action shall be
based on the factors set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection and:
(a) Individual site characteristics including natural remediation
processes;
(b) Applicable state water quality standards;
(c) Whether deviation from state water quality standards or from
established criteria is appropriate, based on the degree to which the desired
remediation level is achievable and may be reasonably and cost effectively
implemented, subject to the limitation that where a state water quality standard
is applicable, a deviation may not result in the application of standards more
stringent than that standard; and
(d) Such additional factors as the commission considers relevant.]
[260.910. 1. No person shall:
(1) Operate an active dry-cleaning facility in violation of sections
260.900 to 260.960, rules and regulations adopted pursuant to sections
260.900 to 260.960 or orders of the director pursuant to sections 260.900 to
260.960, or operate an active dry-cleaning facility in violation of any other
applicable federal or state environmental statutes, rules or regulations;
(2) Prevent or hinder a properly identified officer or employee of the
department or other authorized agent of the director from entering, inspecting,
sampling or responding to a release at reasonable times and with reasonable
advance notice to the operator as authorized by sections 260.900 to 260.960;
(3) Knowingly make any false material statement or representation in
any record, report or other document filed, maintained or used for the purpose
of compliance with sections 260.900 to 260.960;
(4) Knowingly destroy, alter or conceal any record required to be
maintained by sections 260.900 to 260.960 or rules and regulations adopted
pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960;
(5) Willfully allow a release in excess of a reportable quantity or
knowingly fail to make an immediate response to a release in accordance with
sections 260.900 to 260.960 and rules and regulations pursuant to sections
260.900 to 260.960.
2. The director may bring a civil damages action against any person
who violates any provisions of subsection 1 of this section. Such civil

HCS HB 3092 163
damages may be assessed in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars for
each violation and are in addition to any other penalty assessed by law.
3. In assessing any civil damages pursuant to this section, a court of
competent jurisdiction shall consider, when applicable, the following factors:
(1) The extent to which the violation presents a hazard to human
health;
(2) The extent to which the violation has or may have an adverse effect
on the environment;
(3) The amount of the reasonable costs incurred by the state in
detection and investigation of the violation; and
(4) The economic savings realized by the person in not complying
with the provision for which a violation is charged.]
[260.915. Each operator of an active dry-cleaning facility shall register
with the department on a form provided by the department according to
procedures established by the department by rule.]
[260.920. 1. There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund to
be known as the "Dry-cleaning Environmental Response Trust Fund". All
moneys received from the environmental response surcharges, fees, gifts,
bequests, donations and moneys recovered by the state pursuant to sections
260.900 to 260.960, except for any moneys paid under an agreement with the
director or as civil damages, or any other money so designated shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the dry-cleaning environmental
response trust fund, and shall be invested to generate income to the fund.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080, the unexpended balance in
the dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund at the end of each fiscal
year shall not be transferred to the general revenue fund.
2. Moneys in the fund may be expended for only the following
purposes and for no other governmental purpose:
(1) The direct costs of administration and enforcement of sections
260.900 to 260.960; and
(2) The costs of corrective action as provided in section 260.925.
3. The state treasurer is authorized to deposit all of the moneys in the
dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund in any of the qualified
depositories of the state. All such deposits shall be secured in such a manner
and shall be made upon such terms and conditions as are now or may hereafter
be provided by law relative to state deposits. Interest received on such
deposits shall be credited to the dry-cleaning environmental response trust
fund.
4. Any funds received pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960 and
deposited in the dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund shall not be
considered a part of "total state revenue" as provided in Sections 17 and 18 of
Article X of the Missouri Constitution.]
[260.925. 1. On and after July 1, 2002, moneys in the fund shall be
utilized to address contamination resulting from releases of dry-cleaning
solvents as provided in sections 260.900 to 260.960. Whenever a release

HCS HB 3092 164
poses a threat to human health or the environment, the department, consistent
with rules and regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to subdivisions
(2) and (3) of subsection 2 of section 260.905, shall expend moneys available
in the fund to provide for:
(1) Investigation and assessment of a release from a dry-cleaning
facility, including costs of investigations and assessments of contamination
which may have moved off of the dry-cleaning facility;
(2) Necessary or appropriate emergency action, including but not
limited to treatment, restoration or replacement of drinking water supplies, to
assure that the human health or safety is not threatened by a release or
potential release;
(3) Remediation of releases from dry-cleaning facilities, including
contamination which may have moved off of the dry-cleaning facility, which
remediation shall consist of the preparation of a corrective action plan and the
cleanup of affected soil, groundwater and surface waters, using an alternative
that is cost-effective, technologically feasible and reliable, provides adequate
protection of human health and environment and to the extent practicable
minimizes environmental damage;
(4) Operation and maintenance of corrective action;
(5) Monitoring of releases from dry-cleaning facilities including
contamination which may have moved off of the dry-cleaning facility;
(6) Payment of reasonable costs incurred by the director in providing
field and laboratory services;
(7) Reasonable costs of restoring property as nearly as practicable to
the condition that existed prior to activities associated with the investigation of
a release or cleanup or remediation activities;
(8) Removal and proper disposal of wastes generated by a release of a
dry-cleaning solvent; and
(9) Payment of costs of corrective action conducted by the department
or by entities other than the department but approved by the department,
whether or not such corrective action is set out in a corrective action plan;
except that, there shall be no reimbursement for corrective action costs
incurred before August 28, 2000.
2. Nothing in subsection 1 of this section shall be construed to
authorize the department to obligate moneys in the fund for payment of costs
that are not integral to corrective action for a release of dry-cleaning solvents
from a dry-cleaning facility. Moneys from the fund shall not be used:
(1) For corrective action at sites that are contaminated by solvents
normally used in dry-cleaning operations where the contamination did not
result from the operation of a dry-cleaning facility;
(2) For corrective action at sites, other than dry-cleaning facilities, that
are contaminated by dry-cleaning solvents which were released while being
transported to or from a dry-cleaning facility;
(3) To pay any fine or penalty brought against a dry-cleaning facility
operator under state or federal law;
(4) To pay any costs related to corrective action at a dry-cleaning
facility that has been included by the United States Environmental Protection
Agency on the national priorities list;

HCS HB 3092 165
(5) For corrective action at sites with active dry-cleaning facilities
where the owner or operator is not in compliance with sections 260.900 to
260.960, rules and regulations adopted pursuant to sections 260.900 to
260.960, orders of the director pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960, or any
other applicable federal or state environmental statutes, rules or regulations; or
(6) For corrective action at sites with abandoned dry-cleaning facilities
that have been taken out of operation prior to July 1, 2009, and not
documented by or reported to the department by July 1, 2009. Any person
reporting such a site to the department shall include any available evidence
that the site once contained a dry-cleaning facility.
3. Nothing in sections 260.900 to 260.960 shall be construed to restrict
the department from temporarily postponing completion of corrective action
for which moneys from the fund are being expended whenever such
postponement is deemed necessary in order to protect public health and the
environment.
4. At any multisource site, the department shall utilize the moneys in
the fund to pay for the proportionate share of the liability for corrective action
costs which is attributable to a release from one or more dry-cleaning facilities
and for that proportionate share of the liability only.
5. At any multisource site, the director is authorized to make a
determination of the relative liability of the fund for costs of corrective action,
expressed as a percentage of the total cost of corrective action at a site,
whether known or unknown. The director shall issue an order establishing
such percentage of liability. Such order shall be binding and shall control the
obligation of the fund until or unless amended by the director. In the event of
an appeal from such order, such percentage of liability shall be controlling for
costs incurred during the pendency of the appeal.
6. Any authorized officer, employee or agent of the department, or any
person under order or contract with the department, may enter onto any
property or premises, at reasonable times and with reasonable advance notice
to the operator, to take corrective action where the director determines that
such action is necessary to protect the public health or environment. If consent
is not granted by the operator regarding any request made by any officer,
employee or agent of the department, or any person under order or contract
with the department, under the provisions of this section, the director may
issue an order directing compliance with the request. The order may be issued
after such notice and opportunity for consultation as is reasonably appropriate
under the circumstances.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of sections 260.900 to
260.960, in the discretion of the director, an operator may be responsible for
up to one hundred percent of the costs of corrective action attributable to such
operator if the director finds, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing in
accordance with chapter 536 that:
(1) Requiring the operator to bear such responsibility will not
prejudice another owner, operator or person who is eligible, pursuant to the
provisions of sections 260.900 to 260.960, to have corrective action costs paid
by the fund; and
(2) The operator:

HCS HB 3092 166
100 (a) Caused a release in excess of a reportable quantity by willful or
101 wanton actions and such release was caused by operating practices in violation
102 of existing laws and regulations at the time of the release; or
103 (b) Is in arrears for moneys owed pursuant to sections 260.900 to
104 260.960, after notice and an opportunity to correct the arrearage; or
105 (c) Materially obstructs the efforts of the department to carry out its
106 obligations pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960; except that, the exercise
107 of legal rights shall not constitute a substantial obstruction; or
108 (d) Caused or allowed a release in excess of a reportable quantity
109 because of a willful material violation of sections 260.900 to 260.960 or the
110 rules and regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to sections 260.900
111 to 260.960.
112 8. For purposes of subsection 7 of this section, unless a transfer is
113 made to take advantage of the provisions of subsection 7 of this section,
114 purchasers of stock or other indicia of ownership and other successors in
115 interest shall not be considered to be the same owner or operator as the seller
116 or transferor of such stock or indicia of ownership even though there may be
117 no change in the legal identity of the owner or operator. To the extent that an
118 owner or operator is responsible for corrective action costs pursuant to
119 subsection 7 of this section, such owner or operator shall not be entitled to the
120 exemption provided in subsection 5 of section 260.930.
121 9. The fund shall not be liable for the payment of costs in excess of
122 one million dollars at any one contaminated dry-cleaning site. Additionally,
123 the fund shall not be liable for the payment of costs for any one site in excess
124 of twenty-five percent of the total moneys in the fund during any fiscal year.
125 For purposes of this subsection, "contaminated dry-cleaning site" means the
126 areal extent of soil or ground water contaminated with dry-cleaning solvents.
127 10. The owner or operator of an active dry-cleaning facility shall be
128 liable for the first twenty-five thousand dollars of corrective action costs
129 incurred because of a release from an active dry-cleaning facility. The owner
130 of an abandoned dry-cleaning facility shall be liable for the first twenty-five
131 thousand dollars of corrective action costs incurred because of a release from
132 an abandoned dry-cleaning facility. Nothing in this subsection shall be
133 construed to prohibit the department from taking corrective action because the
134 department cannot obtain the deductible.]
[260.930. 1. Neither the state of Missouri, the fund, the commission,
the director nor the department or agent or employees thereof shall be liable
for loss of business, damages or taking of property associated with any
corrective action taken pursuant to sections 260.900 to 260.960.
2. Nothing in sections 260.900 to 260.960 shall establish or create any
liability or responsibility on the part of the commission, the director, the
department or the state of Missouri, or agents or employees thereof, to pay any
corrective action costs from any source other than the fund or to take
corrective action if the moneys in the fund are insufficient to do so.
3. Nothing in sections 260.900 to 260.960 shall be construed to
abrogate or limit any right, remedy, causes of action, or claim by any person
sustaining personal injury or property damage as a result of any release from a

HCS HB 3092 167
dry-cleaning facility, nor shall anything in sections 260.900 to 260.960 be
construed to abrogate or limit any liability of any person in any way
responsible for any release from a dry-cleaning facility or any damages for
personal injury or property damages caused by such a release.
4. Moneys in the fund shall not be used for compensating third parties
for bodily injury or property damage caused by a release from a dry-cleaning
facility, other than property damage included in the corrective action plan
approved by the director.
5. To the extent that an operator, owner or other person is eligible
pursuant to the provisions of sections 260.900 to 260.960 to have corrective
action costs paid by the fund, no administrative or judicial claim may be made
under state law against any such operator, owner or other person by or on
behalf of a state or local government or by any person to either compel
corrective action at the dry-cleaning facility site or seek recovery of the costs
of corrective action at the dry-cleaning facility which result from the release of
dry-cleaning solvents from that dry-cleaning facility or to compel corrective
action or seek recovery of the costs of corrective action which result from the
release of dry-cleaning solvents from a dry-cleaning facility. The provisions
of this subsection shall apply to any dry-cleaning facility or dry-cleaning
facility site which has been included in a corrective action plan approved by
the director. The director shall only approve a corrective action plan after
making a determination that a sufficient balance in the fund exists to
implement the plan. No administrative or judicial claim may be made unless
the director has rejected the corrective action plan submitted pursuant to
section 260.925.]
[260.935. 1. Every active dry-cleaning facility shall pay, in addition to
any other environmental response surcharges, an annual dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge as follows:
(1) Five hundred dollars for facilities which use no more than one
hundred forty gallons of chlorinated solvents;
(2) One thousand dollars for facilities which use more than one
hundred forty gallons of chlorinated solvents and less than three hundred sixty
gallons of chlorinated solvents per year; and
(3) Fifteen hundred dollars for facilities which use at least three
hundred sixty gallons of chlorinated solvents per year.
2. The active dry-cleaning facility registration surcharge imposed by
this section shall be reported and paid to the department on an annual basis.
The commission shall prescribe by administrative rule the procedure for the
report and payment required by this section.
3. The department shall provide each person who pays a dry-cleaning
facility registration surcharge pursuant to this section with a receipt. The
receipt or the copy of the receipt shall be produced for inspection at the request
of any authorized representative of the department.
4. All moneys collected or received by the department pursuant to this
section shall be transmitted to the department of revenue for deposit in the
state treasury to the credit of the dry-cleaning environmental response trust

HCS HB 3092 168
fund created in section 260.920. Following each annual reporting date, the
state treasurer shall certify the amount deposited in the fund to the department.
5. If any person does not pay the active dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge or any portion of the active dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge imposed by this section by the date prescribed for such
payment, the department shall impose and such person shall pay, in addition to
the active dry-cleaning facility registration surcharge owed by such person, a
penalty of fifteen percent of the active dry-cleaning facility registration
surcharge. Such penalty shall be deposited in the dry-cleaning environmental
response trust fund.
6. If any person does not pay the active dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge or any portion of the active dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge imposed by this section by the date prescribed for such
payment, the department shall also impose interest upon the unpaid amount at
the rate of ten percent per annum from the date prescribed for the payment of
such surcharge and penalties until payment is actually made. Such interest
shall be deposited in the dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund.]
[260.940. 1. Every seller or provider of dry-cleaning solvent for use in
this state shall pay, in addition to any other environmental response surcharges,
a dry-cleaning solvent surcharge on the sale or provision of dry-cleaning
solvent.
2. The amount of the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge imposed by this
section on each gallon of dry-cleaning solvent shall be an amount equal to the
product of the solvent factor for the dry-cleaning solvent and the rate of eight
dollars per gallon.
3. The solvent factor for each dry-cleaning solvent is as follows:
(1) For perchloroethylene, the solvent factor is 1.00;
(2) For 1,1,1-trichloroethane, the solvent factor is 1.00; and
(3) For other chlorinated dry-cleaning solvents, the solvent factor is
1.00.
4. In the case of a fraction of a gallon, the dry-cleaning solvent
surcharge imposed by this section shall be the same fraction of the fee imposed
on a whole gallon.
5. The dry-cleaning solvent surcharge required in this section shall be
paid to the department by the seller or provider of the dry-cleaning solvent,
regardless of the location of such seller or provider.
6. The dry-cleaning solvent surcharge required in this section shall be
paid by the seller or provider on a quarterly basis and shall be paid to the
department for the previous quarter. The commission shall prescribe by
administrative rule the procedure for the payment required by this section.
7. The department shall provide each person who pays a dry-cleaning
solvent surcharge pursuant to this section with a receipt. The receipt or the
copy of the receipt shall be produced for inspection at the request of any
authorized representative of the department.
8. All moneys collected or received by the department pursuant to this
section shall be transmitted to the department of revenue for deposit in the
state treasury to the credit of the dry-cleaning environmental response trust

HCS HB 3092 169
fund created in section 260.920. Following each annual or quarterly reporting
date, the state treasurer shall certify the amount deposited to the department.
9. If any seller or provider of dry-cleaning solvent fails or refuses to
pay the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge imposed by this section, the department
shall impose and such seller or provider shall pay, in addition to the dry-
cleaning solvent surcharge owed by the seller or provider, a penalty of fifteen
percent of the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge. Such penalty shall be deposited
in the dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund.
10. If any person does not pay the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge or
any portion of the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge imposed by this section by
the date prescribed for such payment, the department shall impose and such
person shall pay interest upon the unpaid amount at the rate of ten percent per
annum from the date prescribed for the payment of such surcharge and
penalties until payment is actually made. Such interest shall be deposited in
the dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund.
11. An operator of a dry-cleaning facility shall not purchase or obtain
solvent from a seller or provider who does not pay the dry-cleaning solvent
charge, as provided in this section. Any operator of a dry-cleaning facility
who fails to obey the provisions of this section shall be required to pay the dry-
cleaning solvent surcharge as provided in subsections 2, 3 and 4 of this section
for any dry-cleaning solvent purchased or obtained from a seller or provider
who fails to pay the proper dry-cleaning solvent surcharge as determined by
the department. Any operator of a dry-cleaning facility who fails to follow the
provisions of this subsection shall also be charged a penalty of fifteen percent
of the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge owed. Any operator of a dry-cleaning
facility who fails to obey the provisions of this subsection shall also be subject
to the interest provisions of subsection 10 of this section. If a seller or
provider of dry-cleaning solvent charges the operator of a dry-cleaning facility
the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge provided for in this section when the
solvent is purchased or obtained by the operator and the operator can prove
that the operator made full payment of the surcharge to the seller or provider
but the seller or provider fails to pay the surcharge to the department as
required by this section, then the operator shall not be liable pursuant to this
subsection for interest, penalties or the seller's or provider's unpaid surcharge.
Such surcharges, penalties and interest shall be collected by the department,
and all moneys collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the
dry-cleaning environmental response trust fund.]
[260.945. 1. If the unobligated principal of the fund equals or exceeds
five million dollars on April first of any year, the active dry-cleaning facility
registration surcharge imposed by section 260.935 and the dry-cleaning
solvent surcharge imposed by section 260.940 shall not be collected on or after
the next July first until such time as on April first of any year thereafter the
unobligated principal balance of the fund equals two million dollars or less,
then the active dry-cleaning facility registration surcharge imposed by section
260.935 and the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge imposed by section 260.940
shall again be collected on and after the next July first.

HCS HB 3092 170
2. Not later than April fifth of each year, the state treasurer shall notify
the department of the amount of the unobligated balance of the fund on April
first of such year. Upon receipt of the notice, the department shall notify the
public if the active dry-cleaning facility registration surcharge imposed by
section 260.935 and the dry-cleaning solvent surcharge imposed by section
260.940 will terminate or be payable on the following July first.
3. Moneys in the fund shall not be expended pursuant to sections
260.900 to 260.960 prior to July 1, 2002.]
[260.950. 1. All final orders and determinations of the commission or
the department made pursuant to the provisions of sections 260.900 to 260.960
are subject to judicial review pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536. All
final orders and determinations shall be deemed administrative decisions as
that term is defined in chapter 536; provided that, no judicial review shall be
available, unless all administrative remedies are exhausted.
2. In any suit filed pursuant to section 536.050 concerning the validity
of the commission's or department's standards, rules or regulations, the court
shall review the record made before the commission or department to
determine the validity and such reasonableness of such standards, rules or
regulations and may hear such additional evidence as it deems necessary.]
[260.955. The department shall annually transmit a report to the
general assembly and the governor regarding:
(1) Receipts of the fund during the preceding calendar year and the
sources of the receipts;
(2) Disbursements from the fund during the preceding calendar year
and the purposes of the disbursements;
(3) The extent of corrective action taken pursuant to sections 260.900
to 260.960 during the preceding calendar year; and
(4) The prioritization of sites for expenditures from the fund.]
[260.960. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
effective date of this act shall be invalid and void.]
[260.965. The provisions of sections 260.900 to 260.965 shall expire
August 28, 2017.]
[301.213. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 301.200 and
301.210, any person licensed as a motor vehicle dealer under sections 301.550
to 301.580 that has provided to the director of revenue a surety bond or
irrevocable letter of credit in an amount not less than one hundred thousand

HCS HB 3092 171
dollars in a form which complies with the requirements of section 301.560 and
in lieu of the fifty thousand dollar bond otherwise required for licensure as a
motor vehicle dealer shall be authorized to purchase or accept in trade any
motor vehicle for which there has been issued a certificate of ownership, and
to receive such vehicle subject to any existing liens thereon created and
perfected under sections 301.600 to 301.660 provided the licensed dealer
receives the following:
(1) A signed written contract between the licensed dealer and the
owner of the vehicle outlining the terms of the sale or acceptance in trade of
such motor vehicle without transfer of the certificate of ownership; and
(2) Physical delivery of the vehicle to the licensed dealer; and
(3) A power of attorney from the owner to the licensed dealer, in
accordance with subsection 4 of section 301.300, authorizing the licensed
dealer to obtain a duplicate or replacement title in the owner's name and sign
any title assignments on the owner's behalf.
2. If the dealer complies with the requirements of subsection 1 of this
section, the sale or trade of the vehicle to the dealer shall be considered final,
subject to any existing liens created and perfected under sections 301.600 to
301.660. Once the prior owner of the motor vehicle has physically delivered
the motor vehicle to the licensed dealer, the prior owners' insurable interest in
such vehicle shall cease to exist.
3. If a licensed dealer complies with the requirements of subsection 1
of this section, and such dealer has provided to the director of revenue a surety
bond or irrevocable letter of credit in amount not less than one hundred
thousand dollars in a form which complies with the requirements of section
301.560 and in lieu of the fifty thousand dollar bond otherwise required for
licensure as a motor vehicle dealer, such dealer may sell such vehicle prior to
receiving and assigning to the purchaser the certificate of ownership, provided
such dealer complies with the following:
(1) All outstanding liens created on the vehicle pursuant to sections
301.600 to 301.660 have been paid in full, and the dealer provides a copy of
proof or other evidence to the purchaser; and
(2) The dealer has obtained proof or other evidence from the
department of revenue confirming that no outstanding child support liens exist
upon the vehicle at the time of sale and provides a copy of said proof or other
evidence to the purchaser; and
(3) The dealer has obtained proof or other evidence from the
department of revenue confirming that all applicable state sales tax has been
satisfied on the sale of the vehicle to the previous owner and provides a copy
of said proof or other evidence to the purchaser; and
(4) The dealer has signed an application for duplicate or replacement
title for the vehicle under subsection 4 of section 301.300 and provides a copy
of the application to the purchaser, along with a copy of the power of attorney
required by subsection 1 of this section, and the dealer has prepared and
delivered to the purchaser an application for title for the vehicle in the
purchaser's name; and
(5) The dealer and the purchaser have entered into a written agreement
for the subsequent assignment and delivery of such certificate of ownership,

HCS HB 3092 172
on a form prescribed by the director of revenue, to take place at a time, not to
exceed sixty calendar days, after the time of delivery of the motor vehicle to
the purchaser. Such agreement shall require the purchaser to provide to the
dealer proof of financial responsibility in accordance with chapter 303 and
proof of comprehensive and collision coverage on the motor vehicle. Such
dealer shall maintain the original or an electronic copy of the signed agreement
and deliver a copy of the signed agreement to the purchaser. Such dealer shall
also complete and deliver to the director of revenue such form as the director
shall prescribe demonstrating that the purchaser has purchased the vehicle
without contemporaneous delivery of the title.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, completion of the
requirements of this subsection shall constitute prima facie evidence of an
ownership interest vested in the purchaser of the vehicle for all purposes other
than for a subsequent transfer of ownership of the vehicle by the purchaser,
subject to the rights of any secured lienholder of record; however, the
purchaser may use the dealer-supplied copy of the agreement to transfer his or
her ownership of the vehicle to an insurance company in situations where the
vehicle has been declared salvage or a total loss by the insurance company as a
result of a settlement of a claim. Such insurance company may apply for a
salvage certificate of title or junking certificate pursuant to the provisions of
subsection 3 of section 301.193 in order to transfer its interest in such vehicle.
The purchaser may also use the dealer-supplied copy of the agreement on the
form prescribed by the director of revenue as proof of ownership interest. Any
lender or insurance company may rely upon a copy of the signed written
agreement on the form prescribed by the director of revenue as proof of
ownership interest. Any lien placed upon a vehicle based upon such signed
written agreement shall be valid and enforceable, notwithstanding the absence
of a certificate of ownership.
4. Following a sale or other transaction in which a certificate of
ownership has not been assigned from the owner to the licensed dealer, the
dealer shall, within ten business days, apply for a duplicate or replacement
certificate of ownership. Upon receipt of a duplicate or replacement certificate
of ownership applied for under subsection 4 of section 301.300, the dealer
shall assign and deliver said certificate of ownership to the purchaser of the
vehicle within five business days. The dealer shall maintain proof of the
assignment and delivery of the certificate of ownership to the purchaser. For
purposes of this subsection, a dealer shall be deemed to have delivered the
certificate of ownership to the purchaser upon either:
(1) Physical delivery of the certificate of ownership to any of the
purchasers identified in the contract with such dealer; or
(2) Mailing of the certificate, postage prepaid, return receipt requested,
to any of the purchasers at any of their addresses identified in the contract with
such dealer.
5. If a licensed dealer fails to comply with subsection 3 of this section,
and the purchaser of the vehicle is thereby damaged, then the dealer shall be
liable to the purchaser of the vehicle for actual damages, plus court costs and
100 reasonable attorney fees.

HCS HB 3092 173
101 6. If a licensed dealer fails or is unable to comply with subsection 4 of
102 this section, and the purchaser of the vehicle is thereby damaged, then the
103 dealer shall be liable to the purchaser of the vehicle for actual damages, plus
104 court costs and reasonable attorney fees. If the dealer cannot be found by the
105 purchaser after making reasonable attempts, or if the dealer fails to assign and
106 deliver the duplicate or replacement certificate of ownership to the purchaser
107 by the date agreed upon by the dealer and the purchaser, as required by
108 subsection 4 of this section, then the purchaser may deliver to the director a
109 copy of the contract for sale of the vehicle, a copy of the application for
110 duplicate title provided by the dealer to the purchaser, a copy of the secure
111 power of attorney allowing the dealer to assign the duplicate title, and the
112 proof or other evidence obtained by the purchaser from the dealer under
113 subsection 3 of this section. Thereafter, the director shall mail by certified
114 mail, return receipt requested, a notice to the dealer at the last address given to
115 the department by that dealer. That notice shall inform the dealer that the
116 director intends to cancel any prior certificate of title which may have been
117 issued to the dealer on the vehicle and issue to the purchaser a certificate of
118 title in the name of the purchaser, subject to any liens incurred by the
119 purchaser in connection with the purchase of the vehicle, unless the dealer,
120 within ten business days from the date of the director's notice, files with the
121 director a written objection to the director taking such action. If the dealer
122 does file a timely, written objection with the director, then the director shall not
123 take any further action without an order from a court of competent jurisdiction.
124 However, if the dealer does not file a timely, written objection with the
125 director, then the director shall cancel the prior certificate of title issued to the
126 dealer on the vehicle and issue a certificate of title to the purchaser of the
127 vehicle, subject to any liens incurred by the purchaser in connection with the
128 purchase of the vehicle and subject to the purchaser satisfying all applicable
129 taxes and fees associated with registering the vehicle.
130 7. If a seller misrepresents to a dealer that the seller is the owner of a
131 vehicle and the dealer, the owner, any subsequent purchaser, or any prior or
132 subsequent lienholder is thereby damaged, then the seller shall be liable to
133 each such party for actual and punitive damages, plus court costs and
134 reasonable attorney fees.
135 8. When a lienholder is damaged as a result of a licensed dealer's acts,
136 errors, omissions, or violations of this section, then the dealer shall be liable to
137 the lienholder for actual damages, plus court costs and reasonable attorney
138 fees.
139 9. No court costs or attorney fees shall be awarded under this section
140 unless, prior to filing any such action, the following conditions have been met:
141 (1) The aggrieved party seeking damages has delivered an itemized
142 written demand of the party's actual damages to the party from whom damages
143 are sought; and
144 (2) The party from whom damages are sought has not satisfied the
145 written demand within thirty days after receipt of the written demand.
146 10. The department of revenue may use a dealer's repeated or
147 intentional violation of this section as a cause to suspend, revoke, or refuse to
148 issue or renew any license required pursuant to sections 301.550 to 301.580, in

HCS HB 3092 174
149 addition to the causes set forth in section 301.562. The hearing process shall
150 be the same as that established in subsection 6 of section 301.562.
151 11. No dealer shall enter into a contract under this section after
152 December 31, 2020. Any contract entered into prior to December 31, 2020,
153 shall be enforceable as provided in this section. This section shall be repealed
154 effective December 31, 2020.]
[319.140. 1. There is established a task force of the general assembly
to be known as the "Task Force on the Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance
Fund". Such task force shall be composed of eight members. Three members
shall be from the house of representatives with two appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives and one appointed by the minority floor leader
of the house of representatives. Three members shall be from the senate with
two appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate and one appointed by
the minority floor leader of the senate. Two members shall be industry
stakeholders with one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives
and one appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate. No more than
two members from either the house of representatives or the senate shall be
from the same political party. A majority of the task force shall constitute a
quorum.
2. The task force shall conduct research and compile a report for
delivery to the general assembly by December 31, 2018, on the following:
(1) The efficacy of the petroleum storage tank insurance fund and
program;
(2) The sustainability of the petroleum storage tank insurance fund and
program;
(3) The administration of the petroleum storage tank insurance fund
and program;
(4) The availability of private insurance for above- and below-ground
petroleum storage tanks, and the necessity of insurance subsidies created
through the petroleum storage tank insurance program;
(5) Compliance with federal programs, regulations, and advisory
reports; and
(6) The comparability of the petroleum storage tank insurance
program to other states' programs and states without such programs.
3. The task force shall meet within thirty days after its creation and
organize by selecting a chairperson and vice chairperson, one of whom shall
be a member of the senate and the other a member of the house of
representatives. Thereafter, the task force may meet as often as necessary in
order to accomplish the tasks assigned to it.
4. The task force shall be staffed by legislative staff as necessary to
assist the task force in the performance of its duties.
5. The members of the task force shall serve without compensation but
shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred
in the performance of their official duties.
6. This section shall expire on December 31, 2018.]

HCS HB 3092 175
[320.093. 1. Any person, firm or corporation who purchases a dry fire
hydrant, as defined in section 320.273, or provides an acceptable means of
water storage for such dry fire hydrant including a pond, tank or other storage
facility with the primary purpose of fire protection within the state of Missouri,
shall be eligible for a credit on income taxes otherwise due pursuant to chapter
143, except sections 143.191 to 143.261, as an incentive to implement safe and
efficient fire protection controls. The tax credit, not to exceed five thousand
dollars, shall be equal to fifty percent of the cost in actual expenditure for any
new water storage construction, equipment, development and installation of
the dry hydrant, including pipes, valves, hydrants and labor for each such
installation of a dry hydrant or new water storage facility. The amount of the
tax credit claimed for in-kind contributions shall not exceed twenty-five
percent of the total amount of the contribution for which the tax credit is
claimed.
2. Any amount of credit which exceeds the tax due shall not be
refunded but may be carried over to any subsequent taxable year, not to exceed
seven years. The person, firm or corporation may elect to assign to a third
party the approved tax credit. The certificate of assignment and other
appropriate forms shall be filed with the Missouri department of revenue and
the department of economic development.
3. The person, firm or corporation shall make application for the credit
to the department of economic development after receiving approval of the
state fire marshal. The fire marshal shall establish by rule promulgated
pursuant to chapter 536 the requirements to be met based on the National
Resources Conservation Service's Dry Hydrant Standard. The state fire
marshal or designated local representative shall review and authorize the
construction and installation of any dry fire hydrant site. Only approved dry
fire hydrant sites shall be eligible for tax credits as indicated in this section.
Under no circumstance shall such authority deny any entity the ability to
provide a dry fire hydrant site when tax credits are not requested.
4. The department of public safety shall certify to the department of
revenue that the dry hydrant system meets the requirements to obtain a tax
credit as specified in subsection 5 of this section.
5. In order to qualify for a tax credit under this section, a dry hydrant
or new water storage facility shall meet the following minimum requirements:
(1) Each body of water or water storage structure shall be able to
provide two hundred fifty gallons per minute for a continuous two-hour period
during a fifty-year drought or freeze at a vertical lift of eighteen feet;
(2) Each dry hydrant shall be located within twenty-five feet of an all-
weather roadway and shall be accessible to fire protection equipment;
(3) Dry hydrants shall be located a reasonable distance from other dry
or pressurized hydrants; and
(4) The site shall provide a measurable economic improvement
potential for rural development.
6. New credits shall not be awarded under this section after August 28,
2010. The total amount of all tax credits allowed pursuant to this section is
five hundred thousand dollars in any one fiscal year as approved by the
director of the department of economic development.

HCS HB 3092 176
7. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2007, shall be invalid and void.]
[332.304. The specific duties of the committee shall include the
following:
(1) Designing a training program for dental hygienists which allows
coursework to be completed off-site from the educational institution, and
clinical and didactic training to be delivered in the office of a dentist licensed
under this chapter, if such offsite dental office is a part of an accredited dental
hygiene program through the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the
American Dental Association as an extended campus facility or any other
facility approved by the council on dental accreditation;
(2) Developing suggestions for the creation of a contract between the
department and an institution of higher education to establish the training
program designed under subdivision (1) of this section;
(3) Analyzing issues relating to the curriculum, funding, and
administration of the training program designed under subdivision (1) of
this section; and
(4) On or before November 1, 2005, delivering to both houses of the
general assembly and the governor a report on the training program designed
under subdivision (1) of this section and any suggestions developed and
analysis made under subdivisions (2) and (3) of this section.]
[332.305. The committee shall dissolve upon delivery of the report
required under subdivision (4) of section 332.304.]
[334.153. 1. No person other than a physician licensed under this
chapter shall perform the following interventions in the course of diagnosing
or treating pain which is chronic, persistent and intractable, or occurs outside
of a surgical, obstetrical, or postoperative course of care:
(1) Ablation of targeted nerves;
(2) Percutaneous precision needle placement within the spinal column
with placement of drugs, such as local anesthetics, steroids, and analgesics, in
the spinal column under fluoroscopic guidance. The provisions of this
subdivision shall not apply to interlaminar lumbar epidural injections
performed in a hospital as defined in section 197.020 or an ambulatory
surgery center as defined in section 197.200 if the standard of care for
Medicare reimbursement for interlaminar or translaminar lumbar epidural
injections is changed after August 28, 2012, to allow reimbursement only with
the use of image guidance; or

HCS HB 3092 177
(3) Laser or endoscopic discectomy, or the surgical placement of
intrathecal infusion pumps, and or spinal cord stimulators.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or restrict the
performance of surgical or obstetrical anesthesia services or postoperative pain
control by a certified registered nurse anesthetist pursuant to subsection 7 of
section 334.104 or by an anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to
sections 334.400 to 334.434.
3. The state board of registration for the healing arts may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section, except that such authority
shall not apply to rulemaking authority to define or regulate the scope of
practice of certified registered nurse anesthetists. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2012, shall be invalid and void.
4. The provisions of this section shall automatically expire four years
after August 28, 2012, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly.]
[334.1135. 1. There is hereby established a joint task force to be
known as the "Joint Task Force on Radiologic Technologist Licensure".
2. The task force shall be composed of the following:
(1) Two members of the senate, one of whom shall be appointed by the
president pro tempore and one by the minority leader of the senate;
(2) Two members of the house of representatives, one of whom shall
be appointed by the speaker and one by the minority leader of the house of
representatives;
(3) A clinic administrator, or his or her designee, appointed by the
Missouri Association of Rural Health Clinics;
(4) A physician appointed by the Missouri State Medical Association;
(5) A pain management physician appointed by the Missouri Society
of Anesthesiologists;
(6) A radiologic technologist appointed by the Missouri Society of
Radiologic Technologists;
(7) A nuclear medicine technologist appointed by the Missouri Valley
Chapter of the Society of Nuclear Medicine and Molecular Imaging;
(8) An administrator of an ambulatory surgical center appointed by the
Missouri Ambulatory Surgical Center Association;
(9) A physician appointed by the Missouri Academy of Family
Physicians;
(10) A certified registered nurse anesthetist appointed by the Missouri
Association of Nurse Anesthetists;
(11) A physician appointed by the Missouri Radiological Society;
(12) The director of the Missouri state board of registration for the
healing arts, or his or her designee; and

HCS HB 3092 178
(13) The director of the Missouri state board of nursing, or his or her
designee.
3. The task force shall review the current status of licensure of
radiologic technologists in Missouri and shall develop a plan to address the
most appropriate method to protect public safety when radiologic imaging and
radiologic procedures are utilized. The plan shall include:
(1) An analysis of the risks associated if radiologic technologists are
not licensed;
(2) The creation of a Radiologic Imaging and Radiation Therapy
Advisory Commission;
(3) Procedures to address the specific needs of rural health care and
the availability of licensed radiologic technologists;
(4) Requirements for licensure of radiographers, radiation therapists,
nuclear medicine technologists, nuclear medicine advanced associates,
radiologist assistants, and limited x-ray machine operators;
(5) Reasonable exemptions to licensure;
(6) Continuing education and training;
(7) Penalty provisions; and
(8) Other items that the task force deems relevant for the proper
determination of licensure of radiologic technologists in Missouri.
4. The task force shall meet within thirty days of its creation and select
a chair and vice chair. A majority of the task force shall constitute a quorum,
but the concurrence of a majority of total members shall be required for the
determination of any matter within the task force's duties.
5. The task force shall be staffed by legislative personnel as is deemed
necessary to assist the task force in the performance of its duties.
6. The members of the task force shall serve without compensation,
but may, subject to appropriation, be entitled to reimbursement for actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.
7. The task force shall submit a full report of its activities, including
the plan developed under subsection 3 of this section, to the general assembly
on or before January 15, 2020. The task force shall send copies of the report to
the director of the division of professional registration.]
[338.320. 1. There is hereby established the "Missouri Electronic
Prior Authorization Committee" in order to facilitate, monitor, and report to
the general assembly on Missouri-based efforts to contribute to the
establishment of national electronic prior authorization standards. Such
efforts shall include the Missouri-based electronic prior authorization pilot
program established under subsection 5 of this section and the study and
dissemination of information by the committee of the efforts of the National
Council on Prescription Drug Programs (NCPDP) to develop national
electronic prior authorization standards. The committee shall advise the
general assembly and the department of commerce and insurance as to whether
there is a need for administrative rules to be promulgated by the department of
commerce and insurance as soon as practically possible.
2. The Missouri electronic prior authorization committee shall consist
of the following members:

HCS HB 3092 179
(1) Two members of the senate, appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate;
(2) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(3) One member from an organization of licensed physicians in the
state;
(4) One member who is a physician licensed in Missouri pursuant to
chapter 334;
(5) One member who is a representative of a Missouri pharmacy
benefit management company;
(6) One member from an organization representing licensed
pharmacists in the state;
(7) One member from the business community representing businesses
on health insurance issues;
(8) One member from an organization representing the leading
research-based pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies;
(9) One member from an organization representing the largest generic
pharmaceutical trade association;
(10) One patient advocate;
(11) One member from an electronic prescription network that
facilitates the secure electronic exchange of clinical information between
physicians, pharmacies, payers, and pharmacy benefit managers and other
health care providers;
(12) One member from a Missouri-based electronic health records
company;
(13) One member from an organization representing the largest
number of hospitals in the state;
(14) One member from a health carrier as such term is defined under
section 376.1350;
(15) One member from an organization representing the largest
number of health carriers in the state, as such term is defined under section
376.1350;
(16) The director of the department of social services, or the director's
designee;
(17) The director of the department of commerce and insurance, who
shall be chair of the committee.
3. All of the members, except for the members from the general
assembly, shall be appointed by the governor no later than September 1, 2012,
with the advice and consent of the senate. The staff of the department of
commerce and insurance shall provide assistance to the committee.
4. The duties of the committee shall be as follows:
(1) Before February 1, 2019, monitor and report to the general
assembly on the Missouri-based electronic prior authorization pilot program
created under subsection 5 of this section including a report of the outcomes
and best practices developed as a result of the pilot program and how such
information can be used to inform the national standard-setting process;

HCS HB 3092 180
(2) Obtain specific updates from the NCPDP and other pharmacy
benefit managers and vendors that are currently engaged in pilot programs
working toward national electronic prior authorization standards;
(3) Correspond and collaborate with the NCPDP and other such pilots
through the exchange of information and ideas;
(4) Assist, when asked by the pharmacy benefit manager, with the
development of the pilot program created under subsection 5 of this section
with an understanding of information on the success and failures of other pilot
programs across the country;
(5) Prepare a report at the end of each calendar year to be distributed to
the general assembly and governor with a summary of the committee's
progress and plans for the next calendar year, including a report on Missouri-
based efforts to contribute to the establishment of national electronic prior
authorization standards. Such annual report shall continue until such time as
the NCPDP has established national electronic prior authorization standards or
this section has expired, whichever is sooner. The first report shall be
completed before January 1, 2013;
(6) Upon the adoption of national electronic prior authorization
standards by the NCPDP, prepare a final report to be distributed to the general
assembly and governor that identifies the appropriate Missouri administrative
regulations, if any, that will need to be promulgated by the department of
commerce and insurance, in order to make those standards effective as soon as
practically possible, and advise the general assembly and governor if there are
any legislative actions necessary to the furtherance of that end.
5. The department of commerce and insurance and the Missouri
electronic prior authorization committee shall recruit a Missouri-based
pharmacy benefits manager doing business nationally to volunteer to
conduct an electronic prior authorization pilot program in Missouri. The
pharmacy benefits manager conducting the pilot program shall ensure that
there are adequate Missouri licensed physicians and an electronic prior
authorization vendor capable and willing to participate in a Missouri-based
pilot program. Such pilot program established under this section shall be
operational by January 1, 2014. The department and the committee may
provide advice or assistance to the pharmacy benefit manager conducting the
pilot program but shall not maintain control or lead with the direction of the
pilot program.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
shall sunset automatically six years after August 28, 2012, unless reauthorized
100 by an act of the general assembly; and
101 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
102 section shall sunset automatically twelve years after the effective date of the
103 reauthorization of this section; and
104 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
105 immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
106 under this section is sunset.]

HCS HB 3092 181
[354.215. The provisions of sections 374.261 to 374.269, which relate
to the insurance examiner's sick leave fund, shall apply to health services
corporations certified to operate in this state in the same manner as these
sections now apply to those domestic insurers which pay a premium tax and
are engaged in the business of insurance within this state. The provisions of
sections 374.261 to 374.269 shall also apply to examiners of the department of
commerce and insurance conducting examinations under section 354.190 in
the same manner as these sections now apply to examiners of the department
of commerce and insurance conducting examinations under section 374.190.]
[374.007. 1. The revisor of statutes shall change all references in the
revised statutes of Missouri from "department of insurance", "insurance
department" or "department of insurance, financial and professional
regulation" to "department of insurance, financial institutions and
professional registration".
2. The revisor of statutes shall change all references in the revised
statutes of Missouri from "director of insurance" or "commissioner of
insurance" to "director of the department of insurance, financial institutions
and professional registration".]
[375.355. 1. Any insurance company organized under the laws of this
state may hereafter, with the approval of the director first obtained,
(1) Organize any subsidiary insurance company in which it shall own
and hold not less than a majority of the common stock; or
(2) Acquire control of another insurance company by purchase,
merger or otherwise, regardless of the domicile of any company so organized
or acquired, for the purpose of operating any such company under a plan of
common control.
2. Whenever any insurance company shall propose under the
provisions of this section to acquire control of another insurance company
by purchase, merger or otherwise or to dispose of any stock so purchased or so
acquired, it shall present its petition to the director setting forth the terms and
conditions of the proposed acquisition or disposition and praying for the
approval of the acquisition or disposition. The director shall thereupon issue
an order of notice, requiring notice to be given, to the policyholders of a
mutual company and stockholders of a stock company, of the pendency of the
petition, and the time and place at which the same will be heard, by publication
of the order of notice in two daily newspapers designated by the director for at
least once a week for two weeks before the time appointed for the hearing
upon the petition; and any further notice which the director may require shall
be given by the petitioners. At the time and place fixed in the notice, or at
such time and place as shall be fixed by adjournment, the director shall
proceed with the hearing, and may make such examination into the affairs and
conditions of the companies as he may deem proper. For the purpose of
making the examination, or having the same made, the director may employ
the necessary clerical, actuarial, legal, and other assistance. The director of the
department of commerce and insurance of this state shall have the same power
to summon and compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the

HCS HB 3092 182
production of books and papers at the hearing as by law granted in
examinations of companies. Any policyholder or stockholder of the company
or companies may appear before the director and be heard in reference to the
petition. The director, if satisfied that the proposed acquisition or disposition
was properly approved after notice as required by the articles and bylaws of
the company or companies, and that the interest of the policyholders of the
company or companies is protected, and that no reasonable objection exists as
to the acquisition or disposition, and that the acquisition will not tend to
substantially lessen competition or create a monopoly, shall approve and
authorize the proposed acquisition or disposition. All expenses and costs
incident to the proceedings under this subsection shall be paid by the company
or companies bringing the petition.
3. The shares of any subsidiary life insurance company acquired or
held under the provisions of this section by a parent life insurance company
organized under the provisions of chapter 376 shall be eligible for deposit by
the parent life insurance company as provided in section 376.170 at a value no
greater than the proportion of the capital and surplus of the subsidiary
company as shown by its last annual statement filed in the state of its domicile
represented by the shares held by the parent life insurance company, but only
to the extent that the capital and surplus is represented by cash or securities of
the kind and type eligible for deposit under the provisions of section 376.170
and other applicable statutes.
4. (1) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the acquisition
or disposition by purchase, sale or otherwise of not less than the majority of
the stock of any insurance company domiciled outside of the state of Missouri,
if the consideration involved in such acquisition or disposition does not exceed
the following threshold:
(a) With respect to an insurance holding company, so long as such
consideration does not exceed the lesser of three percent of its consolidated
assets or twenty percent of its consolidated stockholders' equity as of the
thirty-first day of December of the preceding year according to its consolidated
balance sheet prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles and audited by independent certified accountants in accordance with
generally acceptable auditing standards; or
(b) With respect to an insurance company organized under the laws of
this state, so long as such consideration does not exceed the lesser of three
percent of its assets or ten percent of its capital and surplus as of the thirty-first
day of December of the preceding year according to its balance sheet prepared
in accordance with accounting practices prescribed or permitted by the
department of commerce and insurance and in conformity with the practices
of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and audited by
independent certified accountants in accordance with generally acceptable
auditing standards.
(2) In calculating the amount of consideration involved in such
acquisition or disposition for the purposes of subdivision (1) of this subsection,
there shall be included total net moneys or other consideration expended, and
obligations assumed in the acquisition or disposition, including all
organizational expenses and contributions to capital and surplus of such

HCS HB 3092 183
insurance company domiciled outside of the state of Missouri, whether
represented by the purchase of capital stock or issuance of other securities.
For the purposes of this subsection, the term "insurance holding company"
means a domestic insurance holding company in which the majority of stock is
owned by a domestic insurance company, or a domestic insurance holding
company which owns the majority of the stock of a domestic insurance
company.]
[375.380. 1. It shall not be lawful for the directors, trustees or
managers of any insurance company to make any dividend, except from the
surplus profits arising from their business, nor for any company to solicit or do
new business, when its assets are less than three-fourths of its liabilities.
2. Any company violating the provisions aforesaid shall be subject to
proceedings for dissolution.
3. Each stockholder in a stock company receiving any dividend made
in violation of the above provision shall be liable to the creditors of such
company to the extent of the dividend received, with compound interest on the
same from the date of its receipt, as well as the costs of collecting the same,
and the managers, trustees or directors assenting to the same, or any agent
soliciting or doing new business, knowing or having reasonable cause to
believe that such company is impaired as aforesaid, shall be deemed guilty of a
violation of the provisions of this law, and shall be punished as by sections
375.010 to 375.920 provided.]
[375.480. 1. When any company, which has on deposit the securities
named in section 376.170 with the director of the department of commerce and
insurance, shall desire to relinquish and cease its business in this state, said
director shall, upon application of such company, under the oath of the
president or vice president and secretary or assistant secretary, give notice of
such intention in any newspaper of general circulation published in the county
or city in which said company is located, if it is a company of this state, or in
some newspaper published in the city of St. Louis, if it is a company of another
state or government, at least twice a week for six weeks.
2. After such publication he shall deliver up and transfer to said
company the securities held by him and belonging to the company; but before
making such transfer, the director shall be satisfied, by an examination of the
books and papers of such company, to be made by himself or some competent
person to be appointed by him, or by the oath of the acting president and
secretary or assistant secretary of said company if it be a company organized
under the laws of this state, that all debts and liabilities of every kind that are
due, or may become due, upon all contracts or agreements made with the
policyholders in said company, or in any company reinsured by said company,
if the deposit is that of a reinsured company and is held for the security of the
policyholders of said reinsured company under sections 375.010 to 375.920,
are released, satisfied or extinguished; or if it be a company not organized
under the laws of this state, that all debts and liabilities of every kind, whether
fixed or contingent, due or that may become due to this state or to any county
or municipality or citizen thereof, are released, satisfied or extinguished; and

HCS HB 3092 184
the said director may, from time to time, authorize the delivery in the manner
aforesaid, to such company or its assigns, of any portion of such securities, on
being satisfied in the manner and form aforesaid, that all debts and liabilities of
every kind as aforesaid are less than one-half the amount of the said securities
which are retained.]
[376.170. All life insurance companies organized under the provisions
of sections 376.010 to 376.670 shall deposit with the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, in addition to other amounts required
by law to be deposited by life insurance companies before such companies are
permitted to engage in the business of issuing policies of life insurance and
annuity bonds, cash or securities of the kind and type in which life insurance
companies are required to invest their funds under sections 376.291 to
376.307, as same now is or as same may be hereafter amended, in an amount
sufficient to equal the net value on all policies or annuity bonds hereafter
issued by such companies, the amount thereof to be determined by an
evaluation made in accord with the provisions of sections 376.010 to 376.670.]
[376.180. 1. After making the deposits mentioned in section 376.170,
the company shall issue its policies of insurance or annuity bonds and each
policy may have set out in the body thereof the following: "This policy is
registered and the net reserves secured by a pledge of bonds, deeds of trust on
real estate and other securities deposited with the department of commerce and
insurance of Missouri as required by section 376.170, RSMo."
2. The company under the supervision of the director shall prepare and
keep a permanent register thereof.
3. The provisions of this section pertaining to the registration of
policies shall not apply to policies issued on the industrial or prudential plans
except when such policies exceed one thousand dollars in amount, nor shall
the provisions of this section apply to term policies of seven years or less and
in amounts of ten thousand dollars or less, or to policies of group insurance or
group annuity; except that nothing contained herein shall be deemed to prevent
any policy from being registered hereunder, if the company issuing the policy
shall so desire.]
[376.190. The director shall annually cause the registered policies and
annuity bonds of each company outstanding and in force to be carefully
valued, and whenever the total of the actual net value of such policies and
annuity bonds exceeds the market value of the securities on deposit, the
company issuing such policies or annuity bonds shall immediately deposit
sufficient securities of the same kind and type provided for in sections 376.291
to 376.307 to equal the net value of such policies and annuity bonds so that the
market value of the securities deposited shall always be equal to the actual net
value of the registered policies and annuity bonds issued by such company and
still in force.]
[376.210. Whenever the aggregate market value of the securities
deposited by any company shall exceed the net reserve liability of the

HCS HB 3092 185
company on all of its registered policies and annuity bonds, the excess may be
returned to the company, or, whenever the liability of such company on such
policies shall cease, the director of the department of commerce and insurance
shall return the securities deposited.]
[376.220. Should any company depositing under section 376.170
become the owner of real estate for its own use and accommodations, or
become temporarily seized and possessed of real estate in satisfaction of debt
for which such real estate was pledged for security, such company may
execute its own note for the value of such real estate, payable to the director, as
trustee, and secure the said notes or bonds by duly recorded deeds of trust of
said real estate; which notes or bonds thus secured may be deposited with said
director as proper security, under and according to the provisions of sections
376.010 to 376.670, said value to be subject to the approval of the director of
the department of commerce and insurance.]
[376.230. Any company shall have the right at any time to change the
securities on deposit with the director of the department of commerce and
insurance by substituting a like amount of the character required in the first
instance and to withdraw any excess of securities; and so long as such
company shall remain solvent, and the amount of its deposits as herein
required are not impaired, it may collect the interest on the securities deposited
as the same accrues.]
[376.240. The securities deposited under the provisions of section
376.170 shall be legally transferred to the director of the department of
commerce and insurance, and so large an amount thereof as may be necessary
to equal, at all times, the net value of the outstanding registered policies and
annuity bonds, less such liens not exceeding such value as the company may
hold against them, shall be held by him in trust for the purposes of sections
376.010 to 376.670, until the obligations of said companies, under said
registered policies and annuity bonds shall, to the satisfaction of the said
director, be fully liquidated, cancelled or annulled.]
[376.250. The securities deposited under section 376.170 shall be
deposited and kept in the same manner, but separate from other deposits of the
company.]
[376.260. The director of revenue, in addition to other fees allowed by
law, shall be entitled to collect the following fees, including seal, from
companies depositing under section 376.170: For issuing certificates of
deposits, which he is hereby required to do, one dollar; for every other
certificate, including seal, the fee shall be twenty-five cents.]
[376.270. If at any time the affairs of any life insurance company
which has deposited securities under section 376.170 shall, in the opinion of
the director, appear in such condition as to render the issuing of additional
policies and annuity bonds by such company injurious to the public interest,

HCS HB 3092 186
the director may take the same proceedings against such company as by law
may be taken against other insolvent companies; and said companies shall, in
all respects, be subject to the provisions of law affecting other companies.]
[376.752. Any member insurer organized under the provisions of
sections 376.010 to 376.670, or under any general or special laws of this state
and transacting business of the character designated in section 376.010, shall
be exempt from the provisions of section 376.170, relating to the amount
required to be deposited with the director equal to the net value of all policies
and annuity contracts; provided, however, that the extent of such exemption
shall be eighty percent of such net value in the calendar year during which this
act shall become effective, increasing by five percent for each succeeding
calendar year until such exemption shall be equal to one hundred percent of
such net value.]
[377.005. As used in this chapter, unless otherwise clearly indicated
by the context, the following words mean:
(1) "Department", the department of commerce and insurance; and
(2) "Director", the director of the department of commerce and
insurance.]
[377.010. Every contract whereby a benefit is to accrue to a person or
persons named therein, upon the death or physical disability of a person also
named therein, the payment of which said benefit is in any manner or degree
dependent upon the collection of an assessment upon persons holding similar
contracts, shall be deemed a contract of insurance upon the assessment plan,
and the business involving the issuance of such contracts shall be carried on in
this state only by duly organized corporations which shall be subject to the
provisions and requirements of sections 377.010 to 377.190.]
[377.020. 1. Any number of persons, not less than seven, being
citizens of the state of Missouri, may upon application to the circuit court of
the county or city in which it is proposed to locate the chief offices or place of
business, become a body politic or corporate under the name and style
designated in the application, for the purpose of doing a life or casualty, or life
and casualty insurance business on the assessment plan; said application shall
in all cases be accompanied by the articles of association, or agreements,
setting forth specifically the objects and purposes of the proposed corporation,
as well as the methods and plans by which its business shall be conducted, and
upon a hearing of the same, the court may grant or reject the application as it
may deem best.
2. If the application is granted it shall be the duty of the applicant to
cause a copy of said articles, with a copy of the decree of the court duly
certified by the clerk thereof, and by him endorsed on or attached thereto, to be
recorded in the office of the recorder of deeds in the county in which said
corporation is located and then filed in the office of the secretary of state.
3. The secretary of state shall thereupon issue to the applicants
aforesaid a certified copy of the said articles, with the several certificates

HCS HB 3092 187
thereon, as filed in his office, which certified copy shall be the charter of
incorporation, and thereupon said applicants, their associates and successors,
shall be created and be a body politic and corporate by the corporate name as
aforesaid, and such charter, together with sections 377.010 to 377.190, shall be
received in all courts and places as legal evidence of the incorporation of the
said association, society or company; provided, that no decree shall be made,
and no certificate of incorporation issued as aforesaid until the director of the
department of commerce and insurance shall certify that the proposed name of
the corporation is not the same and does not resemble the name of any other
corporations authorized to do business in this state, to the extent of misleading
the public, and further that the society, association or company seeking to be
incorporated has secured applications for not less than one hundred thousand
dollars insurance by not less than one hundred persons, and that thirty
thousand dollars in cash or securities, approved by the director of the
department of commerce and insurance has been deposited with the
department of commerce and insurance, which fund shall be held in trust as
a beneficiary fund by the said director of the department of commerce and
insurance. The term "casualty insurance" as used in sections 377.010 to
377.190, inclusive, shall be construed to mean only accident, health and
hospitalization insurance.
4. After September 1, 1953, no insurance company as described herein
may be incorporated to do business on the assessment plan under the
provisions of sections 377.010 to 377.190. This provision, however, shall not
be construed as restricting or abridging in any manner the right to do business
under the provisions of sections 377.010 to 377.190 of any insurance company
now incorporated and licensed to do business in this state under the assessment
plan.]
[377.030. 1. On written application by the board of directors, the
director of the department of commerce and insurance shall release to said
company from the beneficiary fund the amount herein stated for the purpose of
paying policy beneficiaries as provided later herein.
2. The board of directors shall certify the names of the beneficiaries
and amounts in claims to the director of the department of commerce and
insurance and that the money so released is for no other purpose than to pay
the claims so certified.
3. However, the amount released from this fund by the said director
shall not exceed twelve thousand dollars, which shall be used solely for the
purpose of paying beneficiaries.
4. Such funds so released shall be replaced on deposit by the company
within twelve months in four equal installments, in three, six, nine and twelve
months from the date of release. The director of the department of commerce
and insurance at his own discretion may extend time of replacement of said
funds, if, in his judgment it is to the best interest of the policyholders.
5. This section and section 377.020 shall not apply to companies
already incorporated and existing under the laws of the state of Missouri.
Nothing in sections 377.010 to 377.190 shall prevent any such company or

HCS HB 3092 188
association from engaging in both life and casualty insurance and placing both
a life and casualty clause in the same policy.]
[377.040. 1. Any association, society or company duly incorporated
under the laws of this state, having a bona fide membership of not less than
five hundred persons in good standing, and who hold policies or certificates of
insurance therein in the aggregate of not less than five hundred thousand
dollars, may either reincorporate, as herein provided for incorporation, or
become entitled to do business in this state under the provisions of sections
377.010 to 377.190 in the manner following: A declaration duly authorized by
such corporation, attested by its president and secretary, and with its corporate
seal attached, accompanied by a copy of its charter, bylaws, rules and
regulations, shall be filed in the office of the director of the department of
commerce and insurance showing the number of its members in good
standing, the aggregate amount of insurance held by them, and that it has the
amount of one full assessment upon its members paid in and deposited to its
credit in bank, and that it accepts fully and unconditionally the provisions and
requirements of sections 377.010 to 377.190, and will conform to and abide by
the same in good faith.
2. The said director shall thereupon issue his certificate to such
corporation, setting out the fact that, having complied with the provisions of
sections 377.010 to 377.190 in all respects, it is then permitted and authorized
to do business in this state under the supervision and control of said
department, and subject to the provisions of sections 377.010 to 377.190.]
[377.050. 1. Corporations organized or doing the business of life
insurance under sections 377.010 to 377.190 shall provide for the
accumulation of an emergency fund, which shall be not less than the
proceeds of one death assessment on all policy or certificate holders thereof;
corporations organized or doing the business of casualty insurance under
sections 377.010 to 377.190 shall provide in like manner for the accumulation
of an emergency fund, which shall be equal to the amount of the maximum
policy or certificate which they issue. Said fund shall be accumulated by
existing corporations within six months from the date of accepting the
provisions of sections 377.010 to 377.190, by all others within six months
from the date of their incorporation; which fund, together with the income
thereon, shall be a trust fund for the payment of death claims or other benefits
provided for in their policies or certificates, and shall be invested in securities
in which insurance companies are allowed by law to invest their capital.
2. These securities shall be deposited in trust with the director of the
department of commerce and insurance of the state, but the corporation shall at
all times have the right to exchange any part of said securities for others of a
like amount and character.
3. If, in any period of six months, the death rate of any such
corporation shall be in excess of the annual rate of mortality as shown by the
American life tables, it shall be lawful for such corporation to draw out any
portion of said securities necessary to meet such excess, by requisition signed
by two-thirds of its directors, which, upon proper proof of said facts to the

HCS HB 3092 189
state director of the department of commerce and insurance, shall also be
endorsed by him setting forth that the same is to be used for the purposes of
said trust.
4. In case the amount so drawn out shall reduce such fund below the
amount so required to be provided for, it shall be the duty of said corporation
to make up the said deficiency within six months thereafter; said securities to
be deposited in some safe deposit in the city of St. Louis, to the joint credit of
the director of the department of commerce and insurance and the corporation
making the deposit.]
[377.060. Every policy or certificate hereafter issued by any
corporation of this state doing business in conformity with the provisions of
sections 377.010 to 377.190, and promising a payment to be made upon a
contingency of death, sickness, disability or accident, shall specify the exact
sum of money which it promises to pay upon each contingency insured
against, and the number of days after satisfactory proof of the happening of
such contingency at which such payment shall be made, and upon the
occurrence of such contingency, unless the contract shall have been voided for
fraud or breach of its conditions, the corporation shall be obligated to the
beneficiary for such payment at the time and to the amount specified in the
policy or certificate; and the said indebtedness shall be a lien upon all the
property, effects and bills receivable of the corporation, with priority over all
indebtedness thereafter incurred, except as may be provided by the law in case
of the distribution of assets of an insolvent corporation.]
[377.070. If the corporation refuses or fails to make such payment for
thirty days after final judgment against said corporation, the failure to pay the
amount of such final judgment within said period of thirty days shall ipso facto
constitute a forfeiture of the charter of such corporation, and it shall be the
duty of the director of the department of commerce and insurance forthwith to
cause proceedings by quo warranto to be instituted against said corporation for
the purpose of ousting it of its charter; and upon the dissolution of said
corporation, the director of the department of commerce and insurance shall
take charge of its assets and affairs, and wind up the same, as now provided by
law in the case of life insurance companies.]
[377.080. 1. No corporation doing business pursuant to sections
377.010 to 377.190 shall issue a certificate or policy upon the life of any
person who at nearest birthday is more than sixty years of age, nor upon any
life in which the beneficiary named has no insurable interest, nor as an
endowment to any insured person while living, and every call for payments by
the policy or certificate holders shall distinctly state the purposes of the same.
2. Any assignment of a policy or certificate to a person having no
insurable interest in the insured life shall render such assignments void and of
no effect.
3. A charitable, benevolent, educational or religious institution
qualified pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code,

HCS HB 3092 190
as amended, shall be deemed to have an insurable interest in the life of an
insured individual if, in the absence of any fraud or coercion:
(1) The individual has designated the institution as a beneficiary;
(2) The individual has made a gift or an assignment of an interest in
life insurance on the life of such insured individual; or
(3) The life insurance is owned by such charitable, benevolent,
educational or religious institution and such institution has obtained the
consent of the person whose life is being insured, as required by section
376.531.]
[377.090. The money or other benefit, charity, relief or aid to be paid,
provided or rendered by any corporation authorized to do business under
sections 377.010 to 377.190, shall not be liable to attachment or other process,
and shall not be seized, taken, appropriated or applied by any legal or equitable
process, nor by operation of law, to pay any debt or liability of a policy or
certificate holder, or any beneficiary named in a policy or certificate.]
[377.100. Every corporation doing business under sections 377.010 to
377.190 shall annually, on or before the first day of February, return to the
director of the department of commerce and insurance, in such manner and
form as he shall prescribe, a statement of its affairs for the year ending on the
preceding thirty-first day of December, and the director, in person or by
deputy, shall have the power of visitation of and examination into the affairs of
any such corporation, which is conferred upon him in the case of life insurance
companies by the laws of this state; and all companies are hereby declared to
be subject to and required to conform to the provisions of chapters 374 and
375, and sections 376.291 to 376.330, 376.580, 376.610 and 376.620, and
governed and controlled by all the provisions in said sections contained;
provided, always, that nothing herein contained shall subject any corporation
doing business under sections 377.010 to 377.190 to any other provisions or
requirements of the general insurance laws of this state, except as distinctly
herein set forth and provided.]
[377.120. No corporation of this state, organized or doing business
under the provisions of sections 377.010 to 377.190, shall transfer its risks to
or reinsure them in any other corporation, unless the contract of transfer or
reinsurance is first submitted to and approved by a two-thirds vote of a
meeting of the insured, called to consider the same, of which meeting a written
or printed notice shall be mailed to each policy or certificate holder, at least ten
days before the day fixed for said meeting; and in case said transfer or
reinsurance shall be approved, every policy or certificate holder of said
corporation who shall file with the secretary thereof, within five days after said
meeting, written notice of his preference to be transferred to some other
corporation than that named in the contract, shall be accorded all the rights and
privileges in aid of such transfer as would have been accorded under the terms
of said contract had he been transferred to the corporation named therein; but
no such transfer shall be valid until the terms and conditions shall have been

HCS HB 3092 191
fully submitted to the director of the department of commerce and insurance,
and have been approved by him.]
[377.150. When any other state or country shall impose any
obligations upon such corporation, the like obligations shall be imposed and
enforced by the department of commerce and insurance of this state upon
similar corporations and their agents of such state or country doing business in
this state.]
[377.160. Before any foreign insurance company doing business under
the assessment plan shall be authorized to do business in this state, it shall
deposit, and always keep on deposit, with the director of the department of
commerce and insurance of this state, the sum of two thousand dollars, or
secure the same to the satisfaction of the director, to indemnify the state
against costs and expense for the prosecution of the company for violations of
the law, and to pay the costs and expenses of the examination of the company,
which the director may make or cause to be made.]
[377.170. 1. Any domestic life or accident insurance corporation,
company or association existing or doing business in this state under sections
377.010 to 377.190, providing for insurance on the assessment plan, may, by a
majority vote of its directors or trustees, accept the provisions of sections
376.010 to 376.670 and amend its articles of incorporation and its bylaws to
conform to said sections, the same as if it had originally been incorporated
thereunder, and shall submit a record of the proceedings of its board of trustees
together with the amended articles to the attorney general for his examination
and approval of the legal form thereof, and shall file such amended articles in
the office of the secretary of state, and a certified copy of the same in the office
of the director of the department of commerce and insurance of the state of
Missouri, and deposit with said director such securities as may be required of
corporations originally incorporated under sections 376.010 to 376.670.
2. Insurance corporations, companies and associations complying with
the provisions of this section shall thereafter enjoy and exercise all of the
rights and privileges accorded by law to companies originally incorporated
under sections 376.010 to 376.670.
3. Compliance with this section shall in no wise annul, modify or
change any of the existing contracts or obligations of the corporation, and any
and all such contracts and liabilities shall continue in force and effect the same
as if such corporation had not reincorporated under the provisions of this
section, but all contracts and policies made subsequent to the compliance with
the provisions of this section shall be interpreted and construed under the
provisions of sections 376.010 to 376.670.
4. Compliance with the provisions of this section shall in no wise
prejudice, impede or impair any pending action, proceeding or rights
previously acquired.]
[377.180. Nothing in sections 377.010 to 377.190 shall be so
construed as to impair or in any manner to interfere with any of the rights or

HCS HB 3092 192
privileges of any corporation, association or organization doing a life or
casualty insurance business in this state under the laws as they now exist; nor
as applicable to organizations which conduct their business as fraternal
societies on the lodge system, and limit their certificate holders to a particular
order or fraternity, or to fraternal beneficiary societies which provide for the
relief and benefit of its members or the families, widows, orphans or other
kindred dependents of deceased members, or assist such as may be sick or
disabled, from the proceeds of assessments upon members of such society or
association, and, to that end, issue to its members beneficial certificates,
payable at such time and in such manner as shall be therein provided.]
[377.190. Any solicitor, agent or examining physician, who shall
knowingly or willfully make any false or fraudulent statement or
misrepresentation in or with reference to any application for insurance, or
for the purpose of obtaining any money or benefit in any corporation doing
business under sections 377.010 to 377.190, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor,
and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred
dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or imprisonment in the county jail
for not less than thirty days nor more than one year, or by both such fine and
imprisonment, at the discretion of the court; and any person who shall willfully
make a false statement of any material fact or thing in a sworn statement as to
death or disability of a certificate holder in any such corporation, for the
purpose of procuring payment of a benefit named in the certificate of such
holder, shall be guilty of perjury, and shall be proceeded against and punished
as provided by the statutes of this state in relation to the crime of perjury.]
[377.199. From and after the effective date of this section no stipulated
premium plan life insurance company shall be organized or incorporated under
the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460, but nothing in this section shall
be construed as restricting or abridging in any manner the right of any
stipulated premium plan life insurance company now incorporated and
licensed to do business in this state from continuing to do business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460.]
[377.200. Any corporation, company or association issuing policies or
certificates promising money or other benefits to a member or policyholder, or
upon his decease to his legal representatives, or to beneficiaries designated by
him, which money or benefit is derived from stipulated premiums collected in
advance from its members or policyholders, and from interest and other
accumulations and wherein the money or other benefits so realized is applied
to or accumulated solely for the use and purposes of the corporation as herein
specified, and for the necessary expenses of the corporation, and the
prosecution and enlargement of its business, and which shall comply with
all the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460, shall be deemed to be
engaged in the business of life insurance upon the stipulated premium plan and
shall be subject only to the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460, except
that the provisions of chapters 374 and 375, and sections 376.291 to 376.330,
376.675, 376.770 to 376.795, 376.500 to 376.510, and 376.590 to 376.600

HCS HB 3092 193
shall be applicable. It shall be unlawful for any corporation, company or
association not having complied with the provisions of sections 377.200 to
377.460 to use the term "stipulated premium" in its application or contracts, or
to print or write the same in its policies or literature.]
[377.210. Any number of persons, not less than seven, a majority of
whom being citizens and residents of the state of Missouri, may associate
themselves and form a company, for the purpose of making insurance on the
lives of individuals, and every insurance pertaining thereto or connected
therewith on the stipulated premium plan, as defined and regulated herein, and
may provide for indemnity against death or disability of the insured
occasioned by sickness, accident, old age or otherwise.]
[377.220. 1. The persons mentioned in section 377.210 shall be
designated as corporators, and such persons shall associate themselves by
articles of agreement, in writing, duly signed and acknowledged, setting forth:
(1) The corporate name of the proposed corporation, which shall not
be the name of any corporation heretofore incorporated or doing business in
this state for similar purposes, or any such imitation of such name calculated to
mislead the public;
(2) The name of the city, town or county in which the principal office
is located;
(3) The amount of the capital stock of the corporation, provided the
same be a stock company, which shall not be less than fifty thousand dollars
and a surplus of not less than fifty thousand dollars, the number of shares into
which the capital stock is divided, and the par value thereof, that the same has
been bona fide subscribed, and actually paid up in lawful money of the United
States, and is in the custody of the persons named as the first board of
directors; the name and place of the several shareholders and the number of
shares subscribed by each;
(4) The number of the board of directors or managers, which shall be
not less than seven, their powers and duties and the names agreed upon for the
first year;
(5) The number of years the corporation is to continue;
(6) A statement that the company is formed for the purpose of carrying
on the business of insurance under the provisions of sections 377.200 to
377.460;
(7) Any other provision of this section notwithstanding, a stipulated
premium life insurance company licensed to do business in this state on
October 13, 1963, may renew its license for business specified therein until
December 31, 1965, by maintaining in lieu of the capital and surplus
requirements an actual capital of at least twenty-five thousand dollars.
2. Said articles of agreement shall be submitted to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance and attorney general, and if they are
found by these officers to comply with the provisions of sections 377.200 to
377.460, they shall approve the same.
3. When approved, they shall be filed and recorded in the office of the
secretary of state, who shall issue a certificate of incorporation, upon the

HCS HB 3092 194
receipt of which such persons shall be a body corporate and politic, under the
statutes of this state.]
[377.230. 1. No such corporation, company or association shall
commence the business of life insurance until at least two hundred persons,
eligible under the proposed plan of organization, shall have subscribed, in
writing, to be insured therein in the aggregate amount of at least two hundred
and fifty thousand dollars, and shall have each paid, in cash, the amount of one
annual stipulated net premium for their age at entry on the amount of insurance
severally subscribed for, and which shall be held in trust for the benefit of the
members of said corporation or their beneficiaries; nor until the director of the
department of commerce and insurance and attorney general shall have further
certified that it has complied with the provisions of sections 377.200 to
377.460, and is authorized to transact the business of insurance; provided,
however, that every corporation incorporating or reincorporating under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall deposit with the director of the
department of commerce and insurance such securities as are required by law
to be deposited by insurance companies, the sum of five thousand dollars,
before it shall commence business.
2. Said five thousand dollars shall be a part of the insurance fund and
an asset of the corporation.
3. The securities deposited with the department of commerce and
insurance pursuant to this section shall be held by the director in trust for the
benefit and protection of and as security for the policyholders of such
corporation, their legal representatives and beneficiaries.]
[377.240. 1. When any such corporation, company or association
shall desire to relinquish its business in this state, the director shall, on
application of such corporation under oath of its president or principal officer
and secretary or actuary, give notice of such intention at least twice in a
newspaper of general circulation published at the state capitol.
2. After such publication he shall deliver up to said corporation the
securities, or any portion thereof, held by him belonging to such corporation
upon being satisfied that all the debts and liabilities of every kind are paid or
provided for.]
[377.250. 1. Every corporation, company or association doing
business under the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall charge a
mortuary premium at least equal to that of yearly term insurance at age of
entry according to the actuaries' or combined experience mortality table, with
interest at four percent, and such mortuary premium shall be increased by a
loading of not less than twenty percent for age twenty and all ages under
twenty, and one percent additional for each additional year of age, renewable
term policies excepted from such loading.
2. Said premium may be paid annually, semiannually, quarterly,
bimonthly or monthly in advance.]

HCS HB 3092 195
[377.260. 1. After the first policy year the mortuary premium,
according to the terms of premium payments of each policy, with the loading
of the same as provided in section 377.250, together with all interest and other
accumulations of said fund, except the special loading for limited payment
policies, with interest thereon as provided in section 377.270, shall constitute
the insurance fund of the corporation, company, or association from which all
policy obligations shall be paid, and the amount remaining in said fund not
required to provide for death, disability and other policy claims, shall be set
aside as an emergency fund, and may be deposited with the department of
commerce and insurance.
2. If by any reason of excessive mortality, or other cause, the
emergency fund as thus constituted shall become exhausted, then the director
of the department of commerce and insurance shall require the officers of such
corporation, company or association to notify all policyholders on or before
the first of the next succeeding month to pay, within thirty days from the
mailing of such notice, an extra premium, sufficient to meet the amount of the
maximum policy issued apportioned equitably.
3. If any member fails to pay such extra premium within the time
named his policy shall be commuted proportionately, and the policy as thus
commuted shall be the maximum amount for which the corporation shall be
liable under said policy. Said thirty days' notice shall clearly state the
proportionate amount due from the insured, and shall contain the further
statement that in the event of failure to pay the same within thirty days said
policy will be commuted as aforesaid.]
[377.270. 1. Any corporation, company or association transacting
business under the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 may issue
limited payment or any form of investment policies; provided, that the
premiums shall not be less than the net term rate for the kind of policy issued,
increased by such sum as will, improved at four percent, equal the net single
premium for the attained age, at the end of the paying term of the policy,
according to the actuaries' or combined experience table of mortality on which
its calculations are based.
2. Said increase of premium shall be reserved in a separate fund for the
purpose of sustaining such policies after the cessation of premium payments,
and shall be deposited with the department of commerce and insurance in such
securities as are now required by law.
3. If any such corporation doing business under the provisions of
sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall fail to state in its limited payment policies
the portion of each of the premiums to be held by it for the purpose of
sustaining the policy after the years during which the premiums are to be paid,
then all such limited payment policies or investment policies that may be
issued shall be valued according to the actuaries' or combined experience table
and interest at four percent.]
[377.280. Any corporation, company or association transacting
business under the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460, may allow
cash values on its policies or the equivalent of the cash value in extended or

HCS HB 3092 196
paid-up insurance to the extent of the unused portion of the emergency fund
equitably apportioned at the dates of surrender, and may allow fixed cash
values on its limited payment or investment policies, or the equivalent of the
cash value in extended or paid-up insurance; provided, the amount to be set
apart for such fixed cash value or its equivalent is plainly stated in the policy;
and provided further, that such fixed cash value shall not be in excess of the
portion of the premium with interest accretions thereon collected for that
purpose.]
[377.290. Any corporation, company or association may provide for a
return of any surplus accumulations on its limited payment or investment
policies, which may be returned as a dividend, or in extended, paid-up or
increased insurance.]
[377.300. 1. Every policy hereafter issued by any corporation,
company or association doing business under the provisions of sections
377.200 to 377.460 and promising any payments to be made upon a
contingency provided for in sections 377.200 to 377.460, shall specify the sum
of money which it promises to pay upon each contingency insured against and
the time or times of payment after satisfactory proof of the happening of such
contingency, unless the contract shall have been voided by fraud or breach of
its conditions and warranties, or commuted, as provided for in section
377.260, the company shall be obligated to the beneficiaries of the insured for
such payment at the time or times specified and to the amount due under the
policy.
2. If any company fail or refuse to make such payment for ninety days
after final judgment has been obtained under such claim, the director or other
officer charged with the supervision of insurance matters shall notify the
company to issue no new policies until such indebtedness is fully paid, and no
officer or agent of the company shall make, sign or issue any policy of
insurance while such notice is in force.]
[377.310. 1. No corporation, company or association transacting
business pursuant to sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall issue a certificate or
policy to any person until the applicant has been examined by a physician duly
licensed and appointed by the company as its medical examiner, nor unless the
beneficiary named in the certificate or policy is the husband, wife, legal
representative, relative, heir, creditor or legatee of the insured, or who may
have an insurable interest in the insured.
2. The beneficiary named in the certificate or policy may be changed
as may be provided for in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, except that
no change shall be made from a wife to a creditor without her written consent.
3. A charitable, benevolent, educational or religious institution
qualified pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code,
as amended, shall be deemed to have an insurable interest in the life of an
insured individual if, in the absence of any fraud or coercion:
(1) The individual has designated the institution as a beneficiary;

HCS HB 3092 197
(2) The individual has made a gift or an assignment of an interest in
life insurance on the life of such insured individual; or
(3) The life insurance is owned by such charitable, benevolent,
educational or religious institution and such institution has obtained the
consent of the person whose life is being insured, as required by section
376.531.]
[377.320. In the event of death after any policy of insurance has been
issued by any corporation, company or association, doing business under the
provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460, and after the policy has been in
force for the period of one full year, then such policy of insurance shall be
incontestable for any cause.]
[377.330. The money or other benefit, charity, relief or aid to be paid,
provided or rendered by any corporation authorized to do business under
sections 377.200 to 377.460, shall not be liable to attachment or other process,
and shall not be seized, taken, appropriated or applied by any legal or equitable
process, nor by operation of law, to pay any debt or liability of a policy or
certificate holder, or of any beneficiary named in a policy or certificate.]
[377.340. No representation made in obtaining or securing a policy of
insurance on the life or lives of any person or persons shall be deemed
material, or render the policy void, unless the matter misrepresented shall have
actually contributed to the contingency or event on which the policy is to
become due and payable, and if so contributed in any case, shall be a question
for the jury.]
[377.350. Every corporation, company or association transacting
business under the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall, upon the
issuance of every policy, attach to such policy or endorse thereon the substance
of the application upon which such policy was issued, and which is made a
part of the contract of insurance, or referred to therein, or which may in any
manner affect the validity of such policy.]
[377.360. 1. No corporation, company or association transacting
business under the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall make any
discrimination in favor of holders of the same kind of policies, or persons of
the same expectation of life, neither in the amount of premiums charged nor in
any return of premiums, dividends or other advantages.
2. No agent of such corporation shall make any contract for insurance
or agreement as to such contract, other than that which is plainly expressed in
the policy issued.
3. If it shall appear to the satisfaction of the director or other official
charged with the supervision of insurance matters, that any corporation,
company or association is issuing policies or contracts that are in violation of
this section, he shall report the same to the attorney general, who shall require
such corporation and its officers and agents within thirty days to refrain from
issuing any such policy or contract.

HCS HB 3092 198
4. If any corporation or officer or agent thereof shall fail to comply
with the provisions of this section and with the demand of the attorney general,
that officer shall at once institute such proceedings at law as may be necessary
to restrain such violation of this section.]
[377.370. No person shall incur any personal liabilities for the losses
or liabilities of any corporation, company or association transacting business
under the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 by reason of being a
member or policyholder in such corporation.]
[377.380. The annual business of each and every corporation,
company or association transacting business under the provisions of sections
377.200 to 377.460 shall close on the thirty-first day of December of each
year, and it shall, within sixty days thereafter, prepare and file in the office of
the director or other officer having supervision of insurance matters, a detailed
statement, made upon blanks furnished by the department of commerce and
insurance, and verified under oath by the president and secretary of the
company or association, giving all information in detail that the department of
commerce and insurance may require, so that its true financial condition may
be known.]
[377.400. No stipulated premium life insurance company or
association organized under sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall consolidate
with another company or transfer or reinsure its risks with any other company
or association or assume or reinstate the whole or any part of the risks of any
other company or association, except with the approval of a majority of the
policy or stockholders present and voting at a regular or special meeting duly
called; provided, however, that any such company may reinsure a fractional
part of any single risk, but no such insurance shall in any manner release the
company or association from its obligation under contract with the
policyholder. All such reinsurance shall be reported annually to the director
of the department of commerce and insurance.]
[377.420. When any state, territory or foreign country shall impose
any obligations upon any such corporation of this state, or their agents
transacting business in such other state, territory or foreign country, the like
obligations are hereby imposed upon similar corporations of such other state,
territory or foreign country, their agents or representatives transacting business
in this state; and such corporation, company, association or society of such
other state, territory or foreign country, and its agents and representatives shall
pay all licenses, fees or penalties to, and make deposits with the director of
insurance imposed by the laws of such other state, territory or foreign country
upon any corporation of this state doing business therein; and in case of failure
to pay the same, the director shall refuse the certificate of authority herein
provided for or cancel such certificate, if one shall have been previously
issued.]

HCS HB 3092 199
[377.430. 1. No foreign corporation, company, association or society
shall be authorized to transact any business authorized by sections 377.200 to
377.460 within this state, unless it furnish evidence satisfactory to the director
of the department of commerce and insurance that it has a reserve or
emergency fund equal in amount to that required by sections 377.200 to
377.460, and the same is held for the benefit of policyholders only, and
invested as required by the insurance laws of its home state.
2. Neither shall any foreign corporation, company, association or
society be authorized to do business in this state under sections 377.200 to
377.460, unless it collects in advance for the benefit of its policyholders a net
premium equal to at least that provided for by the terms of sections 377.200 to
377.460; provided, that all such foreign corporations shall annually pay a tax
on the gross premiums received in this state on account of business done in the
state at the rate of one percent per annum, which shall be in lieu of all other
taxes as herein otherwise provided; said tax shall be levied and collected as is
provided for in the collection of taxes on other insurance companies.]
[377.450. 1. Any domestic life or accident insurance corporation,
company or association existing or doing business in this state under the
stipulated premium plan law, may, by a majority vote of its directors or
trustees, accept the provisions of sections 376.010 to 376.670 and amend its
articles of incorporation and its bylaws to conform to said law, the same as if it
had originally been incorporated thereunder, and shall submit a record of the
proceedings of its board of trustees, together with the amended articles, to the
attorney general for his examination and approval of the legal form thereof,
and shall file such amended articles in the office of the secretary of state and a
certified copy of same in the office of the director of the department of
commerce and insurance, and deposit with said director such securities as may
be required of corporations originally incorporated under sections 376.010 to
376.670.
2. Insurance corporations, companies and associations complying with
the provisions of this section shall thereafter enjoy and exercise all of the
rights and privileges accorded by law to companies originally incorporated
under sections 376.010 to 376.670.
3. Compliance with this section shall in no wise annul, modify or
change any of the existing contracts or obligations of the corporation, and any
and all such contracts and liabilities shall continue in force and effect the same
as if such corporation had not reincorporated under the provisions of this
section; compliance with the provisions of this section shall in no way
prejudice, impede or impair any pending action, proceeding or rights
previously acquired.]
[377.460. Any solicitor, agent, examining physician or other person
who shall make a false or fraudulent statement or misrepresentation in or with
reference to any application for insurance, or for the purpose of obtaining any
money or benefit in any corporation doing business under sections 377.200 to
377.460, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be
punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five

HCS HB 3092 200
hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than thirty
days nor more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment, at the
discretion of the court; and any person who shall make a false statement of any
material fact or thing in a sworn statement as to the death or disability of a
certificate holder in any such corporation, for the purpose of procuring
payment of a benefit named in the certificate of such holder, shall be guilty of
perjury and shall be proceeded against and punished as provided by the
statutes of this state in relation to the crime of perjury; and any person who
shall make any false or fraudulent statement or misrepresentation with
reference to any corporation, company or association transacting business
under the provisions of sections 377.200 to 377.460 shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than
one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or imprisonment in
the county jail for not less than thirty days nor more than one year, or both
such fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court.]
[379.205. A number of persons, not less than twenty-five, a majority
of whom shall be bona fide residents of this state, by complying with the
provisions of sections 379.205 to 379.310, may become together with others
who may hereafter be associated with them or their successors, a body
corporate for the purpose of carrying on the business of mutual insurance as
herein provided.]
[379.210. Any persons proposing to form any such company shall
subscribe and acknowledge articles of incorporation specifying:
(1) The name, the purpose for which formed, and the location of its
principal or home office, which shall be within this state;
(2) The names and addresses of those composing the board of
directors in which the management shall be vested until the first meeting of the
members;
(3) The names and places of residence of the incorporators.]
[379.215. No name shall be adopted by such company which does not
contain the word "mutual" or which is so similar to any name already in use by
any such existing corporation, company or association, organized or doing
business in the United States, as to be confusing or misleading.]
[379.220. 1. Such articles shall be submitted to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, herein called "director".
2. Such publication shall be made as required by section 379.030, and
upon proof of publication being made and approval of said articles by the
attorney general as required by section 379.040, such articles shall be recorded
by the director, who shall furnish a certified copy thereof to the incorporators
and shall file a certified copy thereof with the secretary of state.
3. The secretary of state shall thereupon issue to the company a
certificate of incorporation, which shall be its authority to begin business.
4. Such articles may be amended in the manner provided for other
corporations or as may be provided in such articles.]

HCS HB 3092 201
[379.225. 1. The company shall have legal existence from and after
date of such certificate.
2. The board of directors named in such articles may thereupon adopt
bylaws, accept applications for insurance, and proceed to transact the business
of such company; provided, that no insurance shall be put into force until the
company has been licensed to transact insurance as provided by sections
379.205 to 379.310.
3. Such bylaws and any amendments thereto shall within thirty days
after adoption be filed with said director.]
[379.230. Any company organized under the provisions of sections
379.205 to 379.310 is empowered and authorized to make contracts of
insurance or to reinsure or accept reinsurance on any portion thereof, to the
extent specified in its articles for the kinds of insurance following:
(1) Liability insurance. Against loss, expense or liability by reason of
bodily injury or death by accident, disability, sickness or disease suffered by
others for which the insured may be liable or have assumed liability, including
workers' compensation.
(2) Disability insurance. Against bodily injury or death by accident
and disability by sickness.
(3) Automobile insurance. Against any or all loss, expense and
liability resulting from the ownership, maintenance or use of any automobile
or other vehicle; provided, no policies shall be issued under this subsection
against the hazard of fire alone.
(4) Steam boiler insurance. Against loss or liability to persons or
property resulting from explosions or accidents to boilers, containers, pipes,
engines, flywheels, elevators and machinery in connection therewith and
against loss of use and occupancy caused thereby and to make inspection and
issue certificates of inspection thereon.
(5) Use and occupancy insurance. Against loss from interruption of
trade or business or loss of rents which may be the result of any accident or
casualty.
(6) Miscellaneous insurance. Against loss or damage by any hazard
upon any risk not provided for in this section, which is not prohibited by
statute or at common law from being the subject of insurance, excepting life
insurance and fire insurance.]
[379.235. 1. No such company shall issue policies or transact any
business of insurance unless it holds a license from the director authorizing the
transaction of such business. A license shall not be issued unless the company
complies with the following conditions:
(1) It shall hold bona fide applications for insurance upon which it
shall issue simultaneously, or it shall have in force, at least twenty policies to
at least twenty members for the same kind of insurance upon not less than two
hundred separate risks, each within the maximum single risk described herein.
(2) The maximum single risk shall not exceed five percent of the
admitted assets or three times the average risk or one percent of the insurance

HCS HB 3092 202
in force, whichever is the greater, any reinsurance taking effect simultaneously
with the policy being deducted in determining such maximum single risk.
(3) It has collected an annual premium upon each application, which
premium shall be equal to not less than five times the maximum single risk
assumed nor less than one hundred thousand dollars; provided, however, that
the total assets of the company shall not be less than one hundred thousand
dollars of paid-in premiums and a guaranty fund or contributed surplus of not
less than six hundred thousand dollars which shall be held in cash or securities
in which these insurance companies are authorized to invest; and provided
further, that any mutual company other than life and fire licensed to do
business on September 28, 1977, which confines its writings to burglary and
theft, and liability, property damage and collision other than automobile and
workers' compensation, shall maintain a guaranty fund or contributed surplus
of not less than three hundred thousand dollars.
(4) For the purpose of transacting employer's liability and workers'
compensation insurance the applications shall cover not less than one thousand
five hundred employees, each employee being considered a separate risk for
determining the maximum single risk.
2. Any other provision of law notwithstanding any mutual company
other than life and fire licensed to do business in this state on September 28,
1977, may renew its license for business specified therein until December 31,
1979, if it maintains assets of not less than three hundred thousand dollars
consisting of paid-in premiums and a guaranty fund or contributed surplus
which shall be held in cash or securities in which these insurance companies
are authorized to invest.
3. Violation of any of the provisions of this section by an insurer is
grounds for the revocation of its certificate of authority by the director.]
[379.240. 1. Any public or private corporation, board or association in
this state or elsewhere may make applications, enter into agreements for and
hold policies in any such mutual insurance company.
2. Any officer, stockholder, trustee or legal representative of any such
corporation, board, association or estate may be recognized as acting for or on
its behalf for the purpose of such membership, but shall not be personally
liable upon such contract of insurance by reason of acting in such
representative capacity.
3. The right of any corporation organized under the laws of this state to
participate as a member of any such mutual insurance company is hereby
declared to be incidental to the purpose for which such corporation is
organized and as much granted as the rights and powers expressly conferred.]
[379.245. Every member of the company shall be entitled to one vote,
or to a number of votes based upon the insurance in force, the number of
policies held, or the amount of premiums paid, as may be provided in the
bylaws.]
[379.250. 1. The maximum premium payable by any member shall be
expressed in the policy or in the application for the insurance.

HCS HB 3092 203
2. Such maximum premium may be a cash premium and an additional
contingent premium not less than the cash premium, or may be solely a cash
premium.
3. No policy shall be issued for a cash premium without an additional
contingent premium unless the company has a surplus of at least one hundred
thousand dollars or a surplus which is not less in amount than the capital stock
required of domestic stock insurance companies transacting the same kinds of
insurance.]
[379.255. No such company shall invest any of its assets except in
accordance with the laws of this state relating to the investment of the assets of
domestic stock companies transacting the same kinds of insurance.]
[379.257. Any company organized or doing business under sections
379.205 to 379.310 shall comply with the provisions of section 379.098.]
[379.260. Such company shall maintain unearned premium and other
reserves separately for each kind of insurance, upon the same basis as that
required of domestic stock insurance companies transacting the same kind of
insurance; provided, that any reserve for losses or claims based upon the
premium income shall be computed upon the net premium income after
deducting any so-called dividend or premium returned or credited to the
member.]
[379.263. Any company organized under the provisions of sections
379.205 to 379.310 shall on the first day of January of each year or within
sixty days thereafter, file with the director of the department of commerce and
insurance a statement of its affairs in the same manner and form as provided in
section 379.105.]
[379.265. Such company not possessed of assets at least equal to the
unearned premium reserve and other liabilities shall make an assessment upon
its members liable to assessment to provide for such deficiency, such
assessment to be against each such member in proportion to such liability as
expressed in his policy; provided, the director may, by written order, relieve
the company from an assessment or other proceedings to restore such assets
during the time fixed in such order; and provided, that any domestic company
which shall be deficient in providing the unearned premium reserve required
hereby may, notwithstanding such deficiency, come under this law on the
condition that it shall each year thereafter reduce such deficiency at least
fifteen percent of the original amount thereof, and in such case it may increase
its assessments accordingly.]
[379.270. 1. Any director, officer or member of any such company, or
any other person, may advance to such company any sum or sums of money
necessary for the purpose of its business or to enable it to comply with any of
the requirements of the law, and such moneys and such interest thereon as may
have been agreed upon, not exceeding ten percent per annum, shall be payable

HCS HB 3092 204
only out of the surplus remaining after providing for all reserves and other
liabilities, and shall not otherwise be a liability or claim against the company
or any of its assets.
2. No commission or promotion expenses shall be paid in connection
with the advance of any such money to the company, and the amount of such
advance shall be reported in each annual statement.]
[379.275. 1. Any law requiring that policies be countersigned and
delivered through a resident agent shall not apply to any policy of such mutual
company on which no commission shall be paid to any local agent.
2. Such mutual company may insert in any form of policy prescribed
by the law of this state any provisions or conditions required by its plan of
insurance which are not inconsistent or in conflict with any law of this state.]
[379.290. Every mutual insurance company or association admitted to
Missouri under the provisions of sections 379.205 to 379.310 shall annually
pay to the director of revenue a tax upon the direct premiums received,
whether in cash or in notes, in this state, for the insurance of property or risks
in this state at the rate of two percent per annum; provided, that such
companies or associations shall be credited with cancelled or return premiums
actually paid during the year in this state.]
[379.295. 1. Every such company or association shall, on or before
the first day of March in each year, make a return, verified by the affidavit of
its president and secretary or other chief officers, to the director of the
department of commerce and insurance, in the form prescribed by him, stating
the amount of all gross direct premiums received, whether in cash, notes,
credits or any other substitute for money, on contracts covering property, or
risks located or resident in this state, during the year ending on the thirty-first
day of December next preceding, and all credits to which such company or
association shall be entitled under the provisions of section 379.290.
2. Upon receipt of such returns, the director of the department of
commerce and insurance shall verify the same and assess the tax upon various
companies on the basis and at the rate provided in section 379.290, and make a
schedule thereof, duplicate copies of which, properly certified by said director,
shall be filed in the office of the director of revenue on or before the first day
of April in each year.
3. Immediately thereafter the director of revenue shall notify the
companies of the amount of taxes respectively due from them, and such taxes
shall be paid to the director of revenue on or before the first day of May next
ensuing.
4. If not so paid, the director of revenue shall certify such fact to the
director of the department of commerce and insurance, who shall thereafter
suspend such delinquent company or companies from the further transaction of
business in this state until such taxes shall be paid.
5. Upon receiving said money, the director of revenue shall deposit it
in the state treasury and the state treasurer shall receipt one-half thereof into

HCS HB 3092 205
the general revenue fund of the state, and he shall place the remainder of said
tax to the credit of the county foreign insurance tax fund.]
[379.300. If any company or association shall fail or refuse to make
the return required by sections 379.205 to 379.310, the said director shall
assess the tax against said company or association at the rate herein provided
for on such amount of premiums as he shall deem just and the proceedings
thereon shall be the same as if the return had been made.]
[379.700. There shall be maintained at all times assets in cash or
securities authorized by the laws of the state in which the principal office of
the attorney is located for the investment of similar funds of insurance
companies doing the same kind of business in an amount equal to fifty percent
of the net annual advance premiums or deposits collected and credited to the
accounts of subscribers on policies having one year or less to run and pro rata
on those for longer periods; or, in lieu thereof, one hundred percent of the net
unearned premiums or deposits collected and credited to the accounts of
subscribers, which assets shall not be charged as a liability.]
[393.1072. 1. There is hereby established the "Task Force on Fair,
Nondiscriminatory Local Taxation Concerning Solar Energy Systems", which
shall be composed of the following members:
(1) Three members of the house of representatives, with not more than
two members from the same political party and each member to be appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(2) Three members of the senate, with not more than two members
from the same political party and each member to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate;
(3) Two currently elected county assessors from Missouri county
governments, with one to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives and one to be appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
(4) Two representatives from the Missouri state tax commission to be
appointed by the commissioners of the Missouri state tax commission;
(5) Two representatives from a statewide agricultural organization,
with one to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and
one to be appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(6) Two representatives from the private sector with experience in
utility-scale solar energy development and operation, with one to be appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives and one to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate; and
(7) One member from an organization that advocates for policy
supporting solar energy appointed by the chair of the public service
commission.
2. The task force shall conduct public hearings and research and
compile a report for delivery to the general assembly before December 31,
2022. Such report shall include information on the following:

HCS HB 3092 206
(1) The economic benefits and drawbacks of solar energy systems to
local communities and the state;
(2) The fair, uniform, and standardized assessment and taxation of
solar energy systems and their connected equipment owned by a retail or
wholesale provider of electricity at the county level in all counties;
(3) Compliance with existing federal and state programs and
regulations; and
(4) Potential legislation that will provide a uniform assessment and
taxation methodology for solar energy systems and their connected equipment
owned by a retail or wholesale provider of electricity that will be used in every
county of Missouri.
3. The task force shall meet within thirty days after its creation and
shall organize by selecting a chair and vice chair, one of whom shall be a
member of the senate and the other a member of the house of representatives.
Thereafter, the task force may meet as often as necessary in order to
accomplish the tasks assigned to it. Meetings may be held by telephone or
video conference at the discretion of the chair. The chair shall designate a
person to keep the records of the task force. A majority of the task force shall
constitute a quorum, and a majority vote of such quorum shall be required for
any action.
4. The staff of house research and senate research shall provide
necessary clerical, research, fiscal, and legal services to the task force as the
task force may request.
5. The members of the task force shall serve without compensation,
but any actual and necessary expenses incurred by the task force, its members,
and any staff assigned to the task force shall be reimbursed.
6. This section shall expire on December 31, 2022.]
[454.849. The repeal of sections 454.850 to 454.999 shall become
effective June 15, 2016.]
[476.1000. All courts that require mandatory electronic filing shall
accept, file, and docket a notice of entry of appearance filed by an attorney in a
criminal case if such filing does not exceed one page in length and was sent by
fax or regular mail. The provisions of this section shall expire on December
31, 2016.]
[559.117. 1. The director of the department of corrections is
authorized to establish, as a three-year pilot program, a mental health
assessment process.
2. Only upon a motion filed by the prosecutor in a criminal case, the
judge who is hearing the criminal case in a participating county may request
that an offender be placed in the department of corrections for one hundred
twenty days for a mental health assessment and for treatment if it appears that
the offender has a mental disorder or mental illness such that the offender may
qualify for probation including community psychiatric rehabilitation (CPR)
programs and such probation is appropriate and not inconsistent with public
safety. Before the judge rules upon the motion, the victim shall be given

HCS HB 3092 207
notice of such motion and the opportunity to be heard. Upon recommendation
of the court, the department shall determine the offender's eligibility for the
mental health assessment process.
3. Following this assessment and treatment period, an assessment
report shall be sent to the sentencing court and the sentencing court may, if
appropriate, release the offender on probation. The offender shall be
supervised on probation by a state probation and parole officer, who shall work
cooperatively with the department of mental health to enroll eligible offenders
in community psychiatric rehabilitation (CPR) programs.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, probation shall not be
granted under this section to offenders who:
(1) Have been found guilty of, or plead guilty to, murder in the second
degree under section 565.021;
(2) Have been found guilty of, or plead guilty to, rape in the first
degree under section 566.030 or forcible rape under section 566.030 as it
existed prior to August 28, 2013;
(3) Have been found guilty of, or plead guilty to, statutory rape in the
first degree under section 566.032;
(4) Have been found guilty of, or plead guilty to, sodomy in the first
degree under section 566.060 or forcible sodomy under section 566.060 as it
existed prior to August 28, 2013;
(5) Have been found guilty of, or plead guilty to, statutory sodomy in
the first degree under section 566.062;
(6) Have been found guilty of, or plead guilty to, child molestation in
the first degree under section 566.067 when classified as a class A felony;
(7) Have been found to be a predatory sexual offender under section
566.125; or
(8) Have been found guilty of, or plead guilty to, any offense for
which there exists a statutory prohibition against either probation or parole.
5. At the end of the three-year pilot, the director of the department of
corrections and the director of the department of mental health shall jointly
submit recommendations to the governor and to the general assembly by
December 31, 2015, on whether to expand the process statewide.]
[595.202. 1. There is hereby created the "Missouri Rights of Victims
of Sexual Assault Task Force" to consist of the following members:
(1) The following four members of the general assembly:
(a) Two members of the senate, with no more than one member from
the same political party and each member to be appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate; and
(b) Two members of the house of representatives, with no more than
one member from the same political party and each member to be appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(2) The director of the department of health and senior services or his
or her designee;
(3) A private citizen appointed by the governor;
(4) A representative of a statewide coalition against domestic and
sexual violence appointed by the governor;

HCS HB 3092 208
(5) A representative of rape crisis centers appointed by the governor;
(6) The superintendent of the Missouri highway patrol or his or her
designee;
(7) A law enforcement officer appointed by the governor;
(8) The director of the Missouri highway patrol crime lab or his or her
designee;
(9) An attorney appointed by the governor; and
(10) A representative of the Missouri Hospital Association.
2. The task force shall study nationally recognized best practices and
make recommendations regarding:
(1) The development and implementation of an effective mechanism
for submitting, tracking, and investigating complaints regarding the handling
of, or response to, a sexual assault report or investigation by any agency or
organization involved in the response;
(2) The development of documentation for medical providers and law
enforcement officers, in conjunction with the department of public safety, to
provide to survivors informing them of their rights pursuant to section
595.201;
(3) Whether a need exists for additional employees or volunteers of a
rape crisis center for victims of sexual assault, and if such a need does exist,
the task force shall:
(a) Create a plan for how the state can provide, in conjunction with
rape crisis centers, victims' advocates organizations, and the department of
health and senior services, additional employees or volunteers of a rape crisis
center to meet the needs identified; and
(b) Determine the cost of funding such a plan;
(4) Whether a need exists to expand the right to an employee or
volunteer of a rape crisis center beyond the medical examination and law
enforcement interview settings, and if such a need does exist, the task force
shall:
(a) Identify the scope and nature of the need; and
(b) Make recommendations on how best to fill that need, whether
legislatively or otherwise;
(5) Whether a need exists to provide for ongoing evaluation of the
implementation of these rights, and if such a need does exist, the task force
shall:
(a) Identify the scope and nature of the need; and
(b) Make recommendations on how best to fill that need, whether
legislatively or otherwise.
3. The task force shall:
(1) Collect data regarding sexual assault reporting, arrests, prosecution
rates, access to sexual assault victims services, and any other data important
for its deliberations and recommendations; and
(2) Collect feedback from stakeholders, practitioners, and leadership
throughout the state and local law enforcement, victim services, forensic
science practitioners, and health care communities to inform development of
future best practices or clinical guidelines regarding the care and treatment of
survivors.

HCS HB 3092 209
4. The department of public safety shall provide administrative
support to the task force.
5. On or before December 31, 2021, the task force shall submit a
report on its findings to the governor and general assembly. The report shall
include any dissenting opinions in addition to any majority opinions.
6. The task force shall expire on December 31, 2021.]
[620.1910. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Manufacturing Jobs Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Approval", a document submitted by the department to the
qualified manufacturing company or qualified supplier that states the benefits
that may be provided under this section;
(2) "Capital investment", expenditures made by a qualified
manufacturing company to retool or reconfigure a manufacturing facility
directly related to the manufacturing of a new product or the expansion or
modification of the manufacture of an existing product;
(3) "County average wage", the same meaning as such term is defined
in section 620.1878;
(4) "Department", the department of economic development;
(5) "Facility", a building or buildings located in Missouri at which the
qualified manufacturing company manufactures a product;
(6) "Full-time job", a job for which a person is compensated for an
average of at least thirty-five hours per week for a twelve-month period, and
one for which the qualified manufacturing company or qualified supplier
offers health insurance and pays at least fifty percent of such insurance
premiums;
(7) "NAICS industry classification", the most recent edition of the
North American Industry Classification System as prepared by the Executive
Office of the President, Office of Management and Budget;
(8) "New job", the same meaning as such term is defined in section
620.1878;
(9) "New product", a new model or line of a manufactured good that
has not been manufactured in Missouri by the qualified manufacturing
company at any time prior to the date of the notice of intent, or an existing
brand, model, or line of a manufactured good that is redesigned with more than
seventy-five percent new exterior body parts and incorporates new powertrain
options;
(10) "Notice of intent", a form developed by the department,
completed by the qualified manufacturing company or qualified supplier and
submitted to the department which states the qualified manufacturing
company's or qualified supplier's intent to create new jobs or retain current
jobs and make additional capital investment, as applicable, and request
benefits under this section. The notice of intent shall specify the minimum
number of such new or retained jobs and the minimum amount of such capital
investment;
(11) "Qualified manufacturing company", a business with a NAICS
code of 33611 that:

HCS HB 3092 210
(a) Manufactures goods at a facility in Missouri;
(b) In the case of the manufacture of a new product, commits to make
a capital investment of at least seventy-five thousand dollars per retained job
within no more than two years of the date the qualified manufacturing
company begins to retain withholding tax under this section, or in the case of
the modification or expansion of the manufacture of an existing product,
commits to make a capital investment of at least fifty thousand dollars per
retained job within no more than two years of the date the qualified
manufacturing company begins to retain withholding tax under this section;
(c) Manufactures a new product or has commenced making capital
improvements to the facility necessary for the manufacturing of such new
product, or modifies or expands the manufacture of an existing product or has
commenced making capital improvements to the facility necessary for the
modification or expansion of the manufacture of such existing product; and
(d) Continues to meet the requirements of paragraphs (a) to (c) of this
subdivision for the withholding period;
(12) "Qualified supplier", a manufacturing company that:
(a) Attests to the department that it derives more than ten percent of
the total annual sales of the company from sales to a qualified manufacturing
company;
(b) Adds five or more new jobs;
(c) Has an average wage, as defined in section 135.950, for such new
jobs that are equal to or exceed the lower of the county average wage for
Missouri as determined by the department using NAICS industry
classifications, but not lower than sixty percent of the statewide average
wage; and
(d) Provides health insurance for all full-time jobs and pays at least
fifty percent of the premiums of such insurance;
(13) "Retained job", the number of full-time jobs of persons employed
by the qualified manufacturing company located at the facility that existed as
of the last working day of the month immediately preceding the month in
which notice of intent is submitted;
(14) "Statewide average wage", an amount equal to the quotient of the
sum of the total gross wages paid for the corresponding four calendar quarters
divided by the average annual employment for such four calendar quarters,
which shall be computed using the Quarterly Census of Employment and
Wages Data for All Private Ownership Businesses in Missouri, as published by
the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor;
(15) "Withholding period", the seven- or ten-year period in which a
qualified manufacturing company may receive benefits under this section;
(16) "Withholding tax", the same meaning as such term is defined in
section 620.1878.
3. The department shall respond within thirty days to a qualified
manufacturing company or a qualified supplier who provides a notice of intent
with either an approval or a rejection of the notice of intent. Failure to respond
on behalf of the department shall result in the notice of intent being deemed an
approval for the purposes of this section.

HCS HB 3092 211
4. A qualified manufacturing company that manufactures a new
product may, upon the department's approval of a notice of intent and the
execution of an agreement that meets the requirements of subsection 9 of this
section, but no earlier than January 1, 2012, retain one hundred percent of the
withholding tax from full-time jobs at the facility for a period of ten years. A
qualified manufacturing company that modifies or expands the manufacture of
an existing product may, upon the department's approval of a notice of intent
and the execution of an agreement that meets the requirements of subsection 9
of this section, but no earlier than January 1, 2012, retain fifty percent of the
withholding tax from full-time jobs at the facility for a period of seven years.
Except as otherwise allowed under subsection 7 of this section, the
100 commencement of the withholding period may be delayed by no more than
101 twenty-four months after execution of the agreement at the option of the
102 qualified manufacturing company. Such qualified manufacturing company
103 shall be eligible for participation in the Missouri quality jobs program in
104 sections 620.1875 to 620.1890 for any new jobs for which it does not retain
105 withholding tax under this section, provided all qualifications for such
106 program are met.
107 5. A qualified supplier may, upon approval of a notice of intent by the
108 department, retain all withholding tax from new jobs for a period of three years
109 from the date of approval of the notice of intent or for a period of five years if
110 the supplier pays wages for the new jobs equal to or greater than one hundred
111 twenty percent of county average wage. Notwithstanding any other provision
112 of law to the contrary, a qualified supplier that is awarded benefits under this
113 section shall not receive any tax credit or exemption or be entitled to retain
114 withholding under sections 100.700 to 100.850, sections 135.100 to 135.150,
115 sections 135.200 to 135.286, section 135.535, sections 135.900 to 135.906,
116 sections 135.950 to 135.970, or section 620.1881 for the same jobs.
117 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
118 maximum amount of withholding tax that may be retained by any one
119 qualified manufacturing company under this section shall not exceed ten
120 million dollars per calendar year. The aggregate amount of withholding tax
121 that may be retained by all qualified manufacturing companies under this
122 section shall not exceed fifteen million dollars per calendar year.
123 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
124 qualified manufacturing company that is awarded benefits under this section
125 shall not simultaneously receive tax credits or exemptions under sections
126 100.700 to 100.850, sections 135.100 to 135.150, sections 135.200 to 135.286,
127 section 135.535, or sections 135.900 to 135.906 for the jobs created or retained
128 or capital improvement which qualified for benefits under this section. The
129 benefits available to the qualified manufacturing company under any other
130 state programs for which the qualified manufacturing company is eligible and
131 which utilize withholding tax from the jobs at the facility shall first be credited
132 to the other state program before the applicable withholding period for benefits
133 provided under this section shall begin. These other state programs include,
134 but are not limited to, the Missouri works jobs training program under sections
135 620.800 to 620.809, the real property tax increment allocation redevelopment
136 act under sections 99.800 to 99.865, or the Missouri downtown and rural

HCS HB 3092 212
137 economic stimulus act under sections 99.915 to 99.980. If any qualified
138 manufacturing company also participates in the Missouri works jobs training
139 program in sections 620.800 to 620.809, such qualified manufacturing
140 company shall not retain any withholding tax that has already been
141 allocated for use in the new jobs training program. Any qualified
142 manufacturing company or qualified supplier that is awarded benefits under
143 this program and knowingly hires individuals who are not allowed to work
144 legally in the United States shall immediately forfeit such benefits and shall
145 repay the state an amount equal to any withholding taxes already retained.
146 Subsection 5 of section 285.530 shall not apply to qualified manufacturing
147 companies or qualified suppliers which are awarded benefits under this
148 program.
149 8. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
150 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
151 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
152 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
153 of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
154 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
155 assembly under chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
156 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the
157 grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
158 effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
159 9. Within six months of completion of a notice of intent required under
160 this section, the qualified manufacturing company shall enter into an
161 agreement with the department that memorializes the content of the notice
162 of intent, the requirements of this section, and the consequences for failing to
163 meet such requirements, which shall include the following:
164 (1) If the amount of capital investment made by the qualified
165 manufacturing company is not made within the two-year period provided for
166 such investment, the qualified manufacturing company shall immediately
167 cease retaining any withholding tax with respect to jobs at the facility and it
168 shall forfeit all rights to retain withholding tax for the remainder of the
169 withholding period. In addition, the qualified manufacturing company shall
170 repay any amounts of withholding tax retained plus interest of five percent per
171 annum. However, in the event that such capital investment shortfall is due to
172 economic conditions beyond the control of the qualified manufacturing
173 company, the director may, at the qualified manufacturing company's request,
174 suspend rather than terminate its privilege to retain withholding tax under this
175 section for up to three years. Any such suspension shall extend the
176 withholding period by the same amount of time. No more than one such
177 suspension shall be granted to a qualified manufacturing company;
178 (2) If the qualified manufacturing company discontinues the
179 manufacturing of the new product and does not replace it with a subsequent
180 or additional new product manufactured at the facility at any time during the
181 withholding period, the qualified manufacturing company shall immediately
182 cease retaining any withholding tax with respect to jobs at that facility and it
183 shall forfeit all rights to retain withholding tax for the remainder of the
184 withholding period.

HCS HB 3092 213
185 10. Prior to March first each year, the department shall provide a
186 report to the general assembly including the names of participating qualified
187 manufacturing companies or qualified suppliers, location of such companies or
188 suppliers, the annual amount of benefits provided, the estimated net state fiscal
189 impact including direct and indirect new state taxes derived, and the number of
190 new jobs created or jobs retained.
191 11. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
192 (1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section
193 shall automatically sunset October 12, 2016, unless reauthorized by an act of
194 the general assembly; and
195 (2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
196 section shall automatically sunset twelve years after the effective date of the
197 reauthorization of this section; and
198 (3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
199 immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
200 under this section is sunset.]
[620.2100. 1. There is hereby established the "Ozark Exploration
Bicentennial Commission".
2. The commission shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(2) Two senators appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(3) One faculty member of Missouri State University appointed by
university leadership;
(4) The director of the division of tourism or his or her designee;
(5) Two members representing historical societies within the area of
exploration, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and
one appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(6) Two members of the public appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives; and
(7) Two members of the public appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate.
3. Members of the commission shall be appointed by October 1, 2017.
4. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation. The
division of tourism shall provide administrative support for the commission.
5. There is hereby established in the state treasury the "Ozark
Exploration Bicentennial Fund" to be held separate and apart from all other
public moneys and funds of the state. The fund may accept state and federal
appropriations, grants, bequests, gifts, fees, and awards to be held for use by
the Ozark exploration bicentennial commission. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, moneys remaining in the fund
at the end of any biennium shall not revert to general revenue. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The state treasurer
shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are invested.
Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the
fund.

HCS HB 3092 214
6. The duties of the commission shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Organizing and coordinating efforts relating to the bicentennial
celebration of the exploration of the Ozarks in 1819; and
(2) Promoting public awareness of the importance and cultural
significance of the exploration to Missouri history.
7. The commission shall be dissolved and the provisions of this section
shall expire on June 30, 2019.]
[620.2600. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Innovation Campus Tax Credit Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Certificate", a tax credit certificate issued under this section;
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of economic development;
(3) "Eligible donation", donations received from a taxpayer by
innovation campuses that are to be used solely for projects that advance
learning in the areas of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.
Eligible donations may include cash, publicly traded stocks and bonds, and
real estate that shall and will be valued and documented according to the rules
promulgated by the department of economic development;
(4) "Innovation education campus" or "innovation campus", as defined
in section 178.1100, an educational partnership consisting of at least one of
each of the following entities:
(a) A local Missouri high school or K-12 school district;
(b) A Missouri four-year public or private higher education institution;
(c) A Missouri-based business or businesses; and
(d) A Missouri two-year public higher education institution or state
technical college of Missouri;
(5) "Taxpayer", any of the following individuals or entities who make
an eligible donation to any innovation campus:
(a) A person, firm, partner in a firm, corporation, or a shareholder in
an S corporation doing business in the state of Missouri and subject to the state
income tax imposed in chapter 143;
(b) A corporation subject to the annual corporation franchise tax
imposed in chapter 147;
(c) An insurance company paying an annual tax on its gross premium
receipts in this state;
(d) Any other financial institution paying taxes to the state of Missouri
or any political subdivisions of this state under chapter 148;
(e) An individual subject to the state income tax imposed in chapter
143;
(f) Any charitable organization which is exempt from federal income
tax and whose Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be
subject to the state income tax imposed under chapter 143.
3. For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, any
taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the taxes otherwise due under
chapters 147, 148, or 143, excluding withholding tax imposed by sections
143.191 to 143.265, in an amount equal to fifty percent of the amount of an
eligible donation, subject to the restrictions in this section. The amount of the

HCS HB 3092 215
tax credit claimed shall not exceed the amount of the taxpayer's state income
tax liability in the tax year for which the credit is claimed. Any amount of
credit that the taxpayer is prohibited by this section from claiming in a tax year
shall not be refundable, but may be carried forward to any of the taxpayer's
four subsequent taxable years.
4. To claim the credit authorized in this section, an innovation campus
may submit to the department an application for the tax credit authorized by
this section on behalf of taxpayers. The department shall verify that the
innovation campus has submitted the following items:
(1) A valid application in the form and format required by the
department;
(2) A statement attesting to the eligible donation received, which shall
include the name and taxpayer identification number of the individual or
taxpayer making the eligible donation, the amount of the eligible donation, and
the date the eligible donation was received by the innovation campus; and
(3) Payment from the innovation campus equal to the value of the tax
credit for which application is made.

If the innovation campus applying for the tax credit meets all criteria required
by this subsection, the department shall issue a certificate in the appropriate
amount.
5. Tax credits issued under this section may be assigned, transferred,
sold, or otherwise conveyed, and the new owner of the tax credit shall have the
same rights in the credit as the taxpayer. Whenever a certificate is assigned,
transferred, sold, or otherwise conveyed, a notarized endorsement shall be
filed with the department specifying the name and address of the new owner of
the tax credit and the value of the credit.
6. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions
of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general
assembly under and pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2014, shall be invalid and void.
7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The program authorized under this section shall expire six years
after August 28, 2014, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this
section shall automatically sunset twelve years after August 28, 2014; and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized
under this section is sunset.]

HCS HB 3092 216
[633.420. 1. For the purposes of this section, the term "dyslexia"
means a disorder that is neurological in origin, characterized by difficulties
with accurate and fluent word recognition, and poor spelling and decoding
abilities that typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of
language, often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and the
provision of effective classroom instruction, and of which secondary
consequences may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced
reading experience that can impede growth of vocabulary and background
knowledge. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a district from assessing
students for dyslexia and offering students specialized reading instruction if a
determination is made that a student suffers from dyslexia. Unless required by
federal law, nothing in this definition shall require a student with dyslexia to be
automatically determined eligible as a student with a disability. Nothing in
this definition shall require a student with dyslexia to obtain an individualized
education program (IEP) unless the student has otherwise met the federal
conditions necessary.
2. There is hereby created the "Legislative Task Force on Dyslexia".
The joint committee on education shall provide technical and administrative
support as required by the task force to fulfill its duties; any such support
involving monetary expenses shall first be approved by the chairman of the
joint committee on education. The task force shall meet at least quarterly and
may hold meetings by telephone or video conference. The task force shall
advise and make recommendations to the governor, joint committee on
education, and relevant state agencies regarding matters concerning
individuals with dyslexia, including education and other adult and
adolescent services.
3. The task force shall be comprised of twenty-one members
consisting of the following:
(1) Two members of the senate appointed by the president pro tempore
of the senate, with one member appointed from the minority party and one
member appointed from the majority party;
(2) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives, with one member appointed from the
minority party and one member appointed from the majority party;
(3) The commissioner of education, or his or her designee;
(4) One representative from an institution of higher education located
in this state with specialized expertise in dyslexia and reading instruction;
(5) A representative from a state teachers association or the Missouri
National Education Association;
(6) A representative from the International Dyslexia Association of
Missouri;
(7) A representative from Decoding Dyslexia of Missouri;
(8) A representative from the Missouri Association of Elementary
School Principals;
(9) A representative from the Missouri Council of Administrators of
Special Education;

HCS HB 3092 217
(10) A professional licensed in the state of Missouri with experience
diagnosing dyslexia including, but not limited to, a licensed psychologist,
school psychologist, or neuropsychologist;
(11) A speech-language pathologist with training and experience in
early literacy development and effective research-based intervention
techniques for dyslexia, including an Orton-Gillingham remediation program
recommended by the Missouri Speech-Language Hearing Association;
(12) A certified academic language therapist recommended by the
Academic Language Therapy Association who is a resident of this state;
(13) A representative from an independent private provider or
nonprofit organization serving individuals with dyslexia;
(14) An assistive technology specialist with expertise in accessible
print materials and assistive technology used by individuals with dyslexia
recommended by the Missouri assistive technology council;
(15) One private citizen who has a child who has been diagnosed with
dyslexia;
(16) One private citizen who has been diagnosed with dyslexia;
(17) A representative of the Missouri State Council of the
International Reading Association;
(18) A pediatrician with knowledge of dyslexia; and
(19) A member of the Missouri School Boards' Association.
4. The members of the task force, other than the members from the
general assembly and ex officio members, shall be appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives by
September 1, 2016, by alternating appointments beginning with the president
pro tempore of the senate. A chairperson shall be selected by the members of
the task force. Any vacancy on the task force shall be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment. Members shall serve on the task force
without compensation.
5. The task force shall make recommendations for a statewide system
for identification, intervention, and delivery of supports for students with
dyslexia, including the development of resource materials and professional
development activities. These recommendations shall be included in a report
to the governor and joint committee on education and shall include findings
and proposed legislation and shall be made available no longer than twelve
months from the task force's first meeting.
6. The recommendations and resource materials developed by the task
force shall:
(1) Identify valid and reliable screening and evaluation assessments
and protocols that can be used and the appropriate personnel to administer
such assessments in order to identify children with dyslexia or the
characteristics of dyslexia as part of an ongoing reading progress monitoring
system, multitiered system of supports, and special education eligibility
determinations in schools;
(2) Recommend an evidence-based reading instruction, with
consideration of the National Reading Panel Report and Orton-Gillingham
methodology principles for use in all Missouri schools, and intervention
system, including a list of effective dyslexia intervention programs, to address

HCS HB 3092 218
dyslexia or characteristics of dyslexia for use by schools in multitiered systems
of support and for services as appropriate for special education eligible
students;
(3) Develop and implement preservice and in-service professional
development activities to address dyslexia identification and intervention,
100 including utilization of accessible print materials and assistive technology,
101 within degree programs such as education, reading, special education, speech-
102 language pathology, and psychology;
103 (4) Review teacher certification and professional development
104 requirements as they relate to the needs of students with dyslexia;
105 (5) Examine the barriers to accurate information on the prevalence of
106 students with dyslexia across the state and recommend a process for accurate
107 reporting of demographic data; and
108 (6) Study and evaluate current practices for diagnosing, treating, and
109 educating children in this state and examine how current laws and regulations
110 affect students with dyslexia in order to present recommendations to the
111 governor and the joint committee on education.
112 7. The task force shall hire or contract for hire specialist services to
113 support the work of the task force as necessary with appropriations made by
114 the general assembly to the joint committee on education for that purpose or
115 from other available funding.
116 8. The task force authorized under this section shall expire on August
117 31, 2018, unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly.]
[640.030. The department of natural resources and the department of
conservation shall develop an interagency plan and execute an interagency
agreement regarding the application and use of any portion of funds authorized
for the respective departments by provisions of the Constitution, taking into
consideration the purposes for which the voters approved the funds and the
extent to which expenditures under the provisions of sections 252.300 to
252.333, or sections 620.552 to 620.574, accomplish such purposes. Such
interagency agreements shall not be subject to legislative review or oversight
and are not rules within the meaning of any law providing for review by the
general assembly or any committee thereof.]
✔